OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  DTV  TRANSITION: 

COUNTDOWN  TO  FEBRUARY  2009 

S.  HRG.  110–1220 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

SEPTEMBER  23,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

80–275 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas,  Ranking 
TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on September 23, 2008  .....................................................................
Statement of Senator Dorgan  .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Wicker  ..................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Baker, Meredith Attwell, Acting Assistant Secretary for Communications and 
Information, NTIA, U.S. Department of Commerce  ..........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Carbonell,  Hon.  Josefina  G.,  Assistant  Secretary  for  Aging,  U.S.  Department 
of Health and Human Services  ...........................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Goldstein,  Mark  L.,  Director,  Physical  Infrastructure,  U.S.  Government  Ac-
....................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
........
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Saffo, Hon. Bill, Mayor, City of Wilmington, North Carolina  ..............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Martin, Hon. Kevin J., Chairman, Federal Communications Commission 

countability Office (GAO) 

APPENDIX 

Response to written questions submitted to Meredith Attwell Baker by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  to  Hon.  Josefina  G.  Carbonell  by: 
Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Mark L. Goldstein by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Hon. Kevin J. Martin by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................
Hon. John D. Rockefeller IV  ............................................................................

Response to written question submitted to Hon. Bill Saffo by: 

Hon. Maria Cantwell  ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye  ......................................................................................

Page 
1 
48 
1 
53 
52 

20 
22 

31 
33 

36 
38 
2 
4 
43 
46 

68 
67 

66 
65 

72 
72 

64 
63 
63 

74 
73 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

OVERSIGHT  OF  THE  DTV  TRANSITION: 

COUNTDOWN  TO  FEBRUARY  2009 

TUESDAY,  SEPTEMBER  23,  2008 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:36  p.m.,  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Daniel  K.  Inouye, 
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

The CHAIRMAN. I realize that I am the only one here, but as you 
know, our Nation is faced with a very, very serious financial crisis, 
and  both  parties  have  their  Senators  in  conferences  at  this  mo-
ment. I excused myself from one of those because I do not want to 
have  you  waiting  too  long.  But  we  may  not  have  a  full  Committee 
here. 

But this DTV transition, which is scheduled for February 17 next 
year,  is  less  than  5  months  away.  And  for  the  past  18  months, 
Members  of  this  Committee  have  been  consistent  in  expressing 
their  concern  that  the  transition  to  digital  television  has  not  re-
ceived  enough  attention  or  resources  to  ensure  its  success.  And 
while  Federal  agencies  and  the  industry  have  stepped  up  their  ef-
forts, I continue to be concerned that we are not fully prepared for 
the  flood  of  coupon  requests  and  calls  that  we  can  expect  just  be-
fore the transition or after the transition. 

The  transition  is  taking  place  for  the  best  of  public  policy  rea-
sons. Once the transition is complete, we will free up needed spec-
trum for emergency first responders to use to better serve and pro-
tect  the  American  people.  In  addition,  consumers  will  have  higher 
quality  pictures  and  sound  and  hopefully  more  channels  to  chose 
from. 

And February 17 will be the 29th day of the next Administration. 
The  transition  has  the  potential  to  cause  serious  disruption,  not 
just  to  consumers,  but  to  a  new  President  who  is  just  getting  ac-
quainted  to  the  Oval  Office.  Neither  President  Obama  nor  Presi-
dent McCain should have to deal with a failed transition soon after 
coming into office. 

I am deeply concerned that the benefits of the transition may be 
overshadowed  by  poor  implementation.  As  the  recent  tests  in  Wil-
mington,  North  Carolina  demonstrated,  even  with  a  Herculean  in-
vestment of time and resources that will be impossible to replicate 
throughout  the  rest  of  the  country,  consumers  made  thousands  of 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

2 

phone calls seeking help with various aspects of the transition. On 
a national level, this may translate to millions of calls. Unless more 
is  done,  February  17,  18,  and  19  will  be  very,  very  long  days,  in-
deed. 

We have limited resources, limited time, but I hope to hear from 
our witnesses today the creative ideas they have to overcome these 
limitations  and  their  plans  to  address  the  potential  flood  of  calls, 
questions,  and  coupon  requests  around  the  date  of  the  transition. 
And  I  can  tell  you  that  Members  of  the  Congress  are  beginning  to 
receive calls now. 

These  are  immediate  and  significant  challenges  and  we  must 
find  a  way  to  overcome  them.  I  urge  the  Federal  Communications 
Commission and the National Telecommunications Information Ad-
ministration to make this transition a high priority and not let at-
tention  be  diverted  by  pursuing  contentious  proceedings.  As  the 
current  Administration  winds  down,  both  agencies  must  remain 
vigilant so that the next Administration does not inherit a commu-
nications crisis. We have too many crises facing us at this moment. 
So  with  that,  I  would  like  to  thank  all  the  witnesses  for  joining 
us  today,  and  may  I  call  upon  our  first  witness,  the  Chairman  of 
the  Federal  Communications  Commission,  the  Honorable  Kevin 
Martin? 

STATEMENT OF HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Good  afternoon  and  thank  you,  Chairman  Inouye, 
for inviting me to be here and for continuing to update you on the 
status of the digital transition. 

With  the  national  transition  about  five  months  away,  much  re-
mains  to  be  done.  At  the  same  time,  since  I  last  appeared  before 
you,  we  have  continued  to  make  progress  educating  viewers  and 
helping them prepare for the upcoming transition. In particular, in 
addition  to  our  ongoing  consumer  and  education  efforts,  we  have 
recently  gained  real-world  experience  with  the  challenges  facing 
viewers and broadcasters as we approach next February. 

On  September  8,  Wilmington,  North  Carolina,  became  the  first 
market  in  the  country  to  transition  from  analog  to  digital  tele-
vision. 

Before I go into the details of the Wilmington transition, I would 
like  to  start  by  thanking  Commissioner  Copps  for  challenging  me 
and the industry to find a community that would be willing to help 
the  rest  of  the  country  lead  this  transition.  Commissioner  Copps 
deserves  credit  for  urging  the  Commission  to  engage  in  a  real- 
world  test  that  would  help  the  broadcasters,  viewers,  and  us  pre-
pare for the upcoming transition. 

May  I  also  take  a  moment  to  thank  Mayor  Saffo  and  the  entire 
Wilmington  community.  I  know  you  will  be  hearing  from  him  di-
rectly  in  a  few  moments,  but  it  was  the  community’s  efforts  that 
really made this transition possible in Wilmington. 

The  Wilmington  switch-over  was  critically  important  because  it 
enabled  us  to  learn  what  was  effective  in  informing  and  preparing 
viewers  and  broadcasters  for  the  transition.  And,  equally  impor-
tant,  it  helped  us  identify  what  outreach  and  technical  challenges 
still need to be addressed in the months ahead. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

3 

While we hope that the transition in Wilmington went relatively 
smoothly,  the  measure  of  success  in  Wilmington  is  not  what  oc-
curred  earlier  this  month.  The  measure  of  success  in  Wilmington 
is  what  happens  next  February  and  whether  we  are  able  to  learn 
from the experience and apply those lessons as we move this effort 
across the country. 

Now,  importantly,  the  consumer  education  campaign  that  was 
conducted  appears  to  have  been  effective.  Consumer  calls  received 
by the Commission at its call center indicated that a vast majority 
of  the  400,000  television  viewers  in  the  Wilmington  area  were 
aware  of  the  transition  and  prepared  for  it.  As  of  last  Friday,  we 
had  received  2,272  calls  regarding  the  Wilmington  test,  rep-
resenting  only  about  1.2  percent  of  the  Wilmington  households. 
During  that  same  timeframe,  following  the  switch-over,  only  100 
callers  said  they  were  unaware  of  the  transition,  and  186  callers 
said they were aware but did not take any action to prepare for it. 
So,  though  our  consumer  education  effort  appears  to  have  been 
effective,  our  focus  now  needs  to  turn  to  resolving  several  of  the 
technical  challenges.  Some  of  these  challenges  are  easily  resolved 
and others are not. 

With  respect  to  the  callers  who  were  experiencing  difficulty  fol-
lowing  the  switch,  I  have  directed  our  engineers  and  our  outreach 
staff to work directly with these viewers and assist them in resolv-
ing their individual questions and needs. 

For  example,  as  of  last  Friday,  there  were  341  calls  to  our  help 
line about converter box problems. Thanks to the Commission staff, 
almost  90  percent  of  these,  almost  300  of  the  341  calls  that  came 
in,  have  been  resolved.  Many  of  these  solutions  were  very  simple. 
Consumers needed to rescan for channels on their television set or 
on  their  converter  box  or  properly  hook  up  their  converter  box  to 
the  television.  On  a  going-forward  basis,  our  consumer  education 
efforts are going to need to better instruct consumers about how to 
effectively hook up their box and how to rescan. 

Unfortunately, some viewers are experiencing problems that will 
not  be  as  easy  for  us  to  resolve.  For  example,  there  are  a  number 
of  consumers  in  the  Wilmington  area  that  have  lost  access  to  the 
Wilmington  NBC  affiliate.  Prior  to  the  digital  switch,  the  Wil-
mington  NBC  affiliate  was  available  to  viewers  outside  the  tele-
vision market as far south as Myrtle Beach and as far north as Ra-
leigh,  North  Carolina.  The  Wilmington  NBC  affiliate’s  coverage 
area  after  the  switch  no  longer  includes  viewers  outside  its  main 
market.  Some  of  these  viewers  will  be  able  to  watch  their  local 
NBC  affiliate  in  Myrtle  Beach  and  Raleigh.  There  are  some,  how-
ever, that will not have access to any NBC affiliate. 

Our  goal  is  to  ensure  that  all  viewers  in  the  Wilmington  area 
and  ultimately  across  the  country  have  access  to  the  same  tele-
vision  signals  they  did  prior  to  the  transition.  The  Commission  is 
currently  exploring  what  steps  can  be  taken  to  address  this  prob-
lem  in  Wilmington  and  to  help  minimize  the  burden  on  viewers 
throughout the country. 

Finally, relatively few consumers lost their broadcast channels as 
a result of the cliff effect. Only about 15 percent of viewers receive 
their  signals  over  the  air.  In  the  past,  I  have  estimated  that  less 
than 1 percent of all viewers would need a new antenna due to the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

4 

digital  cliff  effect.  The  data  from  Wilmington  suggests  a  similar 
outcome. We received approximately 549 calls from viewers experi-
encing  antenna  or  reception  issues  and  were  able  to  resolve  ap-
proximately  139  of  them  by  asking  them  to  rescan  or  to  adjust 
their antenna’s direction. Only 410 calls, or about .22 percent of the 
Wilmington  households,  were  potentially  experiencing  this  digital 
cliff  effect.  In  short,  for  stations  whose  DTV  coverage  signal  was 
designed to replicate their analog coverage signal, complaints about 
the  potential  cliff  effect  were  well  below  our  estimate  of  one  per-
cent. 

The early switch to digital in Wilmington has been instrumental 
in  helping  the  Commission  to  identify,  understand,  and  hopefully 
prevent some of these future problems when the rest of the Nation 
transitions in February. 

And,  finally,  one  of  the  fundamental  lessons  learned  in  Wil-
mington  is  the  importance  of  educating  consumers  at  a  grassroots 
level.  To  this  end,  last  month  I  announced  a  nationwide  initiative 
to increase awareness about the upcoming transition to digital tele-
vision.  As  part  of  our  efforts  to  prepare  consumers  for  the  transi-
tion, the Commission identified those markets in which the largest 
number  of  viewers  will  need  to  take  action  to  be  prepared  for  the 
transition  five  months  from  now.  My  fellow  Commissioners  and  I 
will  fan  out  to  these  markets  to  raise  awareness  and  educate  con-
sumers  in  the  days  leading  up  to  the  transition.  At  each  stop,  we 
will  do  public  events  such  as  town  hall  meetings,  workshops,  and 
round  tables  with  an  FCC  Commissioner  to  highlight  the  transi-
tion, be available to local press, and in coordination with these vis-
its,  the  Commission  will  work  with  local  broadcasters  and  radio 
stations to increase the broadcast of radio and TV DTV PSAs. 

As part of the tour, the Commission is also coordinating with the 
broadcasters  to  explore  whether  at  the  same  time  these  stations 
may  participate  in  a  temporary  turn-off  of  their  analog  signals. 
During  these  so-called  soft  tests,  analog  consumers  would  see  a 
message on their screens informing them of the transition and how 
to become prepared. 

The next five months will undoubtedly be challenging. Neverthe-
less,  it  is  my  hope  that  through  the  combined  efforts  of  govern-
ment,  industry,  advocacy,  and  grassroots  groups,  American  con-
sumers will reap the rewards that the digital transition has to offer 
and we can continue to try to minimize the burdens that we placed 
on them. 

Thank you, and I look forward to answering your questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Martin follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN, CHAIRMAN, 

FEDERAL COMMUNICATIONS COMMISSION 

Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Inouye,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  and  Members  of 
the  Committee.  Thank  you  for  inviting  me  here  today  to  continue  updating  you  on 
the status of the digital transition. 

The  Commission  has  been  hard  at  work  on  a  number  of  fronts  to  minimize  the 
potential burden for consumers and to maximize their ability to benefit from the up-
coming digital transition. The conversion to digital television promises movie quality 
picture and sound as well as potentially new programming choices. It also will allow 
us  to  significantly  improve  public  safety  communications  and  usher  in  a  new  era 
of advanced wireless services. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

5 

With  the  national  transition  about  5  months  away,  much  remains  to  be  done.  At 
the  same  time,  since  I  last  appeared  before  you,  we  have  continued  to  make 
progress  educating  viewers  and  helping  them  prepare  for  the  upcoming  transition. 
In  particular,  in  addition  to  our  ongoing  consumer  education  and  outreach  efforts, 
we  have  recently  gained  real-world  experience  with  the  challenges  facing  viewers 
and broadcasters as we approach February 2009. 

Earlier this month, on September 8, Wilmington, North Carolina became the first 
market in the country to transition from analog to digital television. At noon on that 
day, five local Wilmington stations turned off their analog signals and began broad-
casting only digital to the viewers in the five counties that comprise the Wilmington 
television  market.  This  was  a  historic  day  and  I  am  pleased  that  the  local  broad-
casters  and  the  entire  community  embraced  the  challenge  of  helping  the  country 
prepare for the switch to digital. 

Before  I  go  into  the  details  of  the  Wilmington  transition,  I  would  like  to  start  by 
thanking  Commissioner  Copps  for  challenging  me  and  the  industry  to  find  a  com-
munity  that  would  be  willing  to  help  the  rest  of  the  country  lead  this  transition. 
Commissioner Copps deserves credit for urging the Commission to engage in a real- 
world test that would help ready the broadcasters, viewers and us for the upcoming 
transition. 

For  its  part,  the  Commission  worked  to  educate,  inform,  and  prepare  viewers  for 
the  transition.  We  had  staff  on  the  ground  in  every  county,  we  attended  over  400 
outreach events, including Town Hall meetings, and distributed over 85,000 publica-
tions.  But  it  was  our  partnerships,  particularly  those  at  the  grassroots  level,  that 
were  critical  in  enabling  us  to  contact  the  ‘‘at  risk’’  groups  that  we  are  focused  on 
reaching—senior citizens, non-English speakers and minorities, people with disabil-
ities, low-income consumers, and those living in rural or tribal areas. One of the in-
valuable lessons we have learned from Wilmington is that DTV outreach success de-
pends  on  the  commitment  of  the  local  community,  including  local  industry,  govern-
mental  and  nongovernmental  organizations.  Community  stakeholders  must  take  a 
leadership role for such large-scale messaging to take effect, and tapping into exist-
ing grassroots networks is critical. 
The Wilmington Test 

The Wilmington switchover was critically important because it enabled us to learn 
what  was  effective  in  informing  and  preparing  viewers  and  broadcasters  for  the 
transition.  Equally  important,  it  helped  us  identify  what  outreach  and  technical 
challenges  still  need  to  be  addressed  in  the  months  ahead.  While  we  hope  that  the 
transition  in  Wilmington  went  relatively  smoothly,  the  measure  of  success  in  Wil-
mington  is  not  what  occurred  earlier  this  month.  The  measure  of  success  in  Wil-
mington is what happens next February and whether we are able to learn from this 
experience and apply those lessons as we move this effort across the country. 
Majority of Wilmington Viewers Aware and Prepared for Transition 

Based  on  our  current  information,  it  appears  that  the  majority  of  Wilmington 
viewers  were  aware  of  and  prepared  for  the  transition.  Importantly,  the  consumer 
education campaign that was conducted appears to have been effective. Prior to the 
transition on September 8, NAB released a survey indicating that 97 percent of Wil-
mington  residents  were  aware  of  the  switch  to  digital.  Consumer  calls  received  by 
the  Commission  at  its  call  center  also  indicated  that  the  vast  majority  of  the 
400,000 television viewers in the Wilmington-area were aware of the transition and 
prepared for it. 

In total we received 2,272 calls regarding the Wilmington test, representing about 
1.2 percent of Wilmington households. See Appendix D. During the first week of the 
transition we received 1,828 calls. That number dropped to 444 calls to the FCC call 
center  during  the  second  week.  During  the  first  day  of  the  transition,  the  Commis-
sion’s  toll-free  helpline  received  797  calls  representing  less  than  one-half  of  1  per-
cent  of  area  homes.  Last  Friday,  72  calls  were  placed  to  the  call  center  by  Wil-
mington residents. 

It  appears  that  the  residents  of  Wilmington  were  generally  aware  of  the  early 
transition  and  generally  prepared  for  it.  For  the  2  weeks  following  the  switchover 
only  100  callers  said  they  were  unaware  of  the  transition  and  186  callers  were 
aware but did not act to prepare for it. See Appendix D. 
Challenges that Remain 

While  we  continue  to  enhance  our  consumer  education  efforts  which  appear  to 
have been effective, we must also be focused on resolving technical challenges. Some 
of these challenges are easily resolved and others are not. With respect to the callers 
who are experiencing difficulty following the switch to digital in Wilmington, I have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

6 

directed  our  engineers  and  outreach  staff  to  work  directly  with  these  viewers  and 
assist them in resolving their individual questions and needs. 

For  example,  as  of  last  Friday,  341  of  the  calls  to  our  helpline  were  about  con-
verter box problems. We received 301 calls about the converter box program during 
the first week and 40 of those calls in the second week after the transition. Thanks 
to dedicated Commission staff, many of these difficulties have been resolved. Specifi-
cally,  Commission  staff  was  able  to  resolve  almost  90  percent  (299  of  the  341)  of 
the  calls  that  came  in  about  converter  box  issues.  See  Appendix  D.  The  solutions 
were often relatively simple—consumers needed to re-scan the channels on their tel-
evision set or properly hook up their converter box. Broadly speaking, gaining a bet-
ter understanding of the challenges being faced by consumers after the real switch-
over in Wilmington, is enabling us to better focus our messaging and consumer edu-
cation tools. Specifically, as we go forward, our consumer education efforts will need 
to better instruct consumers about how to effectively hookup their box and the need 
to re-scan. 

Unfortunately,  some  viewers  are  experiencing  problems  that  will  not  be  as  easy 
for us to resolve. For example, there are a number of consumers in the Wilmington- 
area that have lost access to the Wilmington NBC affiliate, WECT. During the first 
week  we  received  581  calls  from  viewers  experiencing  problems  receiving  channels 
or calls signs. In week two, 154 such calls were made to the Commission’s helpline. 
(For  the  2-weeks,  the  total  number  of  calls  in  this  category  was  735.)  Prior  to  the 
digital switch, the Wilmington NBC affiliate signal was available to viewers outside 
the television market as far south as Myrtle Beach, South Carolina and as far north 
as  Raleigh,  North  Carolina.  See  Appendix  B.  The  Wilmington  NBC  affiliate’s  new 
coverage  area,  however,  no  longer  includes  these  out  of  market  communities.  Some 
of these viewers will be able to watch their local NBC affiliate in Myrtle Beach and 
Raleigh.  There  may  be  some,  however,  that  will  not  have  access  to  any  NBC  affil-
iate. See Appendix C. Reception problems for channel 6 were caused by a significant 
reduction in the service contour for WECT channel 6, not the digital cliff effect. 

Our  goal  is  to  ensure  that  all  viewers  in  the  Wilmington-area  and  the  country 
have access to the same television signals that they did prior to the transition. The 
Commission is currently exploring what steps can be taken to address this problem 
in Wilmington and minimize the burden on viewers throughout the country. 

Finally,  relatively  few  consumers  lost  their  broadcast  channels  as  a  result  of  the 
‘‘cliff effect.’’ Digital TV experiences what is often referred to as the ‘‘digital cliff ef-
fect.’’  Analog  TV  pictures  degrade  gradually.  As  the  signals  get  weaker  the  picture 
becomes  progressively  poorer  or  becomes  ‘‘snowy.’’  Yet,  viewers  may  still  find  these 
pictures  watchable.  In  contrast,  digital  TV  pictures  remain  crystal  clear  even  with 
relatively  weak  signal  levels.  However,  once  the  signal  falls  below  a  certain  level, 
the picture breaks up or disappears. In such situations, viewers may lose their pic-
ture altogether. 

I  had  previously  testified  that  our  engineers  estimated  that  about  5  percent  of 
over-the-air viewers may need a new antenna to receive digital television due to the 
digital  cliff  effect.  Only  about  15  percent  of  viewers  receive  their  signals  over  the 
air, so we estimated that less than 1 percent (5 percent of 15 percent) of all viewers 
would need a new antenna. The data from Wilmington suggests a similar estimate. 
We received 549 calls from viewers experiencing antenna or receptions issues and 
were able to resolve 139 of them. Only 410 calls, then, or .22 percent of Wilmington 
households  were  potentially  experiencing  the  ‘‘cliff  effect.’’  In  short,  for  stations 
whose  DTV  coverage  was  designed  to  replicate  their  analog  coverage,  complaints 
about the potential cliff effect were well below our estimate of 1 percent. 

The  early  switch  to  digital  in  Wilmington  has  been  instrumental  in  helping  the 
Commission  to  identify,  understand,  and  hopefully  prevent  some  future  problems 
when  the  rest  of  the  Nation  transitions  in  February  2009.  The  measure  of  success 
in Wilmington is not what happened on September 8. Rather, it is how we are going 
to take what we learned in Wilmington and apply that knowledge to the rest of the 
country. 

We have already learned some very important lessons. For example, the Commis-
sion  learned  from  the  Wilmington  test  the  importance  of  emergency  preparedness. 
At  the  time  we  began  outreach  in  Wilmington  4  months  ago  there  were  no  battery 
operated converter boxes available. So the broadcasters and some folks down in Wil-
mington were able to work with one converter box manufacturer, Winegard, who re-
cently  introduced  a  DTV  converter  box  battery  pack  specifically  designed  to  allow 
its converter boxes to work in power outages. 

We  will  continue  to  study  the  Wilmington  experience  so  that  we  can  best  mini-

mize the burdens placed on consumers as the national transition approaches. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

7 

Ongoing DTV Efforts 

In  addition  to  our  efforts  in  the  Wilmington  test  market,  the  Commission  has 
been busy in other areas. Our activities are described in great detail in the monthly 
digital television status reports that we send to Congress. I have attached the most 
recent  of  these  comprehensive  reports  to  my  testimony.  See  Appendix  A.  I  would 
like to highlight a few things we have been working on. 
Broadcasters’ Transition to Digital 

Progress  on  converting  broadcast  facilities  to  all  digital  is  continuing.  Based  on 
the  status  reports  that  we  have  required  broadcasters  to  make,  over  90  percent  of 
active  full  power  television  stations  are  either  fully  operational  with  digital  service 
or  are  on  track  to  have  their  full  digital  service  operational  by  February  17,  2009. 
Slightly over 5 percent of the stations indicate that they will take advantage of the 
flexibility  offered  by  the  Commission  and  serve  at  least  85  percent  of  their  service 
population  on  February  17,  2009,  with  final  digital  operations  beginning  sometime 
thereafter. The Commission gave such flexibility if a broadcaster faced unique tech-
nical challenges such as weather-related issues, or coordination with other stations. 
Enforcement Activities 

The  Commission’s  DTV-related  enforcement  efforts  have  focused  on  protecting 
consumers by enforcing our rules as this transition takes place. As of September 18, 
2008,  Commission  personnel  have  inspected  4,161  stores  and  72  websites  to  assess 
their  compliance  with  the  Commission’s  rules  requiring  labels  on  analog-only  tele-
vision receivers. We have issued 369 citations for failing to comply with our labeling 
rules. Since October 2007, we have released NALs or consent decrees against 22 re-
tailers, totaling more than $4.74 million. 

We also have been visiting retailers to assess their employee training in the DTV 
transition  and  the  NTIA  converter  box  coupon  program.  As  of  September  18,  2008, 
Commission  field  agents  have  visited  1,489  stores  and  conducted  1,438  interviews 
of store managers in 47 states and in Puerto Rico. 

In  addition,  we  are  actively  enforcing  the  DTV  consumer  education  requirements 
that  the  Commission  adopted  last  spring.  To  this  end,  we  have  recently  issued  a 
Bureau-level  NAL  in  the  amount  of  $51,000  against  one  company  for  failing  to  no-
tify  its  customers  of  the  transition  as  required  under  our  rules.  We  have  also  cir-
culated a Commission-level order proposing $12.3 million of fines collectively against 
eight companies for notification failures. We are in the midst of reviewing additional 
information  submitted  by  broadcasters,  cable  operators,  and  telecommunications 
carriers, and expect to take additional enforcement actions in the near future. 
Consumer Education and Outreach 

Word  of  the  digital  transition  is  spreading  quickly  throughout  the  country.  I 

would like to highlight a few of our education and outreach activities. 

Nationwide  81-City  Tour.  Last  month,  I  announced  a  nationwide  initiative  to  in-
crease awareness about the upcoming transition to digital television. As part of our 
efforts to prepare consumers for the transition, the Commission identified television 
markets  in  which  the  largest  number  of  viewers  will  have  to  take  action  to  be  pre-
pared for the transition 5 months from now. Specifically, we identified 81 target tel-
evision  markets  for  specific  DTV  outreach,  including  all  those  markets  in  which 
more  than  100,000  households  or  at  least  15  percent  of  the  households  rely  solely 
on  over-the-air  signals  for  television.  Within  these  markets,  we  are  aiming  to  edu-
cate those groups most vulnerable to the transition such as senior citizens and non- 
English  speakers.  My  fellow  Commissioners  and  I,  as  well  as  other  Commission 
staff,  will  fan  out  to  these  markets  to  raise  awareness  and  educate  consumers  in 
the days leading up to the digital television transition on February 17, 2009. 

At each stop, there will be a public event, such as a town hall meeting, workshop, 
or roundtable with an FCC Commissioner to highlight the digital transition, and be 
available to local press. In coordination with these visits, the Commission will work 
with  local  broadcasters  and  radio  stations  to  increase  the  broadcasts  of  Radio  and 
TV  DTV  PSAs.  The  Commission  has  visited  several  cities  so  far  including,  Anchor-
age, Fairbanks, Tulsa and San Francisco and plans many more trips in the upcom-
ing weeks. 

As  part  of  this  nationwide  tour,  the  Commission  is  also  coordinating  with  the 
broadcasters to explore whether at the same time these stations may participate in 
a temporary turn off of their analog signals. During these so-called ‘‘soft tests’’ ana-
log customers would see a message on their screens informing them of the transition 
and how to become prepared. 

DTV Awareness Sessions. The Commission has conducted over 1,882 DTV Aware-
ness sessions, attended more than 509 conferences and events, established 514 part-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

8 

nerships,  and  made  over  7,985  visits  to  various  organizations  around  the  country 
to disseminate DTV information. 

Speakers  Bureau.  Last  month,  I  announced  that  the  Commission  has  launched  a 
Speakers  Bureau  for  groups  throughout  the  country  to  request  speakers  to  discuss 
the  upcoming  digital  transition.  The  Speakers  Bureau  is  the  latest  addition  to  the 
Commission’s  DTV  outreach  effort.  The  Commission  will  provide  speakers,  without 
cost, to any group requesting one. To date, we have received 61 requests for speak-
ers.  The  requests  are  being  handled  by  staff  traveling  for  conferences  and  events, 
as part of the outreach for our town hall meetings, and by our field agents. 

Grassroots Bid. The Commission just announced that it is seeking contracts from 
grass  roots  organizations  and  community-based  organizations  to  assist  consumers, 
particularly  those  consumers  that  are  home-bound  or  that  have  limited  mobility, 
with  the  procurement  and  installation  of  digital  TV  converter  boxes  and  related 
equipment.  This  builds  upon  the  Commission’s  work  with  fire  departments  in  Wil-
mington  where  firefighters  entered  residents’  homes  to  help  with  installing  con-
verter  boxes.  These  efforts  will  complement  our  ongoing  work  of  educating  con-
sumers about the migration from analog to digital broadcasting. 

U.S. Postal Service Partnership. We have distributed more than 9,300 posters na-
tionwide.  We  are  displaying  DTV  education  posters  in  all  34,000  post  offices  across 
the  country.  These  posters  include  a  dinosaur  saying  ‘‘Don’t  Let  Your  TV  Become 
Extinct.’’ We are working with the U.S. Postal Service to install updated posters be-
ginning  November  1,  2008  running  through  the  end  of  the  transition  period.  The 
new posters are targeted to instill a greater sense of urgency to consumers and will 
use the slogan ‘‘On February 17, 2009 your TV is changing. Are you ready?’’ 
Conclusion 

In  conclusion,  the  Commission  is  devoting  significant  resources  to  facilitating  a 
smooth  transition.  Nearly  every  Bureau  and  Office  at  the  Commission  has  been  in-
volved in this effort including our field offices throughout the country. 

We  intend  to  take  whatever  actions  are  necessary  to  minimize  the  potential  bur-
den  the  digital  transition  could  impose  on  consumers  and  maximize  their  ability  to 
benefit from it. 

The  next  5  months  will  undoubtedly  be  challenging.  Nevertheless,  it  is  my  hope 
that through the combined efforts of government, industry, advocacy, and grassroots 
groups,  American  consumers  will  reap  the  rewards  that  the  digital  transition  has 
to offer. 

APPENDIX A 

Digital Television Status Update of the 

Federal Communications Commission—September 2008 

Introduction 

This  fifth  DTV  monthly  report  highlights  the  Federal  Communication  Commis-
sion’s  activities  as  of  August  31,  2008.  The  full  reports  and  lists  of  stations  are 
available upon request. 

The  Commission  has  three  primary  areas  of  focus:  (1)  developing  policies  and 
technical  rules  to  ensure  a  smooth  transition  for  broadcast  stations  and  minimize 
the  burden  placed  on  consumers;  (2)  enforcement  of  DTV-related  Commission  rules 
to  protect  consumers;  and  (3)  coordinating  and  conducting  consumer  education  out-
reach  on  the  DTV  transition.  The  Commission  is  devoting  significant  resources  in 
each  of  these  areas  to  facilitate  a  smooth  transition.  Those  efforts  are  summarized 
below and included in the various attachments. 
Update on Full-Power Broadcasters’ Transition to Digital 

With  regard  to  our  efforts  to  prepare  full-power  broadcasters  for  the  end  of  the 
transition,  the  Commission  has  in  place  the  necessary  rules  to  allow  broadcasters 
to construct digital facilities. Additionally, each station is required to file Form 387 
indicating the current status of construction of its post-transition facility and to up-
date  its  Form  387  filing  to  convey  changes  in  status  as  warranted.  It  is  important 
to  note  that  application  and  build  out  status  for  stations  changes  daily.  The  fol-
lowing  chart  provides  a  summary  of  the  current  status  of  full-power  television 
broadcast stations at the final 5 months of the DTV transition. A full list of stations 
is available upon request. 

In the month of August, 10 stations completed construction of their post-transition 
digital facilities. Thus, as noted in line 2 of the chart below, 1,012 stations indicated 
that they were completely finished with their DTV transition. In other words, those 
stations are on their final post-transition channel, have completed construction, and 
are operating their authorized post-transition digital facility. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

9 

On  August  18,  2008,  the  Media  Bureau  released  a  report  based  on  Form  387  fil-
ings. In response to the release of the report, the Bureau received updated informa-
tion from 75 stations regarding their status. The updated filings are reflected in the 
chart below. We note that, based on recently filed Form 387s, approximately 5 per-
cent  (97  stations)  will  take  advantage  of  the  flexibility  offered  by  the  Commission 
in  the  Third  DTV  Periodic  Review  Report  and  Order  and  will  be  serving  at  least 
85  percent  of  their  service  population  on  February  17,  2009,  with  final  operations 
beginning sometime thereafter (See line 4 below). Accordingly, line 3 below was ad-
justed to account for these stations. One station, a satellite of another station, fore-
casts  that  it  will  not  be  able  to  complete  construction  of  its  digital  facility  until  a 
few  days  after  February  17,  2009  and  will  be  dark  for  this  brief  time  (See  line  5 
below).  Finally,  3  stations  have  not  submitted  their  Form  387s  and  have  not  offi-
cially reported when they will be ready for the DTV transition, but each station has 
represented  to  video  division  staff  orally  that  it  is  on  track  to  complete  digital  con-
struction by February 17, 2009 (See line 6 below). In addition, we note that 10 sta-
tions were identified as new permittees without current analog facilities and are not 
required  to  construct  before  2/17/2009  (See  line  7  below).  Finally,  the  total  number 
of full power stations has been adjusted upward to 1,813 (See line 1), as there were 
two additional stations that have recently been granted applications for new digital 
facilities, but do not have post-transition construction permits (See line 8). 

Full Power Station Summary 

1.  Total # of full power stations with DTV channels: 

July 

August 

1,811 

1,813 

2.  Total # of stations with completed post-transition digital facilities: 

1,002 

1,012 

3.  Total # of stations on-track to complete construction by 2/17/09: 

4.  Total # of stations expecting to serve at least 85 percent of their dig-

ital population by 2/17/09 (with full construction completed after 2/17/ 
09): 

5.  Total # of stations expecting to complete construction by approxi-

mately 2/21/09: 

6.  Total # of stations not filing Form 387: 

7.  Total # of new DTV stations with construction deadlines after 2/17/09 
(4/3/2009, 4/10/2009, 6/28/2009, 8/11/2009, 8/24/2009, 9/20/2009, 12/6/ 
2009, 1/10/2010, and 7/20/2010): 

736 

56 

685 

97 

1 

3 

10 

1 

3 

10 

8.  Total # of recently granted applications for new digital stations: 

3 

5 

Update on Technical and Policy Actions 

The  Media  Bureau  continues  to  process  maximization  applications  and  requests 
for  new  channels.  As  of  August  31,  2008,  253  maximization  applications  have  been 
granted,  and  34  Notices  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  for  new  channels  have  been  re-
leased, with 4 dismissed. Additionally, as reported by the Media Bureau in August, 
106 stations indicate they plan to reduce analog service and 88 stations plan to ter-
minate  analog  transmissions  prior  to  2/17/2009.  As  of  August  31,  2008,  49  stations 
have  been  granted  permission  to  reduce  analog  service  with  28  having  already  re-
duced  analog  service.  Additionally,  as  of  August  31,  2008,  18  stations  have  been 
granted permission to turn off their analog stations with 8 stations already shutting 
down their analog operations. 

Below  is  a  summary  of  the  other  technical  and  policy  actions  taken  with  regard 
to the DTV transition in August 2008. A complete Policy and Technical Actions doc-
ument is available upon request. 

Policy and Technical Actions 

August 2008 Updates 

• Applications  for  DTV  Facilities—In  August  2008,  the  Video  Division  of  the 
Media  Bureau  processed  141  modification  and  license  applications  for  DTV  fa-
cilities. As of August 31, 2008, the total number of modification and license ap-
plications processed by the Video Division since 1997 is 5471. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

10 

• Applications  for  Construction  Permits—In  August  2008,  the  Commission  re-
ceived  approximately  6  construction  permit  applications  from  stations  imple-
menting their post-transition facilities. As of August 31 2008, the total number 
of applications to implement post-transition facilities received is 706. 

• DTV  Build  Out—In  August  2008,  the  Media  Bureau  released  a  report  on  the 
status  of  the  digital  build  out  by  full  power  television  stations.  The  report 
showed  that  over  96  percent  of  active  full  power  television  stations  are  either 
fully  operational  with  digital  service  or  are  on  track  to  have  their  full  digital 
service operational by February 17, 2009. 

• NTIA Certified Converter Boxes—In August 2008, NTIA announced certification 
of  20  converter  boxes  including  20  that  are  capable  of  analog  pass  though.  In 
total,  as  of  August  31,  2008,  NTIA  has  certified  149  converter  boxes  including 
75 that are capable of analog pass through. 

Update on Low-power Broadcasters’ Transition to Digital 

The Commission continues to process digital companion channel and digital flash 
cut  applications  for  low  power  stations.  As  of  August  31,  2008,  236  low  power  sta-
tions are operating in digital, with 5 new stations licensed in July. The chart below 
summarizes  the  current  information  related  to  Class  A,  low  power,  and  TV  trans-
lator  stations.  Additional  information  by  station  type  and  a  full  list  of  low  power 
stations is available upon request. 

Low Power Station Summary 

[As of 8.31.2008] 

Total # of Class A, LPTV & TV Translator Stations: 

Total  #  of  licensed  digital  Low  Power  stations  (both  ‘‘Digital  Companion 

Channel’’ and ‘‘Digital Flash Cut’’ stations): 

Total # of stations with granted digital applications: 

Total # of stations with accepted/pending digital applications: 

July 

August 

7,088 

7,088 

231 

236 

1,860 

1,900 

186 

199 

Total # of stations with no digital application filed or application dismissed: 

4,811 

4,753 

Industry Outreach Efforts 

Broadcast  stations  must  electronically  report  their  consumer  education  efforts  to 
the Commission on a quarterly basis by filing Form 388 electronically in a database 
that  is  publicly  available.  These  reports  must  also  be  placed  in  the  broadcaster’s 
public file and on their website. Broadcasters will file the next Form 388 on October 
10,  2008,  reporting  data  for  the  previous  quarter.  A  summary  of  that  data  will  be 
provided in November, when we report data from October 2008. 
Enforcement 

The  Commission’s  DTV-related  enforcement  efforts  have  focused  on  protecting 
consumers  from  unknowingly  buying  televisions  that  will  not  receive  full-power 
broadcast stations following the transition. There are three specific areas of enforce-
ment: (1) the labeling of analog-only televisions; (2) the prohibition on importing and 
shipment  of  analog-only  televisions;  (3)  the  V-Chip  requirement  for  digital  tele-
visions.  In  addition,  we  have  begun  conducting  informational  interviews  of  store 
managers  to  assess  the  employee  training  and  consumer  education  efforts  of  retail-
ers participating in the NTIA converter box coupon program. 
A. Labeling Enforcement 

Labeling Inspections 

Retail Stores 

Websites 

August 

Total to Date 

129 

33 

3,978 

72 

369 
Citations 
Note:  Due  to  the  fact  that  generally  retailers  are  not  FCC  licensees,  citations  must  be  issued  prior  to  pro-

3 

posing monetary penalty via a Notice of Apparent Liability (NAL). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

11 

B. DTV Tuner Mandate 

The  Enforcement  Bureau  continues  to  ensure  that  no  manufacturers  import  and 
ship  analog-only  television  receivers  and  equipment.  In  August,  two  new  NALs  for 
apparent  violation  were  issued  to  Hannspree  North  America,  Inc.,  and  Invision  In-
dustries,  Inc.,  for  a  total  of  $336,450.  These  NALs  bring  the  total  to  date  to  five. 
Previous  NALs  were  issued  to  Precor,  Syntax  Brillian  Corp.,  and  Regent  USA,  Inc. 
Precor  and  Regent  have  paid  $421,550  combined,  but  Syntax  Brillian  has  declared 
Chapter  11  bankruptcy.  The  Department  of  Justice  must  now  file  a  proof  of  claim 
at the appropriate time in the company’s bankruptcy proceeding to establish a claim 
for collection purposes. 
C. V-Chip Requirements 

The Commission’s rules require digital television manufacturers to include the V- 
Chip  in  their  equipment  and  to  ensure  that  their  devices  can  adjust  to  changes  in 
the content advisory system. We began investigating allegations that some manufac-
turers  were  not  complying  with  our  rules.  We  have  released  three  NALs  and  eight 
consent  decrees  with  manufacturers  to  resolve  our  investigations.  The  voluntary 
contributions  from  these  orders  totaled  over  $3.7  million  and  payment  has  already 
been made to the U.S. Treasury. In addition, the manufacturers agreeing to consent 
decrees  have  undertaken  significant  compliance  measures  to  remedy  their  past  vio-
lations and prevent future ones. 
D. Retail Interviews 

As  part  of  our  follow-up  on  the  requirements  of  the  recent  DTV  Consumer  Edu-
cation Order, field agents across the country have been interviewing store managers 
at  retail  establishments  offering  digital-toanalog  converter  boxes.  Below  is  a  sum-
mary of those efforts. 

Retail Interviews 

Visits 

Interviews 

August 

Total to Date 

111 

106 

1,446 

1,397 

To  date,  as  reflected  graphically  below,  the  Bureau  has  found  that  the  majority 
of  store  managers  interviewed  are  well-informed  of  the  digital  transition  and  the 
NTIA  converter  box  coupon  program.  Some  managers,  however,  appear  to  need  ad-
ditional training in certain areas, e.g., the need of some customers for new antenna 
equipment, the fact that many low-power television stations will not convert to dig-
ital  broadcasting  on  February  17,  2009.  Where  such  training  issues  arise,  field 
agents  are  providing  information  tip  sheets  and  conducting  supplemental  training 
sessions. 

The  Commission  also  has  reviewed  35  retailer  websites  and  contacted  ten  retail-
ers  selling  converter  boxes  by  telephone  to  assess  whether  they  are  providing  accu-
rate  information  to  the  public.  We  also  are  conducting  compliance  reviews  of  tele-
communications carriers, manufacturers, and cable and satellite companies to verify 
that  they  have  met  our  consumer  education  requirements.  In  addition,  we  are  re-
viewing  hundreds  of  broadcaster  filings  to  determine  whether  they  have  complied 
with the DTV outreach requirements in the DTV Consumer Education Order. 

Swift enforcement of all our DTV-related rules is critical to protecting consumers 
and  reducing  potential  confusion.  Our  activities  in  this  area  will  continue  to  be  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1
2
T
R
A
M
3
2
9

12 

priority.  Please  see  Attachment  A  for  a  list  of  enforcement  actions  and  a  summary 
of our retailer interview responses through August 2008. 
National Consumer Education and Outreach 

The  Commission  is  actively  and  directly  promoting  consumer  awareness  through 
our own education and outreach efforts. Our efforts emphasize outreach to over-the- 
air consumers and other ‘‘hard to reach’’ populations, including senior citizens; non- 
English speaking and minority communities; people with disabilities; low-income in-
dividuals;  and  people  living  in  rural  and  tribal  areas.  Commission  staff  has  been 
working to form partnerships and commitments from a wide variety of sources—in-
cluding  other  Federal  Agencies,  as  well  as  Tribal,  State  and  Local  governments. 
Below  is  a  summary  of  outreach  efforts  of  the  Commission  on  a  national  level  for 
the  month  of  August.  A  complete  report  of  national  outreach  efforts  is  available 
upon request. 
A. Information Distribution 

A key part of the Commission’s education and outreach efforts has been the devel-
opment  and  distribution  of  consumer  literature.  These  tools  are  a  cost-effective 
means  to  provide  information  about  the  transition.  In  August,  over  94,500  pages  of 
DTV-related  publications  and  posters  were  distributed.  Additionally,  as  part  of  an 
agreement  with  the  U.S.  Postal  Service,  thousands  of  DTV  transition  posters  were 
distributed to the U.S. Postal Service and are being displayed for the public at Post 
Offices  nationwide.  The  chart  below  summarizes  the  Commission’s  distribution  ef-
forts. 

Distribution of Materials and Information 

Publications Distributed (Pages) 

Posters Distributed 

Website Hits 

Call Center Calls 

August 

Total to Date 

94,552 

Over 5.6 million 

25 

6,397,784 

146,107 

41,251 

35,298,312 

1,188,873 

Further, the number of website rose again in August, reflecting an increasing de-
mand  for  Internet  access  to  information  on  the  DTV  transition.  Total  call  volume 
to  the  FCC  in  August  2008  was  146,107,  which  is  a  336  percent  increase  since  De-
cember 2007. The graphs below illustrate the call center calls and website hits since 
October 2007. 

In  addition,  our  most  widely  distributed  DTV  one-pager  is  available  in  20  lan-
guages  in  addition  to  English,  including:  Spanish,  Chinese,  French,  Korean,  Rus-
sian,  Tagalog,  Vietnamese,  Hmong,  Japanese,  Arabic,  Cambodian,  Navajo,  Somali, 
Amharic, Yupik, Portuguese, Laotian, Creole, Kurdish, and Polish, as well as Braille 
and  audio  formats.  The  public  can  obtain  copies  of  our  various  DTV  publications, 
as  well  as  access  other  information  resources,  by  visiting  our  www.DTV.gov  web 
page or by calling our Consumer Center toll-free at 1–888–CALL FCC. 
B. Media Outreach 

Billboards:  Ketchum  rolled  out  highway  billboards  on  outdoor  advertising  space 
in  five  additional  markets  in  August,  and  has  now  made  agreements  for  donated 
space in a total of 55 markets. The new billboards went up in Duluth, MN; Spring-
field, MO; Yuma (El Centro), AZ; Kansas City, MO; and Dayton, OH. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
2
T
R
A
M
3
2
9

13 

Public  Service  Announcements:  Ketchum  has  produced  18  English  and  Spanish 
radio  public  service  announcements,  of  varying  lengths,  featuring  FCC  Commis-
sioners.  Ketchum  distributed  the  PSAs  to  all  full-power  radio  stations  nationwide 
and  the  PSAs  are  available  on  DTV.gov  as  broadcast-quality  downloads.  Based  on 
preliminary data, Ketchum indicates that, as of August 31, 2008, a total of 180 radio 
stations aired the PSA, resulting in over 36,000,000 audience impressions. This pre-
liminary  data  translates  into  an  estimated  greater  than  6  percent  airing  rate  na-
tionwide—or  over  155,000,000  audience  impressions  nationwide.  Ketchum  has  pro-
duced  12  English  and  Spanish  television  PSAs,  of  varying  lengths,  also  featuring 
FCC  Commissioners.  They  are  being  distributed  to  broadcasters  and  public  access 
cable  programmers  nationwide.  Ketchum  has  also  produced  a  longer-form  edu-
cational  video.  The  television  PSAs  and  educational  video  are  viewable  on 
www.DTV.gov  and  broadcast-quality  versions  are  available,  upon  request,  from  the 
Commission. 
C. Participation in Events and Conferences and Utilization of FCC Field Offices 

Cumulative National Outreach Summary 

Visits 

Awareness Sessions 

Conferences, Events, & Meetings 

Media Interviews 

Partnerships 

August 

Total to Date 

632 

163 

113 

15 

82 

7,732 

1,765 

482 

101 

516 

As  a  subset  of  the  numbers  above  of,  in  August,  FCC  field  agents  have  visited 
274 senior centers and 327 community centers, which frequently include large num-
bers of seniors, and gave 95 presentations. Thus far, Field Agents have visited 5,082 
senior centers and 2,704 community centers and have given 1,221 presentations. 
D.  Coordination  with  Federal,  State,  Tribal  and  Local  entities  and  Community 

Stakeholders 

The  Commission’s  ongoing  collaboration  with  public  and  private  sector  agencies 
and  organizations  continues  to  produce  positive  results.  Eighty-two  DTV  outreach 
commitments  were  obtained  as  a  result  of  partnership  activities  in  August  2008.  A 
list of these commitments is available upon request. 
State-by-State Consumer Education and Outreach 

The Commission continues its active outreach on the DTV Transition with a focus 
on over-the-air households with a particular emphasis on the hard to reach constitu-
encies,  including  senior  citizens,  non-English  speaking  and  minority  communities; 
people with disabilities; low-income individuals; and people living in rural and tribal 
areas. 

On  August  18,  2008,  Chairman  Kevin  Martin  announced  a  new  initiative  to  in-
crease  awareness  about  the  upcoming  transition  to  digital  television  in  target  tele-
vision markets, including all those markets in which more than 100,000 households 
(or at least 15 percent of the households) rely solely on over-the-air signals for tele-
vision.  The  five  FCC  Commissioners  and  other  Commission  staff  will  fan  out  to 
these  and  other  markets  to  raise  awareness  and  educate  consumers  in  the  days 
leading  up  to  the  digital  television  transition  on  February  17,  2009.  At  each  stop, 
there  will  be  a  public  event,  such  as  a  town  hall  meeting,  workshop,  or  roundtable 
with an FCC Commissioner, to highlight the digital transition. In coordination with 
these  visits,  the  FCC  will  work  with  local  broadcasters  and  radio  stations  to  in-
crease  the  broadcasts  of  Radio  and  TV  DTV  Public  Service  Announcements.  Par-
ticular  emphasis  is  being  placed  on  those  groups  that  are  most  vulnerable  in  the 
transition:  Seniors,  People  Living  in  Tribal  and  Rural  Areas,  People  with  Disabil-
ities, Individuals with Low-Incomes, Minorities and Non-English Speakers. 

Additionally, the FCC launched a ‘‘Speakers Bureau’’ to provide groups and orga-
nizations  throughout  the  country  a  convenient  way  to  request  speakers  to  discuss 
the  upcoming  transition  to  Digital  Television  (DTV)  at  their  meetings  and  events. 
The  Speakers  Bureau  is  the  latest  addition  to  the  FCC’s  DTV  outreach  effort.  The 
Commission  will  provide  speakers,  without  cost,  to  any  group  requesting  one.  To 
date,  we  have  received  over  40  requests  for  speakers.  The  requests  are  being  han-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

14 

dled  by  staff  traveling  for  conferences  and  events,  as  part  of  the  outreach  for  our 
town hall meetings, and by our field agents. 

Taking  all  of  these  new  initiatives  and  the  existing  outreach  effort  into  account, 
for  September  and  October,  there  are  90  Awareness  Sessions  planned,  with  FCC 
staff attending 30 Conferences, Events or Meetings. Additionally, FCC Field Offices 
have  145  presentations  scheduled  in  the  days  ahead.  Please  see  Attachment  B  for 
detailed  information  on  the  public  education  efforts  of  the  Commission  on  a  state- 
by-state basis. 
The Early Transition in Wilmington, North Carolina 

The  stations  in  Wilmington,  North  Carolina  transitioned  to  digital  on  September 
8,  2008.  Over  the  last  month,  Commission  staff  continued  to  focus  on  at  risk  con-
stituencies  and  key  messaging  in  Wilmington.  Additional  events  during  this  time 
period  included  presentations  at  rotary  clubs,  pantries,  meals  on  wheels  facilities, 
fire  departments  and  an  exhibit  at  a  Wilmington  Sharks  game.  The  Commission’s 
outreach  efforts  also  focused  on  continuing  efforts  to  help  at  risk  constituencies 
order  and  install  the  digital  to  analog  converter  box.  Outreach  highlights  include 
numerous  converter  box  coupon  sign  up  events  at  libraries,  churches  and  social 
services  agencies.  The  FCC  sponsored  a  town  hall  event  focused  on  educating  con-
sumers  about  closed  captioning  in  the  digital  television  era.  Also  during  August, 
broadcasters conducted two ‘‘soft tests’’ to assess consumer awareness. 

Attachment  C  provides  an  overview  and  analysis  of  the  consumer  calls  received 
through the first 5 days of the transition. Additional information on the Wilmington 
transition will be provided in next month’s report. 

Below is a summary of activities taken in Wilmington during the early transition 

period. Additional detail regarding the outreach is listed in Attachment D. 

Wilmington, North Carolina Outreach Summary 

Visits 

Awareness Sessions 

Conferences, Events, & Meetings 

Media Interviews 

Partnerships 

FCC Consumer Advisories 

August 

Total 

88 

90 

1 

12 

0 

427 

343 

75 

24 

102 

Commission staff are continually updating and creating new Consumer Advisories 
as  we  become  aware  of  new  issues  and  questions  from  the  public.  Recently,  based 
on questions and comments from consumers, the Commission prepared a Consumer 
Advisory on select features in 41 digital-to-analog converter boxes purchased by the 
Commission.  The  features  described  in  the  advisory  include  features  of  particular 
interest  to  the  disabilities  community,  as  recommended  by  the  Commission’s  Con-
sumer  Advisory  Committee.  All  of  the  boxes  listed  in  the  advisory  are  certified 
under NTIA’s converter box coupon program and, therefore, are eligible for purchase 
using a free converter box coupon issued by NTIA. The advisory will be updated as 
more  NTIA-approved  converter  boxes  become  available  at  retail  stores  and  online. 
A  copy  of  the  Converter  Box  Features  Consumer  Advisory  is  included  in 
Attachment E. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

15 

APPENDIX B 

APPENDIX C 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

4
T
R
A
M
3
2
9

.

s
p
e
3
T
R
A
M
3
2
9

16 

APPENDIX D 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

6
T
R
A
M
3
2
9

.

s
p
e
5
T
R
A
M
3
2
9

17 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

8
T
R
A
M
3
2
9

.

s
p
e
7
T
R
A
M
3
2
9

18 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

0
1
T
R
A
M
3
2
9

.

s
p
e
9
T
R
A
M
3
2
9

19 

Wilmington, NC DTV Transition 

Overview of DTV Calls 

Wilmington, NC Transition Calls by Week 

Overview/Analysis of Wilmington Transition Test DTV Calls (adjusted) 

Category 

Week 

1 

Week 

2 

Total 

CONSUMERS WHO WERE NOT AWARE OF THE TRANSITION 

They were not aware of the switch to DTV 
They were unaware of the correct transition date 
They did not think the stations they watch would switch to digital 

Subtotal: 

CONSUMERS WHO WERE AWARE BUT DID NOT ACT 

They forgot to upgrade 
They were unable to attain assistance to upgrade 
They relied on another member of their household to upgrade 
They waited too long to buy or set up a digital set or a converter box 
They were out of town or too busy or knew they could do it later 

23 
26 
42 

91 

56 
11 
7 
70 
19 

4 
1 
4 

9 

5 
0 
4 
9 
5 

27 
27 
46 

100 

61 
11 
11 
79 
24 

Subtotal: 

163 

23 

186 

CONSUMERS WHO HAD PROBLEMS WITH THE CONVERTER BOX COUPON PROGRAM 

A coupon did not arrive in time 
Wanted coupon or had not received coupon from NTIA 
The retail store was out of boxes 

Subtotal: 

64 
119 
2 

185 

10 
44 
0 

54 

CONSUMERS WHO HAD INITIAL DIFFICULTY WITH THEIR CONVERTER BOXES 

Setting up converter boxes was too hard 
They didn’t understand the instructions for the digital set or the converter box 
Their converter box ‘‘didn’t work’’ 

Subtotal: 

57 
66 
178 

301* 

CONSUMERS WHO HAD RECEPTION AND TECHNICAL PROBLEMS 

Their antenna didn’t work or they have no antenna or their antenna wasn’t con-

nected 

Problem with channel or call sign 
Weak or spotty signal 

Subtotal: 

114 
157 
136 

407 

14 
5 
21 

40 

39 
62 
41 

142 

CONSUMERS COMPLAINING ABOUT NOT RECEIVING WILMINGTON SIGNALS 

Problem with channel 6/44 

Subtotal: 

581 

581** 

154 

154 

OTHER PROBLEMS 

Satellite  subscribers  to  Dish  Network  or  Direct  TV—did  not  subscribe  to  local 

74 
163 
2 

239 

71 
71 
199 

341 

153 
219 
177 

549 

735 

735 

71 
25 
13 
13 

122 

They thought all their sets were hooked up to cable or satellite 
They were waiting for cable or satellite installation 
Wanted DTV consumer information sent to them 

package 

Subtotal: 

Total 

53 
22 
13 
12 

100 

1,828 

18 
3 
0 
1 

22 

444 

2,272 

* This number reflects the reduction of 28 calls previously reported as converter box problems that were subse-

quently determined to be channel 6/44 reception issues. 

quently determined to be channel 6/44 reception issues. 

** This number reflects an increase of 28 calls previously reported as converter box problems that were subse-

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
Our next witness is the Acting Assistant Secretary of Commerce 
for  Communications  and  Information,  National  Telecommuni-
cations  Information  Administration,  Meredith  Attwell  Baker.  Sec-
retary Baker? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

20 

STATEMENT  OF  MEREDITH  ATTWELL  BAKER,  ACTING 
ASSISTANT  SECRETARY  FOR  COMMUNICATIONS  AND 
INFORMATION, NTIA, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE 
Ms.  BAKER.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Good  afternoon.  And 

thank you for the opportunity to testify today. 

For  more  than  2  years,  NTIA’s  top  priority  has  been  to  educate 
Americans  about  their  options  for  the  DTV  transition  and  to  ad-
minister  an  efficient  and  consumer-friendly  coupon  program.  With 
147  days  to  go,  we  remain  committed  to  doing  all  that  we  can  to 
assist Americans to prepare for this historic evolution in television 
broadcasting technology. 

From  January  1,  when  we  first  launched  the  coupon  program, 
through September 17, the volume of coupon applications has been 
strong: more than 27 million coupons requested from over 14.5 mil-
lion  households.  This  is  equivalent  to  105,000  average  household 
requests  each  day  of  the  260  days  of  the  program.  In  the  last  30 
days,  the  average  household  requests  were  up  to  112,000  per  day. 
The  rate  of  coupon  redemptions  has  likewise  been  strong.  Over 
10  million  coupons  have  been  redeemed  through  September  17,  a 
rate  of  49.3  percent  for  all  coupons  and  55.5  percent  for  coupons 
used by over-the-air-only households. 

The  cooperation  of  the  converter  box  manufacturers  and  the  re-
tailers has greatly contributed to the consumer-friendly objective of 
the program and we really appreciate their partnership. As of Sep-
tember  17,  we  have  certified  158  converter  boxes,  including  83 
boxes  with  an  analog  pass-through  feature,  and  at  least  one, 
Winegard,  that  works  with  a  battery  pack.  The  program  also  now 
includes  more  than  2,300  participating  retailers  with  over  29,400 
outlets in all 50 states and territories. There are now 35 online re-
tailers,  which  includes  the  recently  added  Amazon.com,  and  13 
telephone retailers. 

As  for  NTIA’s  progress,  GAO’s  report  and  testimony  of  Sep-
tember  16,  concluded  that  NTIA  is  effectively  implementing  the 
coupon  program.  GAO  acknowledges  that  this  encompasses  our 
comprehensive  systems  to  process  application  requests,  produce 
and distribute coupons, and process coupons for retailer reimburse-
ment. 

Complementing the GAO finding, consumer satisfaction with the 
program  is  high.  A  recent  survey  by  the  Consumer  Electronics  As-
sociation  found  that  90  percent  of  consumers  who  used  the  coupon 
website  to  request  coupons  rates  the  experience  as  good  or  excel-
lent. 

With  the  goal  of  increasing  coupon  participation  by  over-the-air 
households  and  to  better  target  our  consumer  education  efforts, 
NTIA correlated coupon redemption information with industry data 
to  analyze  each  U.S.  television  market.  Based  on  our  analysis,  we 
estimate that 79 percent of over-the-air households that are poten-
tial  purchasers  of  converter  boxes  have  requested  coupons  as  of 
September  1st.  In  other  words,  coupon  program  participation  by 
over-the-air  households  is  on  track  in  187  out  of  the  Nation’s  210 
television  markets.  NTIA  is  working  very  hard  to  implement  out-
reach  in  the  23  markets  where  participation  rates  are  lower  than 
expected. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

21 

We  believe  that  our  consumer  education  efforts  are  working. 
Based on the Wilmington test pilot of September 8, we learned that 
strong  and  steady  demand  for  coupons  and  boxes  can  stem  a  rush 
at  the  end  of  the  program  in  the  final  days.  We  also  learned  that 
it  is  important  for  consumers  to  act  early  so  that  they  have  ample 
time  to  address  any  technical  issues  that  arise  from  installing  a 
converter box. 

NTIA  has,  thus,  tailored  its  consumer  education  messaging  to 
‘‘apply, buy, and try.’’ Consumers should apply for a box, buy a box, 
and  try  the  box  to  ensure  that  it  works  and  can  troubleshoot  for 
any issues that they may experience. We are also urging consumers 
to  apply,  buy,  and  try  by  the  end  of  this  year,  well  in  advance  of 
the transition date. 

The  success  of  the  Wilmington  test  pilot  shows  that  when  gov-
ernment,  industry  and  nonprofit  groups  coordinate  closely,  the 
whole truly does become greater than the sum of its parts. 

To enhance the Government component, 24 Federal agencies con-
vened at the White House on September 12. It was encouraging to 
hear  how  USDA,  the  VA,  HHS,  and  the  IRS,  among  others  are 
helping  millions  of  vulnerable  Americans  prepare  for  the  digital 
transition. We continue to explore adopting the practices that other 
Federal  agencies  are  using  to  expand  the  reach  to  a  broader  cross 
section of over-the-air households. 

I  want  to  thank  the  Committee  for  the  enactment  of  the  DTV 
Transition  Assistance  Act,  which  will  enhance  our  consumer  edu-
cation efforts. This legislation provided NTIA with the flexibility to 
use surplus funds from the conversion program for lower-power tel-
evision  and  translator  stations  for  DTV-related  public  education 
and technical assistance. 

I  would  like  to  turn  now  briefly  to  how  NTIA  is  responding  to 
a couple of key challenges we have faced in administering the cou-
pon program. This past Friday, on September 19, the Federal Reg-
ister published NTIA’s final rule to enable coupon program partici-
pation by residents of licensed nursing homes, intermediate care fa-
cilities, and assisted living facilities, as well as households that use 
a  post  office  box  for  residential  mail  delivery.  This  rule  will  take 
effect  on  Monday,  October  20.  We  are  pleased  to  be  taking  the 
steps to make this coupon program more inclusive. 

In  the  same  vein,  the  Department  of  Commerce  recently  sub-
mitted  draft  legislation  to  Congress  to  be  able  to  maximize  the 
number  of  coupons  NTIA  can  distribute,  while  not  exceeding  the 
$1.5  billion  in  total  funds  authorized  for  the  coupon  program.  The 
proposed  legislation  provides  NTIA  with  needed  flexibility  to  cover 
any  incremental  increases  in  administrative  costs  associated  with 
distributing coupons through the end of the program, including ex-
pected increased demand as the transition date approaches. 

Assuming  that  consumer  requests  for  coupons  will  increase  as 
the February 17 transition date nears—and we do—NTIA wants to 
be  as  prepared  as  it  possibly  can  to  maximize  consumer  participa-
tion  in  the  coupon  program.  Without  the  flexibility  to  increase  ad-
ministrative  spending,  if  needed,  NTIA  will  be  able  to  distribute 
44.5 million coupons. With the flexibility, NTIA will be able to dis-
tribute about 50.5 million coupons. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

22 

We believe that the draft legislation is a responsible and prudent 
approach  to  address  potential  additional  demand  for  coupons,  and 
I urge its immediate consideration. 

Thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  testify,  and  I  will  be 

happy to answer any questions. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Baker follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MEREDITH ATTWELL BAKER,  ACTING ASSISTANT 
SECRETARY FOR COMMUNICATIONS AND INFORMATION, NTIA, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF 
COMMERCE 
Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to 
testify before you today on behalf of the National Telecommunications and Informa-
tion  Administration  (NTIA)  regarding  the  transition  to  digital  television  (DTV)  and 
NTIA’s  implementation  of  the  TV  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program  (Coupon  Pro-
gram). Educating Americans about their options when full-power television stations 
cease analog broadcasting on February 17, 2009, and administering an efficient and 
consumer friendly Coupon Program have been top priorities for NTIA over the past 
2  years.  NTIA  has  already  served  millions  of  Americans  who  have  requested,  re-
ceived,  and  redeemed  coupons  with  the  purchase  of  a  coupon-eligible  converter  box 
(CECB)  from  among  the  Program’s  participating  retailers,  and  we  are  well  poised 
to assist millions more. With 147 days to go until the DTV switch occurs, the signifi-
cant  progress  NTIA  has  made  in  meeting  the  Coupon  Program’s  objectives  is 
matched  only  by  our  determination  to  ensure  that  as  many  consumers  as  possible 
are aware and prepared for the DTV transition, and that NTIA is able to maximize 
opportunities for households to participate in the Coupon Program. 

My  testimony  today  will  focus  chiefly  on  the  status  of  activities  and  consumer 
education  efforts  of  NTIA’s  Coupon  Program;  the  experience  gained  by  the  Sep-
tember  8,  2008,  DTV  switch  in  Wilmington,  North  Carolina;  and  the  actions  taken 
by,  and  in  process,  at  NTIA  to  maximize  opportunities  for  over-the-air  households 
to participate in the Coupon Program. 
Current Coupon Activities 

As you know, Title III of the Deficit Reduction Act of 2005, known as the ‘‘Digital 
Television  Transition  and  Public  Safety  Act  of  2005’’  (the  Act),  directs  the  Federal 
Communications Commission (FCC) to require full-power television stations to cease 
analog broadcasting on February 17, 2009. The Act directs NTIA to implement and 
administer the Digital-to-Analog Converter Box Coupon for the purpose of assisting 
consumers  who  opt  to  keep  their  existing  analog  TV’s  working  to  view  over-the-air 
broadcasts using a converter box. 

As required by the Act, the Assistant Secretary of Commerce for Communications 
and Information must ensure that requesting households receive a maximum of two 
$40  coupons,  via  U.S.  mail,  each  to  be  applied  toward  the  purchase  of  a  digital-to- 
analog  converter  box.  The  Act  authorizes  NTIA  to  use  up  to  $990  million  to  carry 
out the program, including up to $100 million for expenses incurred for program ad-
ministration,  of  which  $5  million  may  be  used  for  consumer  education.  It  also  au-
thorizes an additional $510 million in funding to be available upon 60 days advance 
notice  to  Congress,  $60  million  of  which  may  be  used  for  program  administration 
expenses. 

Leading  up  to  the  launch  of  the  TV  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program  on  January 
1,  2008,  NTIA  undertook  extensive  preparations  beginning  with  a  comprehensive 
rulemaking proceeding and Request for Proposal (RFP). Through a competitive pro-
curement  process,  NTIA  selected  IBM  to  develop  fully  operational  systems  for  the 
application,  processing,  distribution,  and  redemption  of  coupons;  and  to  certify  re-
tailers  for  participation  in  the  program.  Working  with  the  FCC,  NTIA  established 
a procedure to test and certify coupon-eligible convert boxes (CECBs). The Contract 
with  IBM  has  all  of  the  elements  necessary  for  a  fully  operational  and  well-func-
tioning  program  through  its  conclusion,  including  the  ability  to  scale  the  Program 
as  needed  to  maximize  customer  participation.  Simply  stated,  the  implementation 
of  this  Program  is  without  precedent  and  has  presented  unique  opportunities  and 
challenges  along  with  way.  The  effectiveness  of  our  efforts  in  this  planning  phase, 
I submit, can be measured best by the results of the Program’s implementation. 
Coupons Requests, Issuance, and Redemptions 

Since  January  1,  2008,  the  Coupon  Program  has  received  requests  from 
14,630,166  households  for  27,457,404  coupons  through  September  17,  2008.  This  is 
equivalent to 105,601 average household requests for each of the 267 days the Cou-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

23 

pon Program has been operational. Over the past 30 days, the average daily house-
hold  request  rate  was  slightly  higher,  at  112,360  average  requests,  consistent  with 
a  trend  of  slight  increases  in  requests  rates  experienced  by  the  Program  over  the 
course of the past few months. 

NTIA  began  processing  requests  for  coupons  from  OTA  households  using  contin-
gent  funds  on  August  1,  2008,  while  continuing  to  process  coupon  requests  from 
other  eligible  households  from  recycled  base  funds  that  become  available  when 
unredeemed coupons expire. NTIA received the $510 million in contingent funds on 
June  25,  2008,  subsequent  to  our  April  25,  2008,  notification  to  the  House  Energy 
and  Commerce  Committee  and  the  Senate  Commerce,  Science  and  Transportation 
Committee.  Based  on  the  number  of  redeemed  coupons  and  coupons  that  are  still 
active  and  have  not  reached  the  end  of  their  90-day  expiration,  74  percent  of  the 
$890 million in initial funding has been committed, and 25 percent of the $450 mil-
lion in contingent funding has been committed as of September 17, 2008. 

Applications  for  coupons  have  been  received  primarily  through  the  Coupon  Pro-
gram website at www.DTV2009.gov (56.9 percent), and our toll-free telephone num-
ber, 1–888–DTV–2009 (40.6 percent); a much smaller percentage of coupon applica-
tions (2.5 percent) has been received by fax and by mail. Consumers can expect that 
coupons  will  be  issued  and  mailed  within  10  to  15  business  days  from  the  date  in 
which  a  coupon  application  is  received.  Consumers  are  able  to  check  on  the  status 
of their coupon applications on the Program’s web page (https://www.dtv2009.gov/ 
CheckStatus.aspx). NTIA continues to work closely with our contractor, IBM, to en-
sure  that  coupon  requests  are  processed  in  a  timely  fashion.  We  were  pleased  to 
learn  that  in  a  recent  survey  conducted  by  the  Consumer  Electronics  Association, 
90 percent of consumers who used the website to request coupons rated the experi-
ence  as  ‘‘good’’  or  ‘‘excellent.’’  NTIA  is  in  the  process  of  streamlining  its  phone  sys-
tem  to  facilitate  consumer  coupon  requests  through  its  Interactive  Voice  Response 
(IVR) and to refer consumer questions to appropriate third parties, such as the FCC 
and local television stations. 

In addition to the high volume of applications, the appeal of the Coupon Program 
to  consumers  is  demonstrated  by  the  rate  of  coupon  redemptions.  Through  Sep-
tember  17,  2008,  more  than  10  million  coupons  have  been  redeemed,  an  overall  re-
demption  rate  of  49.3  percent  for  coupons  that  have  reached  the  end  of  the  90-day 
expiration  period.  For  OTA  households,  the  redemption  rate  is  even  higher;  55.5 
percent  of  the  coupons  that  have  reached  the  end  of  the  90-day  expiration  period 
have  been  redeemed.  Since  June  2008,  NTIA  has  posted  online  a  Weekly  Redemp-
tion Report for easy access by retailers, converter box manufacturers, and the public 
that  presents  data  on  overall  weekly  coupon  redemption  rates  and  a  breakdown  of 
coupon  redemption  rates  by  OTA  households.  (https://www.ntiadtv.gov/docs/ 
WeeklyRedemptionsReport.pdf) 

Using  the  estimate  of  the  Consumer  Electronics  Association  that  60  percent  of 
OTA  households  are  potential  purchasers  of  converter  boxes,  and  of  the  Nielsen 
Company that there were 14 million OTA households on January 1, 2008, NTIA has 
estimated that 79 percent of this target audience—TV households who rely on tele-
vision with an antenna and expected to purchase a converter box—have already re-
quested  coupons  as  of  September  1,  2008.  Further,  our  analysis  confirms  that  Cou-
pon  Program  participation  by  OTA  households  is  on  track  in  187  of  the  country’s 
210  Designated  Market  Areas  (DMAs).  Based  on  our  analysis,  NTIA  is  developing 
and  will  implement  specific  outreach  plans  in  the  23  DMAs  where  participation 
rates seem to be lower than average participation rates seem to be lower than aver-
age.  Appendix  A  of  this  testimony  provides  a  listing  of  Coupon  Program  participa-
tion rates of OTA households in each of the Nation’s 210 television markets. 
Coupon-Eligible Converter Boxes and Participating Retailers 

A critical factor in the Coupon Program’s progress has been the voluntary partici-
pation  of  converter  box  manufacturers  and  retailers.  NTIA  is  extremely  gratified 
that we have been able to certify 158 CECBs submitted for testing and certification 
by  manufacturers  through  September  17,  2008.  Each  of  these  converter  boxes  was 
designed  for  the  statutory  purpose  of  enabling  a  consumer  to  view  digital  signals 
on analog television sets. 

NTIA  continues  to  certify  boxes  and  is  expediting  those  that  have  the  capability 
to  pass-through  analog  signals  that  will  continue  to  be  transmitted  by  many  low 
power  television  and  translator  stations  after  February  17,  2009.  As  of  September 
17, 2008, NTIA has certified 83 CECBs with an analog pass-through capability. We 
appreciate  the  responsiveness  of  manufacturers—such  as  RCA,  Craig,  Philco,  Mag-
navox, Memorex, and Zenith, among others—to serve consumers’ needs for this sim-
ple solution to view both digital and analog signals on analog television sets. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

24 

From  the  Nation’s  largest  consumer  electronics  retailers—Best  Buy,  Circuit  City, 
Radio  Shack,  Sears,  Target,  and  Walmart—to  the  hundreds  of  regional  chains  and 
smaller  firms,  we  are  likewise  pleased  that  retailers  have  made  converter  boxes 
widely  available.  Through  September  17,  2008,  2,362  retailers  are  participating  in 
the Coupon Program, with over 29,400 retail outlets nationwide, including locations 
in  all  50  states,  all  DMAs,  as  well  as  Guam,  Puerto  Rico,  and  the  U.S.  Virgin  Is-
lands. Among these are 35 retailers redeeming coupons online, and 13 retailers that 
will  redeem  coupons  by  phone.  We  are  pleased  that  Amazon.com  and  Office  Depot 
are the latest to join the ranks of the Coupon Program’s participating retailers. 

To achieve the status as a ‘‘participating retailer’’ in the Coupon Program, retail-
ers  must  certify  that  their  employees  are  trained,  that  stores  have  an  inventory  of 
converter  boxes,  and  that  their  systems  are  prepared  to  redeem  coupons.  Working 
with  IBM,  NTIA  has  made  employee  training  materials  available  to  participating 
retailers so that they are able to answer consumers’ questions about converter boxes 
and  coupon  use.  To  better  support  the  management  of  CECB  inventory,  NTIA 
makes  available  coupon  request  data  to  retailers  on  a  per  state  basis,  as  well  as 
by  3-digit  and  5-digit  zip  code.  The  cooperation  of  retailers  and  box  manufacturers 
alike have greatly contributed to consumers’ satisfaction with the Coupon Program, 
and NTIA is truly grateful for their partnership. 
Consumer Education 

Educating consumers about the DTV transition and the converter box coupon op-
tion has been an integral part of NTIA’s Coupon Program. Our efforts have focused 
on  raising  awareness  among  households  disproportionately  reliant  on  OTA  broad-
casting for their television services, namely seniors, minorities, the disabled, low-in-
come,  and  rural  households.  NTIA’s  messaging  encourages  these  and  other  OTA 
households  to  know  their  options  and,  if  the  converter  box  is  their  preferred  option 
for  making  the  transition,  to  request  a  coupon  and  purchase  a  converter  box  now 
rather than delay and contend with a possible rush for boxes closer to the transition 
date. Consumers should plan at least 6 weeks in advance to ‘‘apply, buy and try’’— 
that  is,  ‘‘apply’’  for  their  coupons,  ‘‘buy’’  their  preferred  converter  box  and  ‘‘try’’  it 
to  make  sure  they  can  receive  their  favorite  channels—to  be  ready  well  in  advance 
of February 17, 2009. As a practical matter, consumers should request coupons now 
to ensure a smooth transition and begin enjoying digital television service. 

A  recent  national  survey  sponsored  by  the  National  Association  of  Broadcasters 
(NAB) shows that knowledge about the DTV transition is nearly universal. In a tele-
phone  survey  of  21,436  households,  conducted  between  the  end  of  March  and  mid- 
May,  2008,  90  percent  of  respondents  said  they  were  aware  of  the  February  17, 
2009,  DTV  transition,  up  from  83  percent  in  a  January  2008  NAB  survey.  These 
results reflect the success of the nationwide public education campaigns undertaken 
by the broadcasting and cable industries, as well as our own public education efforts 
and  those  of  the  300  Federal,  national,  regional,  and  local  organizations  that  have 
partnered  with  NTIA  to  arm  consumers  with  the  information  they  need  to  be  pre-
pared on February 17, 2009. 
NTIA’s Outreach and Partnerships 

For its part, NTIA participates in meetings, conferences, and other fora on an on-
going  basis,  often  with  one  or  more  of  our  partners  to  educate  audiences  about  the 
DTV transition and the Coupon Program. For example, in recent months, NTIA at-
tended  events  held  by  the  American  Council  on  the  Blind,  the  Community  Action 
Partnership of Chicago, Self-Help for the Elderly of San Francisco, and the General 
Federation of Women’s Clubs. We have jointly hosted and participated in coupon ap-
plication  completion  events  with  organizations  such  as  SeniorSource  in  Dallas/Ft. 
Worth,  Texas;  the  Maryland  Department  of  General  Services  in  Baltimore,  Mary-
land;  JobStarts  in  Englewood,  California;  and  KNME–PBS  in  Albuquerque,  New 
Mexico. 

NTIA’s  consumer  education  efforts  do  not  begin  and  end  with  Coupon  Program 
staff.  Rather,  my  staff  and  I,  along  with  others  in  the  Department  of  Commerce 
have participated in numerous events, including town hall meetings convened in the 
districts  of  Members  of  Congress,  such  as  Senator  Ted  Stevens  of  Alaska,  Senator 
Gordon Smith of Oregon, Senator Mike Crapo of Idaho, Representative John Dingell 
of  Michigan,  and  Rep.  John  Shimkus  of  Illinois.  As  you  know,  Commerce  Secretary 
Carlos  Gutierrez  has  likewise  been  extremely  active  in  helping  educate  Americans 
about the DTV transition and the Coupon Program. He continues to conduct media 
interviews  in  both  Spanish  and  English,  and  speaks  to  audiences  throughout  the 
country  to  help  raise  public  awareness.  Most  recently,  Secretary  Gutierrez  partici-
pated  in  a  public  education  event  held  at  a  Circuit  City  retail  store  in  Atlanta,  ac-
companied by Georgia Governor Sonny Perdue. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

25 

As  I  noted  earlier,  NTIA  analyzed  Coupon  Program  participation  by  DMA,  ena-
bling us to better target consumer education efforts and reach out to media in mar-
kets  with  high  rates  of  OTA  households  and/or  key  demographic  populations.  For 
example,  in  July  and  August  2008,  NTIA  staff  conducted  117  media  interviews,  in-
cluding  outlets  such  as  The  Maui  News  (Honolulu,  HI),  Eureka  Reporter  (Eureka, 
CA),  KBBIAM/KDLL–FM  (Anchorage,  AK),  Star  News  (Wilmington,  NC),  AARP 
Bulletin  (seniors),  Sister  2  Sister  (African  American  magazine),  KOVR–TV  (Sac-
ramento, CA), KBOW–AM (Butte-Bozeman, MT), and Alaska Public Radio. 

Working with the communications firm, Ketchum, NTIA continues to track media 
impressions  regarding  the  DTV  transition  and  the  Coupon  Program.  The  following 
chart  shows  the  cumulative  number  of  print  circulation,  online  unique  visits,  and 
broadcast impressions from September 10, 2007, through August 31, 2008. 

TV Converter Box Coupon Program: Cumulative Media Impressions 

September 10, 2007–August 31, 2008 

Period 

As of January 31, 2008 
As of February 29, 2008 

As of March 31, 2008 
As of April 30, 2008 
As of May 31, 2008 
As of June 30, 2008 
As of July 31, 2008 

As of August 31, 2008 

Print 

Circulation 

55,287,903 
86,704,470 
101,948,865 
133,133,069 
149,212,817 
162,552,550 
183,117,820 
197,260,220 

Online 
Unique 
Visits 

790,968,896 
1,461,800,861 
1,831,462,304 
2,475,646,251 
2,738,704,788 
2,951,814,191 
3,097,501,422 
3,285,822,971 

Broadcast 
Impressions 

61,930,084 
77,976,320 
97,279,716 
133,325,921 
176,597,506 
242,916,367 
292,567,681 
332,884,358 

NTIA is now working with over 24 Federal departments and agencies with direct 
communications to vulnerable populations to expand the reach of our consumer edu-
cation  efforts.  On  September  12,  2008,  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget,  the 
Office of Science and Technology Policy, NTIA, and the FCC, spearheaded an inter-
agency  Federal  DTV  Awareness  meeting  to  discuss  strategies  to  better  coordinate 
activities  across  Executive  branch  agencies  to  enhance  consumer  education  and  as-
sistance to our target populations. It was very encouraging to hear how the Depart-
ment of Agriculture, the Department of Veterans Affairs, the Department of Health 
and  Human  Services,  and  the  Internal  Revenue  Service,  among  others,  are  helping 
millions  of  vulnerable  Americans  prepare  for  the  digital  transition.  We  continue  to 
explore  how  these  good  practices  can  be  applied  to  other  Federal  agencies  to  reach 
a broader cross-section of Americans who rely on over-the-air television. 
Statutory Flexibility to Expand Consumer Education 

NTIA appreciates the flexibility provided by the ‘‘DTV Transition Assistance Act’’ 
(Pub.  L.  110–295)  (Assistance  Act),  signed  into  law  by  President  Bush  on  July  30, 
2008,  which  will  provide  an  additional  mechanism  to  expand  our  public  education 
efforts. As you know, there are two key provisions of the Assistance Act: (1) enabling 
NTIA to more immediately begin providing grant support for the digital upgrade of 
low  power  television  and  translator  stations;  and  (2)  authorizing  NTIA  to  utilize 
surplus  funds  in  the  Low  Power  Television  and  Translator  Station  Conversion  Pro-
gram  (providing  grant  support  to  low  power  television  and  translator  stations  for 
the  purchase  a  digital-toanalog  conversion  device)  for  purposes  of  consumer  edu-
cation  and  technical  assistance  related  to  the  DTV  transition  and  the  Coupon  Pro-
gram. 

Pursuant  to  the  Assistance  Act,  NTIA  issued  a  notice  on  August  28,  2008,  con-
firming  a  determination  that  only  $3.5  million  of  the  full  funding  amount  for  the 
Conversion  Program  ($8  million)  would  be  necessary.  This  allows  for  $4.5  million 
of  these  funds  to  become  available  for  consumer  education  and  technical  assistance 
related  to  the  DTV  transition  and  the  Coupon  Program.  This  determination  was 
based on the number of potential eligible Conversion Program applicants, the num-
ber  of  grant  applications  received  through  July  31,  2008,  and  the  number  of  facili-
ties  receiving  authorization  from  the  FCC  to  upgrade  to  digital  transmission  via 
flash-cut. 

We  have  already  received  expressions  of  interest,  and  encourage  the  submission 
of  other  proposals,  to  provide  consumer  education  and  technical  assistance  as  pro-
vided  for  in  the  Assistance  Act.  NTIA  will  act  as  expeditiously  as  possible  to  for-
malize agreements for these purposes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

Wilmington DTV Transition Test Pilot 

26 

Leveraging  the  awareness-building  activities  of  the  variety  of  partners  that  par-
ticipated in the Wilmington DTV transition test pilot on September 8, 2008, not only 
contributed to Wilmington’s success, but it also demonstrates early preparation and 
mobilizing of existing assets by communities can help ensure that their citizens ex-
perience  a  smooth  transition  to  digital  television.  I  commend  the  people  of  Wil-
mington  and  the  many  Wilmington  area  volunteers  and  community  leaders,  tele-
vision  broadcasters,  and  participating  retailers,  as  well  as  the  FCC,  and  all  other 
involved  stakeholders  for  their  efforts  to  ensure  that  Wilmington  households  were 
prepared and that the test pilot was a success. 

Among  the  steps  taken  in  Wilmington  contributing  to  this  success,  broadcasters 
were nimble in modifying their messaging to increase awareness of the early transi-
tion  date  and  reduce  confusion  among  Wilmington  consumers  about  their  need  to 
act  early.  The  minute-long  test  run  by  Wilmington  broadcasters  in  advance  of  the 
September  8  switch  also  proved  to  be  a  useful  way  to  help  consumers  pinpoint 
whether they really needed a converter box. The consumer electronics industry and 
box  manufacturers  also  stepped  up  to  support  this  effort  to  make  converter  boxes 
widely available in stores to meet high demand. I especially appreciate their willing-
ness  to  donate  boxes  to  nursing  homes  and  troubleshooting  advice  for  consumers. 
Local  firefighters  and  community  groups  provided  helpful  technical  assistance  to 
households, including converter box installation for the more vulnerable among Wil-
mington’s citizens. 

The  Wilmington  test  pilot  was  an  important  opportunity  for  NTIA  to  gauge  con-
sumer  awareness  and  participation  in  the  Coupon  Program.  Through  September  7, 
NTIA received requests for more than 69,000 coupons from 37,500 households in the 
Wilmington  DMA,  47  percent  of  which  were  from  OTA  households.  Of  the  coupons 
issued and mailed, over 28,000 were redeemed as of September 7. We were pleased 
with the strong response for coupons from Wilmington households; requests for cou-
pons  increased  300  percent  since  the  May  8,  2008,  FCC  announcement  of  the  test 
pilot.  Strong  and  steady  demand  for  coupons  and  boxes  over  the  past  4  months 
stemmed a rush in the final days leading up to the September 8 switch. 

The  primary  lesson  NTIA  gained  from  Wilmington  is  that  we  must  emphasize  to 
an  even  greater  extent  the  need  for  consumers  that  rely  on  OTA  broadcasts  for 
viewing  on  analog  television  sets  to  apply  for  a  coupon  and  purchase  a  converter 
box well in advance of the transition date. It is essential that consumers are aware 
that it will take several weeks to make adequate preparations—to apply for and re-
ceive  a  coupon,  and  to  purchase  and  install  a  converter  box—to  ensure  that  all  of 
the  analog  televisions  in  their  household  are  prepared  when  the  transition  occurs. 
Responding to Coupon Program Challenges 
Rulemaking on Nursing Home and Post Office Box Program Eligibility 

The  final  rule  on  participation  of  Coupon  Program  applicants  living  in  licensed 
nursing homes, intermediate care facilities, and assisted living facilities, and house-
holds  that  use  a  post  office  box  for  residential  mail  delivery  was  published  in  the 
Federal  Register  on  September  19,  2008.  The  final  rule  will  take  effect  on  October 
20, 2008. 

Under the waiver provisions of the new regulations, residents of licensed nursing 
homes, intermediate care facilities, and assisted living facilities are required to pro-
vide their name and the address of the facility, and whether they receive television 
exclusively with an antenna, or through cable, satellite or other pay television serv-
ice.  The  nursing  home  resident,  a  family  member,  or  a  representative  from  the  li-
censed  facility  may  apply  for  one  coupon  for  the  resident,  and  the  coupon  will  be 
mailed  directly  to  the  nursing  home  resident.  A  special  application  will  be  made 
available for nursing home residents to complete once the rule becomes effective. 

Also,  applicants  who  utilize  a  post  office  box  for  residential  mail  delivery  will  be 
able  to  request  two  coupons  through  the  normal  application  process  after  the  rule 
change  goes  into  effect.  Applicants  will  be  required  to  provide  the  address  of  their 
physical  residence  in  addition  to  their  post  office  box  address.  NTIA  is  pleased  to 
take this step in making the Coupon Program more inclusive. 
Coupon Reissuance 

NTIA has been extremely sensitive to concerns, questions, and requests made for 
the reissuance of coupons to households that did not, or were unable to, redeem pre-
viously requested coupons prior to their expiration date. However, we do not believe 
the  Act  sets  out  clear  authority  for  NTIA  to  issue  any  additional  coupons  to  house-
holds  that  have  already  requested  and  received  coupons,  even  if  the  coupons  were 
not redeemed in advance of their expiration. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

27 

We  also  do  not  believe  that  making  such  a  change  to  the  Program  at  this  time 
is  advisable.  The  reissuance  of  coupons  would  necessitate,  we  believe,  the  under-
taking  and  completion  of  numerous  additional  actions.  The  added—and  potentially 
substantial—costs  and  delays  that  would  accompany  each  of  these  actions  could 
jeopardize  the  Program’s  ability  to  achieve  its  core  mission  of  facilitating  a  smooth 
DTV transition. 

For  example,  such  a  change  would  require  a  rulemaking  proceeding,  similar  to 
NTIA’s  pending  proposed  rule  amending  the  eligibility  of  individuals  residing  in 
nursing  homes  as  discussed  above.  Such  a  rulemaking,  even  if  conducted  on  an  ex-
pedited basis, would not likely be completed before early 2009. A change would also 
impact  NTIA’s  current  contract  with  IBM  to  administer  the  Coupon  Program,  re-
quiring revision in the operational systems and procedures of the Program. Likewise 
changes would be needed to materials currently utilized in Program administration 
(e.g.,  online,  phone  and  paper  application  forms  and  processes)  and  consumer  edu-
cation. 

Moreover,  such  a  change  could  seriously  compromise  NTIA’s  emphasis  on  the 
need  for  prompt  action  by  consumers  to  apply  for  and  redeem  their  coupons,  and 
could  cause  a  last-minute  rush  on—and  potential  product  shortages  of—converter 
boxes  in  the  latest  stages  of  the  DTV  transition.  Finally,  it  would  be  unfair  to  con-
sumers  who  redeemed  coupons  in  a  timely  manner,  consistent  with  the  statutory 
90-day  expiration  deadline  requirement  and  existing  Coupon  Program  regulations. 
Maximizing Coupon Distribution 

As  you  know,  the  Act  authorizes  a  total  of  $1.34  billion  for  the  Coupon  Program 
from  both  the  base  ($890  million)  and  contingent  ($450  million)  funding  levels,  an 
amount  sufficient  to  cover  the  value  of  up  to  33.5  million  redeemed  coupons.  The 
remaining $160 million from both base and contingent funding is authorized for ad-
ministrative  expenses  which  includes,  but  is  not  limited  to,  those  costs  associated 
with the distribution and processing (i.e., not the underlying value) of each coupon. 
As  noted  earlier,  the  Coupon  Program  received  over  105,000  average  daily  re-
quests  from  households  for  coupons,  and  the  overall  coupon  redemption  rate  cur-
rently  stands  at  just  under  50  percent.  Assuming  that  consumer  requests  for  cou-
pons will increase as the February 17, 2009, transition date nears, and that the re-
demption  rate  remains  constant,  NTIA  could  distribute  more  than  50  million  cou-
pons  in  total  over  the  life  of  the  Program.  Without  legislation  providing  NTIA  with 
greater  flexibility,  NTIA  will  be  unable  to  fully  meet  this  consumer  demand  and 
costs associated with expected changes to the Program. 

On  September  11,  2008,  the  Department  of  Commerce  submitted  to  Congress 
draft  legislation  that  would  provide  NTIA  with  the  statutory  flexibility,  if  needed, 
to  use  available  balances  in  certain  Digital  Television  and  Public  Safety  programs 
to cover administrative expenses of the Coupon Program above the authorized $160 
million. The proposal would enable NTIA to continue coupon distribution to request-
ing eligible American households in the event that coupon demand exceeds the level 
of administrative resources presently authorized for the Coupon Program while still 
ensuring that overall program costs do not exceed $1.5 billion as established in the 
Act. Under the draft legislation, $7 million would be available upon enactment and 
additional  funds  as  needed  would  be  available  upon  approval  of  the  Office  of  Man-
agement  and  Budget  (OMB)  Director  and  upon  15-day  notice  to  the  House  Com-
mittee on Energy and Commerce and the Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, 
and Transportation. 
Waste, Fraud, and Abuse 

NTIA  remains  vigilant  in  monitoring  operations  for  waste,  fraud,  and  abuse 
across all components of the Coupon Program. The agency meets regularly with the 
Department of Commerce Inspector General, the Government Accountability Office, 
and  Department  of  Commerce  auditors  to  monitor  all  aspects  of  the  Coupon  Pro-
gram,  from  household  requests  for  coupons  to  retailer  payment  for  coupon  redemp-
tions. 

Working  with  IBM,  NTIA  has  developed  a  comprehensive  and  rigorous  approach 
to  deterring  and  detecting  waste,  fraud  and  abuse  in  the  Program.  In  terms  of  re-
tailer certification, participation and payment, NTIA has protections in place to min-
imize opportunities for inappropriate retailer behavior. 

To  date,  no  egregious  instances  of  waste,  fraud,  and  abuse  have  been  discovered 
in the Coupon Program. However, several retailers have been decertified for a vari-
ety  of  violations  of  program  rules.  In  these  cases,  NTIA  has  also  taken  swift  action 
to  the  extent  possible  to  ensure  that  retailers  remedy  any  adverse  effects  suffered 
by  consumers.  While  the  number  of  decertified  retailers  is  a  very  small  percentage 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

28 

of  the  total  number  of  certified  retailers,  NTIA  remains  committed  to  taking  swift 
action to avoid any and all waste, fraud, and abuse in the Program. 

We are also ensuring that no more than two coupons are sent to each U.S. house-
hold,  as  specified  in  the  Act,  and  that  consumers  are  unable  to  use  the  $40  coupon 
to  purchase  ineligible  products.  To  protect  consumers  we  have  just  issued  a  ‘‘con-
sumer checklist,’’ helping them navigate the Coupon Program. We have also worked 
with  the  Federal  Trade  Commission  and  the  FCC  on  a  tip-sheet  to  arm  consumers 
with the information they need to make decisions right for their household. 
Preparedness for a Surge 

NTIA is aware of the potential for a surge in coupon applications as the February 
17,  2009,  transition  date  draws  closer.  Although  the  coupon  application  rate  has 
spiked  only  rarely  over  the  past  eight  and  one-half  months,  we  recognize  that  con-
sumer  education  will  intensify  in  the  coming  months  and  that  coupon  applications 
could  reach  more  consistently  high  levels  than  has  been  our  experience  to  date. 
NTIA has designed and administered the Coupon Program in a manner that strives 
to assure that no Americans lose their television service as a result of the DTV tran-
sition.  This  commitment  underlies  the  Program  regulations,  as  well  as  NTIA’s  pro-
posal  to  expand  coupon  eligibility  to  residents  of  nursing  homes  and  citizens  that 
utilize  a  post  office  box,  and  the  draft  legislation  to  maximize  household  participa-
tion in the Coupon Program. 

Again, this underscores the emphasis of the Coupon Program’s key consumer edu-
cation messaging that consumers should act now to apply for coupons and to redeem 
them  at  a  participating  retailer  as  soon  as  possible  after  their  receipt.  As  noted 
above,  our  experience  in  Wilmington  confirms  that  encouraging  people  to  act  now 
will help avoid lengthy periods of extremely high volumes of coupon requests as the 
Program draws to an end. 

In conclusion, I want to thank the Committee for the opportunity to testify before 

you today. I will be happy to answer your questions. 

APPENDIX A: OVER-THE-AIR HOUSEHOLD PARTICIPATION RATES IN COUPON PROGRAM 

BY DESIGNATED MARKET AREA (DMA) AS OF SEPT. 1, 2008 

Over-the-Air Household Participation Rates in Coupon Program 

by Designated Market Area (DMA) as of Sept. 1, 2008 

Number of 
Over-the-Air 

Households with 

Approved 
Requests 

JUNEAU, AK 
GLENDIVE, MT 
ANCHORAGE, AK 
EUREKA, CA 
HONOLULU, HI 
FAIRBANKS, AK 
SEATTLE TACOMA, WA 
BUTTE BOZEMAN, MT 
HELENA, MT 
MISSOULA, MT 
BILLINGS, MT 
GRAND JUNCTION MONTROSE, CO 
GREAT FALLS, MT 
ODESSA MIDLAND, TX 
SAN DIEGO, CA 
BURLINGTON PLATTSBURGH, VT—NY 
MANKATO, MN 
MONROE ELDORADO, LA—AR 
SPOKANE, WA 
SANTA BARBARA SANTA MARIA SAN LUIS OBISPO, CA 
SALT LAKE CITY, UT 
LAS VEGAS, NV 
IDAHO FALLS POCATELLO, ID 
LAFAYETTE, IN 
SACRAMENTO STOCKTON MODESTO, CA 
CASPER RIVERTON, WY 
MONTEREY SALINAS, CA 
CHARLOTTESVILLE, VA 
YAKIMA PASCO RICHLAND KENNEWICK, WA 
TWIN FALLS, ID 
HARTFORD NEW HAVEN, CT 

218 
61 
6,441 
2,023 
5,381 
2,903 
53,923 
3,123 
1,466 
5,631 
4,913 
3,183 
2,888 
3,783 
28,207 
13,102 
2,108 
7,625 
21,362 
5,424 
68,522 
25,382 
7,931 
2,455 
64,735 
2,064 
9,541 
4,085 
13,657 
3,642 
21,384 

Over-the-Air 
Household 
Participation 

Rate * 

13% 
30% 
38% 
38% 
39% 
40% 
43% 
44% 
45% 
46% 
48% 
51% 
51% 
52% 
52% 
53% 
54% 
54% 
55% 
56% 
56% 
56% 
57% 
58% 
58% 
58% 
58% 
58% 
59% 
59% 
60% 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

29 

Over-the-Air Household Participation Rates in Coupon Program 

by Designated Market Area (DMA) as of Sept. 1, 2008—Continued 

Number of 
Over-the-Air 

Households with 

Approved 
Requests 

COLORADO SPRINGS PUEBLO, CO 
SAN ANGELO, TX 
AMARILLO, TX 
BATON ROUGE, LA 
SPRINGFIELD HOLYOKE, MA 
CHICO REDDING, CA 
TOPEKA, KS 
YUMA EL CENTRO, CA 
DENVER, CO 
BOISE, ID 
JOPLIN PITTSBURGH, MO—KS 
MEDFORD KLAMATH FALLS, OR 
ALBUQUERQUE SANTA FE, NM 
TUCSON SIERRA VISTA, AZ 
MINOT BISMARCK DICKINSON, ND 
ELMIRA, NY 
BALTIMORE, MD 
SHREVEPORT, LA 
PHOENIX, AZ 
ABILENE SWEETWATER, TX 
CHAMPAIGN SPRINGFIELD DECATUR, IL 
INDIANAPOLIS, IN 
FARGO VALLEY CITY, ND 
TALLAHASSEE THOMASVILLE, FL 
ST. JOSEPH, MO 
DALLAS FT. WORTH, TX 
BAKERSFIELD, CA 
WICHITA FALLS LAWTON, TX—OK 
SYRACUSE, NY 
NASHVILLE, TN 
MINNEAPOLIS ST. PAUL, MN 
PORTLAND AUBURN, ME 
WICHITA HUTCHINSON, KS 
WASHINGTON, DC 
ROCHESTER, NY 
PROVIDENCE NEW BEDFORD, RI—MA 
LOS ANGELES, CA 
RAPID CITY, SD 
MEMPHIS, TN 
HARRISONBURG, VA 
ROCKFORD, IL 
CHEYENNE SCOTTSBLUFF, WY—NE 
CLEVELAND AKRON CANTON, OH 
PEORIA BLOOMINGTON, IL 
BEND, OR 
TYLER LONGVIEW LUFKIN NACOGDOCHES, TX 
JOHNSTOWN ALTOONA, PA 
CORPUS CHRISTI, TX 
BLUEFIELD BECKLEY OAK HILL, WV 
HOUSTON, TX 
LUBBOCK, TX 
LITTLE ROCK PINE BLUFF, AR 
CINCINNATI, OH 
PADUCAH CAPE GIRARDEAU MARION CARBONDALE 
MCLEANSBORO POPULAR BLUFF MT. VERNON, KY—MO—IL 
ALPENA, MI 
HARLINGEN MCALLEN BROWNSVILLE, TX 
SIOUX FALLS MITCHELL, SD 
TOLEDO, OH 
PORTLAND, OR 
SAVANNAH, GA 
YOUNGSTOWN, OH 
LINCOLN HASTINGS KEARNY, NE 
EUGENE, OR 
MARQUETTE, MI 
NORTH PLATTE, NE 
ATLANTA, GA 
WACO TEMPLE BRYAN, TX 

21,197 
1,144 
8,551 
9,145 
8,085 
12,646 
8,164 
9,668 
75,299 
27,165 
13,192 
7,018 
45,363 
27,342 
6,465 
2,779 
58,822 
17,782 
96,688 
5,081 
16,681 
68,555 
12,488 
9,747 
2,619 
210,358 
14,345 
7,278 
18,063 
46,413 
159,383 
21,994 
24,347 
82,489 
27,466 
25,012 
412,401 
4,222 
39,403 
3,667 
10,524 
2,211 
87,590 
13,955 
4,275 
13,631 
7,971 
9,594 
3,997 
200,611 
14,143 
29,502 
73,066 

24,139 
939 
55,083 
13,406 
34,668 
97,950 
10,489 
17,297 
16,233 
17,439 
3,659 
780 
80,154 
18,389 

Over-the-Air 
Household 
Participation 

Rate * 

60% 
60% 
61% 
61% 
61% 
62% 
62% 
62% 
63% 
63% 
63% 
63% 
63% 
64% 
64% 
65% 
65% 
65% 
65% 
65% 
65% 
66% 
66% 
67% 
68% 
68% 
68% 
68% 
68% 
68% 
69% 
69% 
69% 
70% 
70% 
70% 
70% 
70% 
71% 
71% 
71% 
72% 
72% 
72% 
73% 
73% 
73% 
73% 
74% 
74% 
74% 
74% 
74% 

75% 
75% 
76% 
77% 
77% 
77% 
77% 
78% 
78% 
78% 
78% 
79% 
79% 
79% 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

30 

Over-the-Air Household Participation Rates in Coupon Program 

by Designated Market Area (DMA) as of Sept. 1, 2008—Continued 

Number of 
Over-the-Air 

Households with 

Approved 
Requests 

MADISON, WI 
AUSTIN, TX 
RENO, NV 
ALBANY SCHENECTADY TROY, NY 
LA CROSSE EAU CLAIRE, WI 
SAN FRANCISCO OAKLAND SAN JOSE, CA 
BIRMINGHAM ANNISTON TUSCALOOSA, AL 
COLUMBUS, OH 
GREENVILLE NEW BERN WASHINGTON, NC 
FRESNO VISALIA, CA 
JACKSONVILLE BRUNSWICK, FL—GA 
EVANSVILLE, IN 
COLUMBIA JEFFERSON CITY, MO 
KANSAS CITY, KS—MO 
ROANOKE LYNCHBURG, VA 
NORFOLK PORTSMOUTH NEWPORT NEWS, VA 
JACKSON, MS 
LEXINGTON, KY 
ALBANY, GA 
ST. LOUIS, MO 
SIOUX CITY, IA 
BEAUMONT PORT ARTHUR, TX 
HUNTSVILLE DECATUR FLORENCE, AL 
TULSA, OK 
GRAND RAPIDS KALAMAZOO BATTLE CREEK, MI 
OTTUMWA KIRKSVILLE, IA—MO 
TAMPA ST. PETERSBURG SARASOTA, FL 
MILWAUKEE, WI 
COLUMBUS TUPELO WEST POINT, MS 
DAYTON, OH 
CHARLESTON, SC 
ERIE, PA 
DAVENPORT ROCK ISLAND MOLINE, IA—IL 
KNOXVILLE, TN 
LANSING, MI 
DES MOINES AMES, IA 
BANGOR, ME 
LOUISVILLE, KY 
CLARKSBURG WESTON, WV 
MIAMI FT. LAUDERDALE, FL 
COLUMBUS, GA 
WEST PALM BEACH FT. PIERCE, FL 
TERRE HAUTE, IN 
BOSTON MANCHESTER, MA—NH 
ROCHSTER MASON CITY AUSTIN, IA 
SPRINGFIELD, MO 
RALEIGH DURHAM FAYETTEVILLE, NC 
CHARLOTTE, NC 
DULUTH SUPERIOR, MN 
CHICAGO, IL 
PALM SPRINGS, CA 
JACKSON, TN 
BUFFALO, NY 
LAKE CHARLES, LA 
GREENSBORO HIGH POINT WINSTON SALEM, NC 
MACON, GA 
WILKES BARRE SCRANTON, PA 
TRAVERSE CITY CADILLAC, MI 
DETROIT, MI 
CEDAR RAPIDS WATERLOO DUBUQUE, IA 
MERIDIAN, MS 
EL PASO, TX 
BOWLING GREEN, KY 
PANAMA CITY, FL 
GREENVILLE SPARTANBURG ASHVILLE ANDERSON, NC—SC 
HARRISBURG LANCASTER LEBANON YORK, PA 
FT. SMITH FAYETTEVILLE SPRINGDALE, AR+A197 
PITTSBURGH, PA 

34,371 
38,632 
13,292 
24,020 
17,091 
121,651 
30,040 
54,278 
17,718 
60,300 
30,881 
16,695 
14,196 
61,754 
26,907 
31,324 
17,325 
21,316 
5,630 
114,595 
11,985 
8,861 
17,338 
42,588 
63,294 
3,615 
76,147 
93,592 
11,222 
43,697 
17,521 
13,140 
23,055 
29,600 
22,141 
45,064 
13,739 
45,425 
3,365 
66,009 
8,574 
16,230 
10,605 
65,215 
11,255 
47,016 
67,682 
58,139 
20,784 
282,376 
4,275 
4,881 
33,625 
4,791 
40,230 
11,698 
23,047 
22,321 
121,971 
28,865 
5,035 
49,724 
5,078 
8,203 
55,624 
35,543 
16,074 
54,574 

Over-the-Air 
Household 
Participation 

Rate * 

79% 
79% 
79% 
79% 
79% 
79% 
80% 
80% 
80% 
80% 
81% 
81% 
81% 
81% 
81% 
81% 
82% 
82% 
82% 
82% 
82% 
82% 
82% 
82% 
83% 
83% 
83% 
83% 
84% 
84% 
85% 
85% 
85% 
85% 
85% 
86% 
87% 
87% 
87% 
87% 
87% 
88% 
88% 
88% 
89% 
89% 
89% 
89% 
89% 
90% 
90% 
90% 
90% 
91% 
91% 
91% 
92% 
92% 
93% 
94% 
94% 
94% 
94% 
94% 
94% 
94% 
95% 
95% 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

31 

Over-the-Air Household Participation Rates in Coupon Program 

by Designated Market Area (DMA) as of Sept. 1, 2008—Continued 

Number of 
Over-the-Air 

Households with 

Approved 
Requests 

FT. WAYNE, IN 
AUGUSTA, GA 
DOTHAN, AL 
CHATTANOOGA, TN 
SAN ANTONIO, TX 
FLINT SAGINAW BAY CITY, MI 
OKLAHOMA CITY, OK 
GREENWOOD GREENVILLE, MS 
RICHMOND PETERSBURG, VA 
GREEN BAY APPLETON, WI 
PARKERSBURG, WV 
LAFAYETTE, LA 
SHERMAN ADA, TX—OK 
PHILADELPHIA, PA 
NEW YORK, NY 
ALEXANDRIA, LA 
LAREDO, TX 
WHEELING STEUBENVILLE, WV 
MOBILE PENSACOLA, AL—FL 
JONESBORO, AR 
FT. MYERS NAPLES, FL 
UTICA, NY 
ORLANDO DAYTONA BEACH MELBOURNE, FL 
NEW ORLEANS, LA 
BINGHAMTON, NY 
TRI CITIES, VA—TN 
GAINESVILLE, FL 
LIMA, OH 
WATERTOWN, NY 
HATTIESBURG LAUREL, MS 
ZANESVILLE, OH 
OMAHA, NE 
VICTORIA, TX 
SOUTH BEND ELKHART BENTON HARBOR, IN 
MONTGOMERY SELMA, AL 
WAUSAU RHINELANDER, WI 
COLUMBIA, SC 
BILOXI GULFPORT, MS 
MYRTLE BEACH FLORENCE, SC 
CHARLESTON HUNTINGTON, WV 
PRESQUE ISLE, ME 
QUINCY HANNIBAL KEOKUK—MO—IA 
SALISBURY, MD 
WILMINGTON, NC 

36,578 
15,859 
4,327 
20,182 
67,784 
40,319 
62,116 
2,986 
31,768 
58,686 
2,618 
11,598 
10,460 
134,008 
228,786 
3,829 
9,358 
6,701 
30,484 
5,266 
18,194 
5,207 
63,115 
26,098 
6,929 
15,642 
6,828 
3,600 
5,506 
8,169 
1,619 
30,484 
2,073 
50,712 
13,770 
25,094 
36,979 
7,026 
23,155 
24,384 
2,860 
13,360 
8,276 
16,726 

Over-the-Air 
Household 
Participation 

Rate * 

96% 
96% 
97% 
97% 
99% 
99% 
100% 
100% 
100% 
100% 
100% 
101% 
101% 
101% 
101% 
102% 
103% 
103% 
103% 
103% 
107% 
108% 
108% 
108% 
109% 
109% 
109% 
110% 
110% 
110% 
110% 
110% 
111% 
112% 
119% 
121% 
123% 
123% 
132% 
133% 
138% 
148% 
158% 
203% 

* According to the Consumer Electronics Association, about 60% of over-the-air (OTA) consumers are potential 
purchasers of converter boxes. The participation rate is the number of OTA requests divided by CEA’s estimated 
market. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  now  call  upon  the  As-
sistant  Secretary  for  Aging,  Department  of  Health  and  Human 
Services, the Honorable Josefina Carbonell. 
STATEMENT  OF  HON.  JOSEFINA  G.  CARBONELL,  ASSISTANT 
SECRETARY FOR AGING, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND 
HUMAN SERVICES 
Ms. CARBONELL. Good afternoon, Mr. Chairman, Members of the 

Committee. Thank you for the opportunity to testify today. 

I  am  pleased  to  report  that  the  U.S.  Department  of  Health  and 
Human  Services  has  been  working  in  partnership  with  the  FCC 
and NTIA to ensure that the people that we serve receive the infor-
mation  and  assistance  they  need  to  make  the  transition  from  ana-
log to digital broadcast on February 17, 2009. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

32 

Earlier  this  year,  Secretary  Leavitt  established  a  work  group  to 
ensure  that  HHS  is  doing  everything  it  can  to  get  that  message 
out.  Many  of  the  people  that  we  serve  at  the  Department,  the  el-
derly,  people  with  disabilities,  low-income,  minorities,  geographi-
cally  isolated,  homebound,  and  limited  English-speaking,  are  the 
primary  audiences  for  whom  the  impact  will  be  most  challenging. 
HHS  has  participated  in  events  throughout  the  country  to  make 
our  respective  networks  aware  of  the  DTV  transition  and  what  we 
can do to make it successful. My written testimony has several ex-
amples  and  details  of  these  efforts,  but  I  would  like  to  highlight 
those of my agency, the Administration on Aging. 

I  am  proud  to  report  that  we  were  one  of  the  first  agencies  that 
FCC  and  NTIA  approached  to  ensure  that  as  the  transition  pro-
gressed,  the  unique  needs  of  older  Americans  were  being  ad-
dressed. AoA has communicated information about the DTV transi-
tion  to  our  national  aging  services  network,  which  is  comprised  of 
56  State  Units  on  Aging;  655  local  planning  and  service  entities 
called Area Agencies on Aging; 239 tribal and native organizations, 
representing  more  than  300  tribes;  29,000  local  community  service 
provider  organizations;  and  more  than  half  a  million  volunteers. 
These  organizations  are  disseminating  the  information  further 
down to their respective partners, staff, and volunteer networks at 
the community level where it counts. 

We accomplish our mission through the provision of critical serv-
ices  to  more  than  10.7  million  older  individuals  and  family  care-
givers, and we are in contact with older adults every day. 

Our  community  service  provider  organizations  are  visible  and 
trusted  sources  of  information  and  are  most  often  the  place  where 
older  adults  turn  for  help.  Data  indicates  that  seniors  are  more 
likely  to  have  older  analog  television  sets  and  are  less  likely  to 
have  cable  television  service.  Some  may  face  physical,  financial,  or 
transportation  issues  that  limit  their  ability  to  successfully  make 
the transition to digital TV. Additionally, many may not be familiar 
or, frankly, comfortable with the technology involved with this con-
version. 

Building  on  the  success  of  the  network  in  the  implementation  of 
the  Medicare  Part  D  prescription  drug  program,  we  recognized 
early on that the network, the aging network, represented a perfect 
access point for reaching older and disabled adults. We have devel-
oped a very important coalition of national aging services organiza-
tions  that  represent  a  cross  section  of  our  local  network.  We  have 
developed  unique  coordination  efforts  and  meetings  between  NTIA 
and FCC and this coalition to really maximize their hands-on expe-
rience  with  the  hard-to-reach.  The  coalition  continues  to  fine-tune 
strategies  and  local  plans  for  more  targeted  efforts  in  line  with 
what  the  Assistant  Secretary  and  the  Chairman  have  mentioned, 
in providing direct education, one-on-one information, assistance in 
purchasing and acquiring converter boxes, as well help with instal-
lation  of  the  boxes  so  that  vulnerable  older  adults  can  successfully 
manage the DTV transition. 

AoA  has  also  participated  in  several  FCC  and  NTIA  forums  on 
DTV, and we applaud them for being responsive to the issues that 
we  have  raised.  We  were  pleased  that  Secretary  Gutierrez  has  an-
nounced  that  residents  of  nursing  homes,  assisted  living  facilities, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

33 

and  households  that  use  a  post  office  box  will  be  able  to  request 
coupons. 

We  will  continue  to  work  in  partnership  with  FCC  and  NTIA  to 
distribute  materials  and  information  to  our  stakeholders  and  part-
ners, as well as through our grantee and communication networks. 
This  includes  disseminating  information  through  our  electronic 
newsletter  which  reaches  over  22,000  subscribers  from  national, 
State and local programs. 

While  we  have  done  op-ed  articles  in  English  and  Spanish,  we 
stand  ready  to  do  more  articles,  PSAs,  television  shows,  to  use  all 
means that the Department has available to get the word out. 

We have had NTIA and FCC participate in many important and 
big  national  and  State  aging  conferences  and  events,  which  reach 
thousands of providers, seniors, and family caregivers. 

At  the  community  level,  local  senior  centers,  nutrition  sites, 
adult day care programs, and Meals on Wheels programs are hold-
ing DTV information sessions. Many are working with the National 
Association  of  Broadcasters  that  has  local  TV  broadcasters  avail-
able to speak and participate in these events. At these events, sen-
iors  are  provided  not  only  with  the  critical  information,  but  a 
hands-on demonstration in how to hook up the converter box. 

Our  aging  network  in  North  Carolina  was  very  involved  in  the 
Wilmington pilot test and has indicated that they have been work-
ing very closely with FCC representatives to help ensure a smooth 
transition, particularly for vulnerable individuals. 

Finally,  HHS  will  continue  to  explore  ways  to  reach  out  to  our 
constituents to help ensure that no one is left out in the dark, and 
we are working together to help make this transition as successful 
as possible. 

Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Carbonell follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOSEFINA CARBONELL, ASSISTANT SECRETARY FOR 

AGING, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES 

Chairman  Inouye,  Ranking  Member  Hutchison,  and  Members  of  the  Committee, 
thank you for the opportunity to testify before you today. I am pleased to report that 
the  U.S.  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services  (HHS)  has  been  working  in 
partnership with the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) and the National 
Telecommunications and Information Administration (NTIA) to ensure that the peo-
ple  we  serve  receive  the  information  and  assistance  they  need  to  make  the  transi-
tion  from  analog  to  digital  TV  broadcasts  on  February  17,  2009.  Earlier  this  year 
in response to a request from FCC, Secretary Michael O. Leavitt established a work 
group of his operating divisions to encourage them to make special efforts to ensure 
that HHS was doing everything it could to get the message out. Many of the people 
we  serve—the  elderly,  people  who  have  disabilities,  or  are  low-income,  minorities, 
geographically  isolated,  homebound,  or  limited  English  speaking—are  the  primary 
audiences for whom the impact will be most challenging. 

HHS  staff  have  participated  in  forums  and  meetings  throughout  the  country  in 
order  to  make  our  respective  networks  aware  of  the  DTV  transition  and  what  our 
agencies  can  do  to  help  make  it  successful.  I  would  like  to  share  with  you  just  a 
few examples of what we are doing. 

The  Health  Resources  and  Services  Administration  (HRSA)  is  the  primary  Fed-
eral  agency  for  improving  access  to  health  care  services  for  people  who  are  unin-
sured, isolated or medically vulnerable. HRSA has forwarded FCC DTV information 
to  approximately  4,000  grantee  organizations  who  serve  approximately  16  million 
low-income people. They have also worked with organizations such as the State Pri-
mary  Care  Offices,  the  Primary  Care  Associations  and  the  National  Association  for 
Community  Health  Centers.  These  organizations  which  represent  many  more  non- 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

federally  funded  health  centers  and  clinics  nationwide  were  asked  to  post  and  dis-
tribute DTV flyers in their clinics and to distribute information to patients. 

34 

The  Administration  for  Children  and  Families  (ACF)  is  responsible  for  Federal 
programs that promote the economic and social well-being of families, children, indi-
viduals,  and  communities.  Information  has  been  distributed  to  their  1,600  Head 
Start grantees and Community Action Agencies, covering more than 18,000 centers 
around the country as well as through their Temporary Assistance for Needy Fami-
lies program. The Office of Community Services (OCS) within ACF promotes the TV 
Converter Box Coupon Program during public engagements and conferences and en-
courages  grantees  and  partner  associations  to  invite  FCC  representatives  to  their 
activities  to  help  educate  the  public  about  the  DTV  transition.  More  specifically, 
OCS has distributed English and Spanish DTV Transition: February 17, 2009, ‘‘Are 
You Ready?’’ flyers to over 100 State Community Service Block Grant, 600 Commu-
nity Action Agency and 500 Weatherization and Low-Income Energy Assistance Pro-
gram staff; posted information on the websites of partner associations that represent 
over  1,000  Community  Action  Agencies;  and  facilitated  coupon  sign-up  events  with 
over  100  Social  Services  Block  Grant  and  Community  Services  Block  Grant  grant-
ees. The Child Care Bureau conducted several outreach activities to inform the child 
care  community  serving  low-income  children  and  families.  Activities  include  dis-
seminating  the  flyers  at  the  14th  National  American  Indian/Alaska  Native  Child 
Care Conference which was attended by over 500 tribal organizations; and e-mailing 
the flyer to the 50 State and 5 territory Child Care and Development Fund (CCDF) 
administrators  with  the  request  that  the  flyer  be  disseminated  to  the  families 
served  by  the  program.  Approximately  1  million  families  are  served  in  an  average 
month with CCDF funds. The Office of Child Support Enforcement (OCSE) informed 
all State child support enforcement programs of the DTV initiative, prominently dis-
played  the  DTV  transition  logo  and  link  on  the  OCSE  website,  and  invited  child 
support agencies to either download or order hard copies through OCSE of the ma-
terial to share with their clientele. OCSE filled many requests for the material from 
various agencies. 

The Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services Administration (SAMHSA) has 
focused  its  mission  on  building  resilience  and  facilitating  recovery  for  people  with 
or  at  risk  for  mental  or  substance  use  disorders.  They  are  using  their  call  center 
that  responds  to  requests  for  information  from  approximately  50,000  individuals 
each month as a means of informing people about the DTV transition. 

The  Indian  Health  Service  (IHS)  has  distributed  information  to  their  120  health 
facilities  and  worked  with  Tribes  to  distribute  consumer  information  to  an  addi-
tional 300 tribally managed health facilities. 

Finally,  the  Centers  for  Medicare  and  Medicaid  Services  (CMS)  will  embark  on 
its fall Open Enrollment period from November 15 to December 31, 2008 where they 
will  be  reaching  out  to  44  million  people  with  Medicare  through  approximately 
10,000  events  to  enroll  in  a  drug  plan,  review  their  health  care  and  drug  coverage, 
and  make  changes.  CMS  has  agreed  to  share  information  with  partner  organiza-
tions about the DTV transition as a part of their outreach efforts using information 
provided by the NTIA. 

I am proud to report that my agency, the Administration on Aging (AoA), was one 
of the first agencies in the Federal Government that FCC and NTIA approached to 
work in partnership with them because they wanted to ensure that as the transition 
progressed  the  special  and  unique  needs  of  older  Americans  were  being  addressed. 
As you know, AoA oversees the national aging services network (the network) which 
is  comprised  of  56  State  Units  on  Aging  designated  by  each  Governor;  655  local 
planning  and  service  entities  in  geographic  regions  in  the  states  known  as  Area 
Agencies on Aging; 239 tribal and native organizations, representing more than 300 
Tribes;  29,000  local  community  service  provider  organizations;  and  more  than 
500,000  volunteers.  We  accomplish  our  mission  through  the  provision  of  critical 
services to more than 10.7 million older individuals and family caregivers; 3 million 
of  whom  require  intensive  home  care  services;  the  provision  of  an  array  of  health 
and social supports through 13 million information and referral contacts and by pro-
viding over 20 million people with outreach and information about services; by pro-
viding over 28 million rides to meal sites, doctor’s offices and other critical activities; 
and  by  serving  237  million  meals  to  prevent  and  manage  chronic  diseases.  So  you 
can  see  that  we  are  in  contact  with  older  adults  everyday.  The  community  service 
provider  organizations  in  our  network  consist  of  local  community-based  and  faith- 
based  organizations  who  are  the  visible  and  trusted  source  of  information  in  the 
community and most often the place were older adults will turn for help. 

Data indicate that seniors are more likely to have older analog television sets and 
are  less  likely  to  have  cable  television  service.  Many  face  physical,  financial  or 
transportation  limitations  that  will  impact  their  ability  to  successfully  make  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

35 

transition  to  digital  television.  Additionally,  many  may  not  be  familiar  or  com-
fortable  with  the  technology  involved  with  the  conversion.  Although  consumer  edu-
cation efforts are important, we also recognize the need to safeguard against up sell-
ing  as  well  as  fraud  and  abuse  and  the  need  to  address  the  impact  of  requiring 
physical  assistance  related  to  installation,  repairs  and  service  of  converter  boxes. 
Providing consumer education and information does not produce access to converter 
boxes nor does it produce appropriate installation of them for a frail, mobility chal-
lenged population who rely on television as a primary source of critical information 
such  as  weather  and  emergency  announcements;  for  a  sense  of  connectedness  and 
for entertainment. Building on the successful outreach, education and individual as-
sistance  provided  by  the  network  in  the  implementation  of  Medicare  Part  D  Pre-
scription  Drug  Coverage  and  Preventive  Benefits,  we  recognized  early  on  that  the 
network represented a perfect access point for reaching the older adults who would 
be most affected by the digital television conversion. 

When  NTIA  reached  out  to  us  in  the  summer  of  2007,  we  immediately  agreed  to 
help  them  with  this  effort.  One  of  the  first  things  that  we  did  was  to  reach  out  to 
a  coalition  of  national  aging  services  organizations  and  advocacy  groups  rep-
resenting  the  network.  AoA  granted  access  to  and  facilitated  meetings  and  discus-
sions with NTIA and FCC. Each of the 11 organizations in the coalition have a focus 
on  the  needs  of  older  adults,  particularly  those  most  in  need  of  services  and  sup-
ports as they age and/or those in diverse communities. They have experience in de-
veloping  approaches  to  reach  out  and  assist  the  most  at-risk  older  adults  and  their 
caregivers.  They  have  experience  in  reaching  the  hard-to-reach;  such  as  rural,  iso-
lated  and  limited  English-speaking  older  individuals.  And  they  have  well-estab-
lished aging-related communications channels and networks. 

Currently,  the  coalition  is  working  toward  providing  direct  education;  one-on-one 
information;  assistance  in  purchasing  and  acquiring  converter  boxes;  as  well  as  in-
stallation  of  the  boxes  so  that  vulnerable  older  adults  can  successfully  manage  the 
DTV  transition.  The  members  of  the  coalition  communicate  on  a  regular  basis  and 
we  are  working  with  them  to  identify  ways  in  which  they  could  use  the  strengths 
of each group to maximize and leverage their resources at the local level. 

AoA  has  participated  in  several  FCC  and  NTIA  forums  on  DTV  and  we  applaud 
them  for  listening  to  our  recommendations  and  being  responsive  to  the  issues  we 
raised.  We  will  continue  to  work  in  partnership  with  FCC  and  NTIA  to  provide  in-
formation  at  aging  conferences  and  exhibits  occurring  through  the  balance  of  the 
year. We will continue to distribute materials and information through our grantee 
and  communications  networks,  such  as  our  electronic  newsletter  that  has  22,000 
subscribers, as well as to our stakeholders and partners. Finally, we will refresh or 
update our website to ensure that links remain in a prominent location. 

Currently  at  the  community  level,  local  senior  centers,  nutrition  sites  and  other 
agencies  are  holding  DTV  information  sessions.  Many  are  working  in  partnership 
with  the  National  Association  of  Broadcasters  that  has  a  DTV  Speakers  Bureau 
made  up  of  local  TV  station  broadcasters  and  others  who  are  available  to  speak  at 
local  events.  At  these  events,  seniors  are  provided  not  only  with  information,  but 
a hands-on demonstration on how to hook-up the converter box. 

Additionally, Wilmington, North Carolina was the first market to test the transi-
tion  to  digital  television  (DTV)  in  advance  of  the  nationwide  transition  to  DTV  on 
February  17,  2009.  The  commercial  broadcasters  serving  the  Wilmington  television 
market  voluntarily  agreed  to  turn  off  their  analog  signals  at  noon  on  September  8, 
2008.  Our  State  and  local  aging  agencies  in  North  Carolina  were  very  involved  in 
the  Wilmington  test  and  have  indicated  that  they  have  been  working  very  closely 
with FCC representatives to help ensure a smooth transition. 

We  were  pleased  to  learn  that  U.S.  Secretary  of  Commerce  Carlos  Gutierrez  an-
nounced  last  Tuesday  that  residents  of  licensed  nursing  homes,  intermediate  care 
facilities, assisted living facilities and households that use a post office box for mail 
delivery  will  be  eligible  to  request  coupons  from  the  DTV  Converter  Box  Coupon 
Program. This was an issue raised early on by aging advocates and this ruling dem-
onstrates  we  are  all  working  together  to  help  make  this  transition  as  successful  as 
possible. 

Finally,  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Services  will  continue  to  explore 
ways  that  we  can  reach  out  to  our  constituents  to  help  ensure  that  no  one  is  left 
in the dark on February 18, 2009. 

Thank you for the opportunity to testify today. I would be pleased to answer any 

questions you may have. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Madam Secretary. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

36 

And may I now call upon the Director of the Physical Infrastruc-
ture  Issues,  U.S.  Government  Accountability  Office,  Mr.  Mark 
Goldstein? 
STATEMENT  OF  MARK  L.  GOLDSTEIN,  DIRECTOR,  PHYSICAL 
INFRASTRUCTURE,  U.S.  GOVERNMENT  ACCOUNTABILITY 
OFFICE (GAO) 
Mr.  GOLDSTEIN.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Dorgan. 
Good afternoon. I am pleased to be here today to discuss the GAO’s 
recent  issuance  of  a  report  last  week  on  NTIA’s  implementation  of 
the mandated converter box subsidy program. 

The Federal Government and the private sector have taken many 
steps  to  prepare  for  the  DTV  transition.  NTIA  created  and  imple-
mented  a  digital-to-analog  converter  box  subsidy  program.  Addi-
tionally,  the  Government,  the  television  broadcast  industry,  cable, 
and  satellite  providers  and  other  carriers  with  broadcast  signals 
have  established  several  educational  efforts  informing  consumers 
about the transition and the subsidy program. 

However, the success of the DTV transition and the subsidy pro-
gram  requires  consumers  understanding  about  the  transition  and 
the  steps  needed  to  continue  receiving  a  television  signal.  In  addi-
tion,  consumers  will  rely  on  retailers  to  provide  information,  as 
well as to supply eligible converter boxes for the program. 

In  my  testimony  today,  I  discuss,  number  one,  what  consumer 
education  efforts  have  been  undertaken  by  private  and  Federal 
stakeholders and, number two, how effective NTIA has been in im-
plementing  the  converter  box  subsidy  program  and  to  what  extent 
consumers are participating in the program. 

First,  private  sector  and  Federal  stakeholders  have  undertaken 
various  consumer  education  efforts  to  raise  awareness  about  the 
transition.  For  example,  the  National  Association  of  Broadcasters 
and  the  National  Cable  and  Telecommunications  Association  have 
committed over $1.4 billion to educate consumers about the transi-
tion. This funding has supported the development of public service 
announcements,  education  programs  for  broadcast,  websites  and 
other activities. 

In addition, most national retailers participating in the converter 
box  subsidy  program  have  developed  consumer  education  cam-
paigns  to  raise  awareness  of  the  transition  and  the  subsidy  pro-
gram. 

Federal  stakeholders,  FCC  and  NTIA,  have  developed  consumer 
education  plans  that  target  those  populations  most  likely  to  be  af-
fected  by  the  transition,  and  particularly  they  have  focused  their 
outreach  efforts  on  certain  demographic  groups,  including  seniors, 
low-income,  minority,  and  non-English-speaking,  rural  households, 
and persons with disabilities. 

Second,  NTIA  is  effectively  implementing  the  converter  box  sub-
sidy program, but plans to address the likely increase in coupon de-
mand  as  the  transition  nears  remain  unclear.  As  of  August  31, 
2008,  NTIA  had  issued  approximately  24  million  coupons,  and  as 
of  that  date,  approximately  13  percent  of  U.S.  households  had  re-
quested coupons. As found in our recent consumer survey, however, 
up to 35 percent of U.S. households could be affected by the transi-
tion  because  they  have  at  least  one  television  not  connected  to  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

37 

subscription  service,  such  as  cable  or  satellite.  In  U.S.  households 
relying solely on over-the-air broadcasts, approximately 15 percent, 
of those who intend to purchase a converter box, 100 percent of our 
survey  respondents  said  they  were  likely  to  request  a  coupon. 
Therefore, a spike in demand for converter box coupons is likely as 
the transition date nears. 

According to NTIA, an increase in requests around the transition 
date may cause a delay in issuing coupons. However, we found that 
NTIA  had  no  specific  plans  to  address  an  increase  in  demand  and 
that it has encountered challenges in issuing coupons within its re-
quirement  of  10  to  15  days  from  the  date  the  coupon  application 
was approved. 

Given  the  challenges  to  meet  this  requirement  and  its  lack  of  a 
clear plan to address a potential spike in demand, consumers might 
incur significant wait times to receive their coupons and might lose 
television service if their wait time lasts beyond February 17, 2009. 
In  terms  of  participation  in  the  converter  box  subsidy  program, 
we  analyzed  coupon  data  in  the  areas  of  the  country  comprised  of 
predominantly minority and senior populations and found that par-
ticipation varies. For example, we found that ZIP codes with a high 
concentration  of  Latino  or  Hispanic  households  had  noticeably 
higher  coupon  request  rates,  28  percent,  when  compared  to  areas 
with  predominantly  non-Latino  or  non-Hispanic  households,  about 
12 percent. We also found households in both predominantly black 
and  Hispanic  or  Latino  areas  were  less  likely,  compared  to  house-
holds  outside  those  areas,  to  redeem  their  coupons  once  they  re-
ceive them. 

Additionally, we analyzed participation in the converter box sub-
sidy  program  in  the  45  areas  of  the  country  on  which  NTIA  and 
FCC  focus  their  consumer  education  efforts  and  found  coupon  re-
quests to be roughly the same for ZIP codes within the 45 targeted 
areas compared with areas that were not targeted. 

NTIA  estimates  that  it  will  see  a  large  increase  in  the  number 
of  coupon  requests  in  the  first  quarter  of  2009,  and  our  analysis 
confirms  that.  As  the  transition  nears,  a  spike  in  coupon  requests 
is  likely.  However,  NTIA  has  not  developed  a  plan  for  managing 
that  potential  spike  or  the  sustained  increase.  The  time  required 
for processing coupons has improved since consumers incurred sig-
nificant wait times to receive their coupons at the beginning of the 
program, but until recently, NTIA fell short of this requirement for 
processing  coupons  within  the  allotted  time.  Consequently,  con-
sumers may still face potential risks. 

To  help  NTIA  prepare  for  potential  increase  in  demand  for  con-
verter  box  coupons  and  so  that  consumers  are  not  left  waiting  a 
lengthy  period  of  time  for  requested  coupons,  the  report  we  re-
leased last week recommended that the Secretary of Commerce di-
rect  NTIA  to  develop  a  plan  to  manage  volatility  in  coupon  re-
quests  so  that  coupons  will  be  processed  within  the  allotted  time 
period. 

Mr. Chairman, this concludes my prepared statement. I would be 
happy to respond to any questions you or the Committee may have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Goldstein follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

38 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARK L. GOLDSTEIN, DIRECTOR, PHYSICAL 
INFRASTRUCTURE, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE (GAO) 

Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee: 
I  am  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  our  recently  issued  report  on  the  Na-
tional  Telecommunications  and  Information  Administration’s  (NTIA)  implementa-
tion of the mandated converter box subsidy program.1 

Federal  law  requires  all  full  power  television  stations  in  the  United  States  to 
cease  analog  broadcasting  and  broadcast  digital-only 
transmissions  after 
February 17, 2009—often referred to as the digital television (DTV) transition. Cur-
rently,  most  television  broadcasters  transmit  over-the-air  signals  in  both  an  analog 
and digital format to television households. After the transition, consumers who rely 
exclusively  on  over-the-air  television  signals  viewed  on  analog  sets  will  not  be  able 
to view broadcast programming, which could include important news information or 
emergency  alerts,  unless  they  take  action.  In  particular,  these  consumers  could:  (1) 
purchase a television capable of processing digital signals, (2) purchase a digital-to- 
analog converter box that converts the digital signals to analog signals and enables 
their  display  on  an  analog  set,  or  (3)  subscribe  to  cable,  satellite,  or  other  service. 
The  Federal  Government  and  the  private  sector  have  taken  several  steps  to  pre-
pare  for  the  DTV  transition.  NTIA,  a  bureau  within  the  U.S.  Department  of  Com-
merce,  created  and  implemented  a  digital-to-analog  converter  box  subsidy  program 
to provide households with up to two $40 coupons toward the purchase of converter 
boxes  that  allow  consumers  to  continue  viewing  over-the-air  signals  on  analog  tele-
vision  sets.2 Additionally,  the  government,  television  broadcast  industry,  cable  and 
satellite  providers,  and  other  carriers  of  broadcast  signals  have  established  several 
educational  efforts  informing  consumers  about  the  DTV  transition  and  the  subsidy 
program.  However,  the  success  of  the  DTV  transition  and  the  subsidy  program  re-
quires  consumers’  understanding  about  the  transition  and  the  steps  needed  to  con-
tinue  receiving  a  television  signal.  In  addition,  consumers  will  rely  on  retailers  to 
provide  information,  as  well  as  supply  eligible  converter  boxes,  for  the  subsidy  pro-
gram. 

In  my  testimony  today,  I  will  discuss:  (1)  what  consumer  education  efforts  have 
been  undertaken  by  private  and  Federal  stakeholders  and  (2)  how  effective  NTIA 
has  been  in  implementing  the  converter  box  subsidy  program  and  to  what  extent 
consumers are participating in the program. 

To  meet  these  objectives,  we  interviewed  agency  officials  from  the  Federal  Com-
munications  Commission  (FCC)  and  NTIA  and  reviewed  their  consumer  education 
documents,  orders,  rules  and  proposed  rules.  We  also  interviewed  private  sector 
stakeholders  representing  the  broadcasting,  retailer,  manufacturing,  and  cable  in-
dustries  and  reviewed  publicly  available  information  on  their  consumer  education 
planning. Further, we discussed the effectiveness of consumer education efforts with 
various  advocacy  groups  identified  as  NTIA  partners  that  represent  hard-to-reach 
populations.  We  also  analyzed  date-specific  data  from  NTIA  on  coupon  requests, 
issuance,  redemptions,  and  expirations,  and  examined  NTIA  timeliness  in  issuing 
coupons  from  the  beginning  of  the  converter  box  subsidy  program  in  January 
through August 2008. Due to report processing constraints the report this testimony 
is primarily based on only analyzed data from January through June 2008. We con-
ducted data reliability testing and determined that the data used in this report were 
sufficiently reliable for our purposes. We conducted a ‘‘mystery shopper’’ study—i.e., 
discussing  the  transition  with  randomly  selected  retailers  without  identifying  our-
selves  as  government  employees—to  determine  retailer  preparedness  for  the  con-
verter box subsidy program including the level of retailer knowledge about the pro-
gram  and  availability  of  converter  boxes.  The  study,  in  which  we  visited  132  store 
locations  in  12  cities,  was  conducted  from  April  to  early  May  2008.  We  performed 
our review from February to September 2008 in accordance with generally accepted 
government auditing standards. Those standards require that we plan and perform 
the audit to obtain sufficient, appropriate evidence to provide a reasonable basis for 
our findings and conclusions based on our review objectives. We believe that the evi-
dence  obtained  provides  a  reasonable  basis  for  our  findings  and  conclusions  based 
on our audit objectives. 

1 GAO,  Digital  Television  Transition:  Implementation  of  the  Converter  Box  Subsidy  Program 
Is  Under  Way,  but  Preparedness  to  Manage  an  Increase  in  Subsidy  Demand  Is  Unclear,  GAO– 
08–1040 (Washington, D.C.: September 16, 2008). 

2 Eligible converter boxes range in price from $40 to over $90. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

39 

Summary 

• Private  sector  and  Federal  stakeholders  have  undertaken  various  consumer 
education efforts to raise awareness about the DTV transition. For example, the 
National  Association  of  Broadcasters  (NAB)  and  the  National  Cable  and  Tele-
communications  Association  have  committed  over  $1.4  billion  to  educate  con-
sumers  about  the  transition.  This  funding  has  supported  the  development  of 
public  service  announcements,  education  programs  for  broadcast,  websites,  and 
other  activities.  In  addition,  most  national  retailers  participating  in  the  con-
verter  box  subsidy  program  have  developed  consumer  education  campaigns  to 
raise awareness of the DTV transition and the subsidy program. Federal stake-
holders  (FCC  and  NTIA)  have  developed  consumer  education  plans  that  target 
those  populations  most  likely  to  be  affected  by  the  DTV  transition.  In  par-
ticular,  they  focused  their  outreach  efforts  on  certain  demographic  groups,  in-
cluding  seniors,  low-income,  minority  and  non-English  speaking,  rural  house-
holds, and persons with disabilities. 
• NTIA is effectively implementing the converter box subsidy program, but plans 
to address the likely increase in coupon demand as the transition nears remain 
unclear. As of August 31, 2008, NTIA had issued approximately 24 million cou-
pons  and  as  of  that  date  approximately  13  percent  of  U.S.  households  had  re-
quested  coupons.  As  found  in  our  consumer  survey,  up  to  35  percent  of  U.S. 
households  could  be  affected  by  the  transition  because  they  have  at  least  one 
television not connected to a subscription service, such as cable or satellite.3 In 
U.S. households relying solely on over-the-air broadcasts (approximately 15 per-
cent),  of  those  who  intend  to  purchase  a  converter  box,  100  percent  of  survey 
respondents said they were likely to request a coupon. Therefore, a spike in de-
mand for converter box coupons is likely as the transition date nears. According 
to NTIA, an increase in requests around the transition date may cause a delay 
in  issuing  coupons.  However,  we  found  NTIA  has  no  specific  plans  to  address 
an  increase  in  demand  and  that  it  has  encountered  challenges  in  issuing  cou-
pons within its requirement of 10 to 15 days from the date the coupon applica-
tion  was  approved.  Given  the  challenges  to  meet  this  requirement  and  its  lack 
of  a  clear  plan  to  address  a  potential  spike  in  demand,  consumers  might  incur 
significant  wait  time  to  receive  their  coupons  and  might  lose  television  service 
if  their  wait  time  lasts  beyond  February  17,  2009.  In  terms  of  participation  in 
the  converter  box  subsidy  program,  we  analyzed  coupon  data  in  areas  of  the 
country comprised of predominantly minority and senior populations and found 
that participation varies. For example, we found that ZIP codes with a high con-
centration  of  Latino  or  Hispanic  households  had  noticeably  higher  coupon  re-
quest  rates  (28  percent)  when  compared  to  areas  with  predominantly  non- 
Latino  or  non-Hispanic  households  (12  percent).  We  also  found  households  in 
both  predominantly  black  and  Hispanic  or  Latino  areas  were  less  likely,  com-
pared  to  households  outside  these  areas,  to  redeem  their  coupons  once  they  re-
ceived  them.  Additionally,  we  analyzed  participation  in  the  converter  box  sub-
sidy  program  in  the  45  areas  of  the  country  on  which  NTIA  and  FCC  focused 
their  consumer  education  efforts  and  found  coupon  requests  to  be  roughly  the 
same for zip codes within the 45 targeted areas compared with areas that were 
not targeted. 

Background 

The DTV transition will require citizens to understand the transition and the ac-
tions that some might have to take to maintain television service. For those house-
holds with subscription video service on all televisions or with all televisions capable 
of  processing  a  digital  signal,  no  action  is  required.  However,  households  with  ana-
log  televisions  that  rely  solely  on  over-the-air  television  signals  received  through 
rooftop or indoor antennas must take action to be able to view digital broadcast sig-
nals  after  analog  broadcasting  ceases.  The  Digital  Television  Transition  and  Public 
Safety Act of 2005 addresses the responsibilities of two Federal agencies—FCC and 
NTIA—related to the DTV transition. The act directs FCC to require full-power tele-
vision  stations  to  cease  analog  broadcasting  after  February  17,  2009.  The  act  also 
directed NTIA to establish a $1.5 billion subsidy program through which households 
can obtain coupons toward the purchase of digital-to-analog converter boxes. In Au-
gust 2007, NTIA selected International Business Machines Corporation (IBM) as the 
contractor  to  provide  certain  services  for  the  program.  On  January  1,  2008,  NTIA, 

3 GAO,  Digital  Television  Transition:  Broadcasters’  Transition  Status,  Low-Power  Station 
Issues,  and  Information  on  Consumer  Awareness  of  the  DTV  Transition,  GAO–08–881T  (Wash-
ington, D.C.: June 10, 2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

40 

in  conjunction  with  IBM  and  in  accordance  with  the  act,  began  accepting  applica-
tions  for  up  to  two  $40  coupons  per  household  that  can  apply  toward  the  purchase 
of eligible digital-to-analog converter boxes and, in mid-February 2008, began mail-
ing  the  coupons.  Initially,  during  the  first  phase  of  the  program  any  household  is 
eligible  to  request  and  receive  the  coupons,  but  once  $890  million  worth  of  coupons 
has been redeemed, and issued but not expired, NTIA must certify to Congress that 
the  program’s  initial  allocation  of  funds  is  insufficient  to  fulfill  coupon  requests. 
NTIA  will  then  receive  $510  million  in  additional  program  funds,  but  households 
requesting  coupons  during  this  second  phase  must  certify  that  they  do  not  receive 
cable, satellite, or any other pay television service. As of June 24, 2008, in response 
to  NTIA’s  statement  certifying  that  the  initial  allocation  of  funds  would  be  insuffi-
cient,  all  appropriated  coupon  funds  were  made  available  to  the  program.4 Con-
sumers  can  request  coupons  up  to  March  31,  2009,  and  coupons  can  be  redeemed 
through July 9, 2009. As required by law, all coupons expire 90 days after issuance. 
As  unredeemed  coupons  expire,  the  funds  obligated  for  those  coupons  are  returned 
to the converter box subsidy program. 

Retailer participation in the converter box subsidy program is voluntary, but par-
ticipating retailers are required to follow specific program rules to ensure the proper 
use and processing of converter box coupons. Retailers are obligated to, among other 
things, establish systems capable of electronically processing coupons for redemption 
and  payment  and  tracking  transactions.  Retailers  must  also  train  their  employees 
on  the  purpose  and  operation  of  the  subsidy  program.  According  to  NTIA  officials, 
NTIA initially explored the idea of setting requirements for training content, but de-
cided to allow retailers the flexibility of developing their own training programs and 
provided retailers with sample training materials. Certification requires retailers to 
have completed an application form by March 31, 2008, and to attest that they have 
been  engaged  in  the  consumer  electronics  retail  business  for  at  least  one  year.  Re-
tailers  must  also  register  in  the  government’s  Central  Contractor  Registration  data 
base,  have  systems  or  procedures  that  can  be  easily  audited  and  that  can  provide 
adequate  data  to  minimize  fraud  and  abuse,  agree  to  be  audited  at  any  time,  and 
provide  data  tracking  each  coupon  with  a  corresponding  converter  box  purchase. 
NTIA may revoke retailers’ certification if they fail to comply with these regulations 
or  if  any  of  their  actions  are  deemed  inconsistent  with  the  subsidy  program.  Con-
verter  boxes  can  also  be  purchased  by  telephone  or  online  and  be  shipped  directly 
to a customer’s home from participating retailers. At the time of our review, 29 on-
line retailers were participating in the converter box subsidy program. Additionally, 
13  telephone  retailers  were  listed  as  participating  in  the  program,  2  of  which  are 
associated with national retailers. 
Private  and  Federal  Stakeholders  Have  Undertaken  a  Myriad  of  Activities 

Aimed at Increasing the Public’s Awareness of the Transition 

Private sector stakeholders, such as broadcasters and cable providers, have under-
taken  various  education  efforts  to  increase  public  awareness  about  the  DTV  transi-
tion.  The  NAB  and  the  National  Cable  and  Telecommunications  Association  initi-
ated  DTV  transition  consumer  education  campaigns  in  late  2007  at  an  estimated 
value  of  $1.4  billion  combined.  NAB  has  produced  six  versions  of  a  public  service 
announcement,  including  15-second  and  30-second  versions  in  both  English  and 
Spanish  and  close-captioned  versions.  Private  sector  stakeholders  have  also  pro-
duced  DTV  transition  educational  programs  for  broadcast  and  distribution,  devel-
oped  websites  that  provide  information  on  the  transition,  and  engaged  in  various 
other forms of outreach to raise awareness. Additionally, most of the national retail-
ers  participating  in  the  NTIA  converter  box  subsidy  program  are  providing  mate-
rials to help inform their customers of the DTV transition and the subsidy program. 
Examples  of  these  materials  include  informational  brochures  in  English  and  Span-
ish,  educational  videos  and  in-store  displays  in  English  and  Spanish,  informational 
content  on  retailer  websites,  and  information  provided  in  retailer  advertising  in 
Sunday circulars. 

FCC  and  NTIA  also  have  ongoing  DTV  consumer  education  efforts,  which  target 
populations  most  likely  to  be  affected  by  the  DTV  transition.  Specifically,  they  fo-
cused  their  efforts  on  45  areas  of  the  country  that  have  at  least  1  of  the  following 
population groups: (1) more than 150,000 over the-air households, (2) more than 20 
percent  of  all  households  relying  on  over-the-air  broadcasts,  or  (3)  a  top  10  City  of 
residence for the largest target demographic groups. The target demographic groups 
include  seniors,  low-income,  minority  and  non-English  speaking,  rural  households, 
and persons with disabilities. According to NTIA, its consumer education efforts will 

4 With  the  additional  $510  million,  total  program  funding  is  $1.5  billion,  which  includes  up 

to $1.34 billion in coupon funds and up to $160 million in administrative funds. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

41 

specifically target these 45 areas by leveraging partnerships and earned media spots 
(such as news stories or opinion editorials) to better reach the targeted populations. 
FCC  indicated  that  while  its  outreach  efforts  focus  on  the  targeted  hard-to-reach 
populations,  the  only  effort  specifically  targeting  the  45  locations  has  been  to  place 
billboards  in  these  communities.  According  to  FCC,  contracts  exist  for  billboards  in 
26 of the 45 markets, and it is working to place billboards in the other 19 markets. 
Furthermore, FCC and NTIA have developed partnerships with some Federal, state, 
and local organizations that serve the targeted hard-toreach populations. 
NTIA is Effectively Implementing the Converter Box Subsidy Program, But 
Concerns  Exist  about  NTIA’s  Ability  to  Manage  a  Potential  Spike  in 
Demand 

NTIA has processed and issued coupons to millions of consumers, but a sharp in-
crease  in  demand  might  affect  NTIA’s  ability  to  respond  to  coupon  requests  in  a 
timely  manner.  NTIA  and  its  contractors  have  implemented  systems:  (1)  to  process 
coupon applications, (2) to produce and distribute coupons to consumers, and (3) for 
retailers  to  process  coupons  and  receive  reimbursement  for  the  coupons  from  the 
government.  Millions  of  consumers  have  requested  converter  box  coupons  and  most 
of  the  requested  coupons  have  been  issued.  Through  August  2008,  households  had 
requested approximately 26 million coupons. NTIA had issued over 94 percent of all 
coupon  requests,  for  more  than  24  million  coupons.  Of  those  coupons  issued,  about 
9.5  million  (39  percent)  had  been  redeemed  and  31  percent  had  expired.5 After  an 
initial spike at the beginning of the program, coupon requests have remained steady 
and  have  averaged  over  105,000  requests  per  day.  Coupon  redemptions,  since  cou-
pons were first issued in February 2008, have averaged over 48,000 per day. 

In  our  consumer  survey,  we  found  that  35  percent  of  U.S.  households  are  at  risk 
of  losing  some  television  service  because  they  have  at  least  one  television  not  con-
nected to a subscription service, such as cable or satellite. However, through August 
2008, only 13 percent of U.S. households had requested converter box coupons, and 
less than 5 percent had redeemed these coupons. As the transition date nears, there 
is  the  potential  that  many  affected  households  that  have  not  taken  action  might 
begin requesting coupons. Our consumer survey found that of those at risk of losing 
some  television  service  and  intending  to  purchase  a  converter  box,  most  will  likely 
request  a  coupon.  In  fact,  in  households  relying  solely  on  over-the-air  broadcasts 
(approximately  15  percent),  of  those  who  intend  to  purchase  a  converter  box,  100 
percent of survey respondents said they were likely to request a coupon. 

Consumers have incurred significant wait times in the processing of their coupon 
requests,  but  the  processing  time  from  receiving  requests  to  issuing  coupons  is  im-
proving.  NTIA  requires  that  98  percent  of  all  coupon  requests  be  issued  within  10 
days,  and  the  remainder  be  issued  within  15  days.  From  February  17  through  Au-
gust 31, 2008, our analysis shows that the average duration between coupon request 
and issuance was over 16 days.6 In aggregate, 53 percent of all coupon requests had 
been  issued  within  10  days,  and  39  percent  of  all  coupon  requests  had  been  issued 
more than 15 days after being requested. From May 1 through August 31, 2008, the 
average processing time from coupon request to issuance was 9 days. 

Given  the  processing  time  required  in  issuing  coupons,  NTIA’s  preparedness  to 
handle  volatility  in  coupon  demand  is  unclear.  Fluctuation  in  coupon  requests,  in-
cluding the potential for a spike in requests as the transition date approaches, could 
adversely  affect  consumers.  When  NTIA  faced  a  deluge  of  coupon  requests  in  the 
early  days  of  the  converter  box  subsidy  program,  it  took  weeks  to  bring  down  the 
deficit of coupons issued to coupons requested. According to NTIA, it expects a simi-
lar increase in requests around the transition date, and such an increase may cause 
a delay in issuing coupons. As a result, consumers might incur significant wait time 
before  they  receive  their  coupons  and  might  lose  television  service  during  the  time 
they  are  waiting  for  the  coupons.  While  NTIA  and  its  contractors  have  dem-
onstrated  the  capacity  to  process  and  issue  large  numbers  of  coupon  requests  over 
short  periods,  they  have  yet  to  establish  specific  plans  to  manage  a  potential  spike 
or a sustained increase in demand leading up to the transition. 

We  analyzed  data  to  compare  areas  of  the  country  that  comprise  predominantly 
minority  and  elderly  populations  with  the  rest  of  the  U.S.  population  and  found 
some  differences  in  the  coupon  request,  redemption,  and  expiration  rates  for  His-

5 Our  redemption  rate  was  calculated  by  dividing  the  number  of  redeemed  coupons  by  the 
total  number  of  issued  coupons  as  of  August  31,  2008.  The  total  number  of  issued  coupons  in-
cludes coupons which had been redeemed, had expired, and had not yet expired as of that date. 
6 For the purposes of our analysis, we assumed that all coupons were issued in the order they 
were  received.  According  to  NTIA,  coupon  issuance  was  to  begin  1  year  from  the  transition. 
Therefore  the  processing  time  between  coupon  requests  and  issuance  was  calculated  beginning 
on February 17, 2008. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

42 

panic,  black,  and  senior  households  compared  with  the  rest  of  the  U.S.  population. 
For example, ZIP codes with a high concentration of Latino or Hispanic households 
had noticeably higher request rates (28 percent) when compared with non-Latino or 
non-Hispanic  zip  codes  (12  percent).  However,  households  in  predominantly  black 
and Latino or Hispanic zip codes were less likely, compared with households outside 
these  areas,  to  redeem  their  coupons  once  they  received  them.  As  shown  in  table 
1,  the  overall  rate  of  redemption  for  the  converter  box  subsidy  program  is  39  per-
cent.  Approximately  37  percent  of  coupons  have  been  redeemed  in  predominantly 
Latino or Hispanic areas. In predominantly black areas, 32 percent of coupons have 
been  redeemed.  We  found  that  in  areas  of  the  country  with  a  high  concentration 
of  seniors,  fewer  coupons  were  requested  (9  percent)  compared  with  areas  of  the 
country  that  did  not  have  a  high  concentration  of  seniors  (13  percent).  Redemption 
rates  for  the  senior  population  were  lower  than  the  redemption  rates  in  the  rest  of 
the  country.  Regarding  coupon  expirations,  we  found  that  the  areas  comprising 
Latino  or  Hispanic  households  allowed  27  percent  of  their  coupons  to  expire,  while 
areas with predominantly senior populations allowed 43 percent of their coupons to 
expire. 

Table 1.—Request, Redemption, and Expiration Rates of Converter Box Coupons through August 2008 

U.S. population 
Latino or Hispanic 
Black 
Seniors 

Request rate 

Redemption rate 

Expiration rate 

12.5 
27.5 
13.4 
8.7 

39.0 
36.6 
31.5 
34.0 

30.5 
26.8 
30.3 
43.2 

Source: GAO analysis of NTIA data. 
To  determine  participation  in  the  converter  box  subsidy  program  in  the  45  areas 
of  the  country  receiving  targeted  outreach  by  NTIA  and  FCC,  we  analyzed  NTIA 
coupon data (including requests, redemptions, and expirations) in the 45 areas com-
pared to the rest of the country not targeted by NTIA and FCC. We found participa-
tion  levels  were  about  the  same  in  the  targeted  areas  when  compared  to  the  rest 
of  the  country.  For  example,  we  found  in  the  45  targeted  areas,  12.2  percent  of 
households  have  requested  coupons  compared  with  12.8  percent  for  the  rest  of  the 
country not targeted by NTIA and FCC. According to NTIA, similarities in request, 
redemption, and expiration rates between the 45 targeted areas and the rest of the 
country is viewed as a success. 

As the sellers of the converter boxes, retailers play a crucial role in the converter 
box subsidy program and are counted on to inform consumers about it. At the time 
of  our  review,  seven  national  retailers  were  certified  to  participate  in  the  subsidy 
program. Participating retailers are obligated to, among other things, train employ-
ees  on  the  purpose  and  operation  of  the  subsidy  program.  All  of  the  retailers  with 
whom  we  spoke  told  us  they  were  training  employees  on  the  DTV  transition  and 
the  subsidy  program,  although  the  retailers  varied  in  which  staff  must  complete 
training. 

As part of our work, we conducted a ‘‘mystery shopper’’ study by visiting 132 ran-
domly selected retail locations in 12 cities across the United States that were listed 
as  participating  in  the  converter  box  subsidy  program.  We  did  not  alert  retailers 
that  we  were  visiting  their  stores  or  identify  ourselves  as  government  employees. 
During our visits, we engaged the retailers in conversation about the DTV transition 
and the subsidy program to determine whether the information they were providing 
to  customers  was  accurate  and  whether  individual  stores  had  coupon-eligible  con-
verter boxes available. While not required to do so, some stores we visited had infor-
mational material available and others had signs describing the DTV transition and 
the  subsidy  program.  We  also  determined  whether  the  information  that  retailers 
were  providing  to  customers  was  accurate  and  whether  individual  stores  had  cou-
pon-eligible  converter  boxes  available.  At  most  retailers  (118)  we  visited,  a  rep-
resentative  was  able  to  correctly  identify  that  the  DTV  transition  would  occur  in 
February  2009.  Additionally,  nearly  all  (126)  retailers  identified  a  coupon-eligible 
converter  box  as  an  option  available  to  consumers  to  continue  watching  television 
after  the  transition.  Besides  coupon  eligible  converter  boxes,  representatives  identi-
fied  other  options  to  continue  viewing  television  after  the  transition,  including  pur-
chasing a digital television (67) or subscribing to cable or satellite service (77). How-
ever, in rare instances, we heard erroneous information from the retailers, including 
one  representative  who  told  us  that  an  option  for  continuing  to  watch  television 
after the transition was to obtain a ‘‘cable converter box’’ from a cable company and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

43 

another representative who recommended buying an ‘‘HD tuner.’’ Since participating 
retailers are obligated to train their employees on the purpose and operation of the 
subsidy  program,  we  observed  whether  the  representative  was  able  to  explain  var-
ious aspects about the subsidy program. A vast majority of the representatives were 
able  to  explain  how  to  receive  or  apply  for  a  coupon  and  the  value  of  the  coupon. 
Although we could obtain information from the majority of the stores that we vis-
ited  and  that  were  listed  as  participating  in  the  subsidy  program,  in  a  few  in-
stances, we were not able to ask questions and observe whether the information pro-
vided was accurate. In two instances, there was no retailer at the store location list-
ed  as  a  participating  retailer  on  NTIA’s  website  (https://www.dtv2009.gov/ 
VendorSearch.aspx). In another instance, the location listed was under construction 
and  had  not  yet  opened.  In  two  additional  instances,  the  locations  listed  were  pri-
vate residences—one was an in-home electronics store, and the other was a satellite 
television installer working from a house. We asked NTIA how it ensured the accu-
racy  of  the  list  of  participating  retailers  on  its  website,  and  according  to  NTIA,  en-
suring the accuracy of the list is the responsibility of the retailers. NTIA said it pro-
vides a list of locations to each retailer prior to placing the list on the website, and 
retailers can update addresses or add new listings as warranted. 
Conclusions and Recommendation 

NTIA estimates that it will see a large increase in the number of coupon requests 
in the first quarter of 2009 and our analysis confirms that, as the transition nears, 
a  spike  in  coupon  requests  is  likely.  However,  NTIA  has  not  developed  a  plan  for 
managing  that  potential  spike  or  sustained  increase  in  coupon  demand.  The  time 
required  for  processing  coupons  has  improved  since  consumers  incurred  significant 
wait  times  to  receive  their  coupons  at  the  beginning  of  the  program,  but  until  re-
cently  NTIA  fell  short  of  its  requirement  for  processing  coupons  within  10  to  15 
days.  Given  the  relatively  low  participation  rates  to  date  and  the  amount  of  time 
it  took  to  process  the  spike  in  coupon  requests  in  the  early  days  of  the  program, 
NTIA’s  ability  to  handle  volatility  in  coupon  demand  without  a  plan  is  uncertain. 
Consequently, consumers face potential risks that they might not receive their cou-
pons before the transition and might lose their television service. 

To  help  NTIA  prepare  for  a  potential  increase  in  demand  for  converter  box  cou-
pons  and  so  that  consumers  are  not  left  waiting  a  lengthy  amount  of  time  for  re-
quested  coupons,  the  report  we  issued  September  16,  2008,  recommended  that  the 
Secretary  of  Commerce  direct  the  Administrator  of  the  NTIA  to  develop  a  plan  to 
manage  volatility  in  coupon  requests  so  that  coupons  will  be  processed  and  mailed 
within  10–15  days  from  the  day  the  coupon  applications  are  approved,  per  NTIA’s 
stated requirement. 

In  reviewing  a  draft  of  the  report,  the  Department  of  Commerce  (which  contains 
NTIA)  did  not  state  whether  it  agreed  or  disagreed  with  our  recommendation,  but 
did say the Department shares our concern about an increase in coupon demand as 
the  transition  nears.  Further,  its  letter  stated  it  is  committed  to  doing  all  that  it 
can  within  its  statutory  authority  and  existing  resources  to  ensure  that  all  Ameri-
cans  are  ready  for  the  DTV  transition.  In  its  letter,  FCC  noted  consumer  outreach 
efforts it has taken related to the DTV transition. 

Mr.  Chairman,  this  concludes  my  prepared  statement.  I  would  be  happy  to  re-
spond  to  any  questions  you  or  other  Members  of  the  Committee  may  have  at  this 
time. 

The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much, Mr. Director. 
And our final witness is the Mayor of Wilmington, the Honorable 

Bill Saffo. Mr. Mayor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL SAFFO, MAYOR, 
CITY OF WILMINGTON, NORTH CAROLINA 

Mr.  SAFFO.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Thank  you,  members  of 
the Committee. Thank you for the opportunity to share the City of 
Wilmington’s perspective on being the first in the country to make 
the  DTV  switch.  It  is  an  honor  to  be  invited  here  to  speak.  My 
name  is  Bill  Saffo,  and  I  am  the  Mayor  of  the  City  of  Wilmington, 
North Carolina. 

My  office  was  contacted  on  May  6,  2008,  by  Mr.  Gary  McNair, 
General  Manager  for  WECT  TV,  the  NBC  affiliate  in  Wilmington, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

44 

inviting  me  to  attend  the  press  conference  here  in  Washington  on 
May  the  8th  announcing  that  the  City  of  Wilmington  was  chosen 
by  the  FCC  to  be  the  first  in  the  country  to  switch  from  analog  to 
digital  television.  While  I  was  excited  for  this  historical  event  to 
occur  in  our  great  city,  I  was  also  concerned  and  apprehensive 
about being the first. Would the FCC make available to us the nec-
essary resources to inform, educate, and to provide converter boxes 
for our residents by the big switch date of September 8? 

I  am  proud  to  say  that  those  concerns  were  quickly  diminished 
as  meetings  and  conversations  began  immediately  between  my  of-
fice  and  members  of  the  FCC,  Chairman  Martin,  and  the  staff  of 
Mr.  Louis  Sigalos,  Chief  of  Consumer  Affairs  and  Outreach  Divi-
sion. It was clear to me that the staff at the FCC had all intentions 
to  be  by  our  side  through  this  transition,  even  setting  up  a  local 
office  in  our  Chamber  of  Commerce.  They  outlined  their  plan  to 
have  an  FCC  staff  person  assigned  to  each  of  the  five  counties  in-
volved  in  this  digital  transition.  That  representative  then  worked 
with  local  government  officials,  broadcasters,  community  and  busi-
ness  leaders,  and  the  public  at  large  to  saturate  each  county  with 
information on this coming event. Through their resources, they set 
up  informational  events  at  our  local  festivals,  farmers’  markets, 
senior  centers,  churches,  civic  organizations,  low-income  apart-
ments,  and  the  Department  of  Social  Services.  They  truly  seemed 
to  be  everywhere  educating  our  residents  and  answering  their 
questions. 

I  also  want  to  thank  the  various  retailers  who  planned  accord-
ingly to have plenty of converter boxes in stock and staff members 
who were knowledgeable and able to assist the public with answers 
to  their  questions.  Our  local  broadcasters  also  played  another  key 
role as they frequently advertised informative commercials remind-
ing the viewers of the big switch date happening in Wilmington on 
September 8. I feel that the collaborative effort of this private-pub-
lic  partnership  was  a  key  component  to  the  success  of  this  event. 
Another  important  segment  in  our  community  that  they  met 
with  was  the  emergency  management  teams.  Being  in  hurricane 
alley, it was vital that this group was informed and their concerns 
addressed.  Many  residents  depend  on  the  use  of  battery-powered 
analog TVs as their means of obtaining critical information after a 
hurricane  event.  Both  residents  and  emergency  management  per-
sonnel  expressed  apprehension  about  turning  off  the  analog  signal 
while  in  the  middle  of  our  hurricane  season.  The  FCC  addressed 
those  concerns  by  telling  us  that  in  the  event  of  an  approaching 
hurricane,  first,  they  would  not  make  the  switch,  and  second,  that 
they would give our local broadcasters the ability to switch over to 
an  analog  signal  in  the  event  of  a  hurricane.  I  must  compliment 
the  FCC  and  especially  Chairman  Kevin  Martin  for  their  foresight 
as  these  two  things  eased  the  concerns  of  our  emergency  manage-
ment folks, as well as our citizens. 

The other main concern in our area was making contact with the 
elderly and those who depend solely on the over-the-air TV signals 
through the use of rabbit ears and/or roof-top antennas. The overall 
education  and  public  awareness  by  our  local  broadcasters  and  the 
FCC  was  outstanding  and  yet,  for  all  of  the  public  outreach  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

45 

education, we still had residents that went dark after 12 o’clock on 
September 8, at noon. 

It  was  reported  to  me  that  predominantly  the  vast  majority  of 
the  calls  first  received  right  after  the  switch  were  seniors  who  ei-
ther  did  not  want  to  even  try  to  install  the  converter  box  or  they 
attempted  to  install  the  box  but  were  not  finding  success.  It  also 
appears that many of these callers were not scanning the channels 
after they installed their box or they would need to perform an ad-
ditional  scan  after  the  big  switch  at  noon  in  order  to  receive  all  of 
the channels. Many sons, daughters, and neighbors have been call-
ing to request assistance for an elderly community member. 

As  of  September  15,  the  City  of  Wilmington  had  over  300  calls. 
80  percent  needed  technical  assistance  with  their  boxes  over  the 
telephone, while the other 20 percent needed more in-depth help of 
a home visit from the fire department. We have also been very suc-
cessful using our fire personnel to help those needing technical as-
sistance  with  their  converter  boxes  and  at  the  same  time  having 
our fire personnel check for working smoke alarms. We found most 
residents, who might be apprehensive with a stranger, were willing 
to let the firemen into their homes. 

Another  surprise  to  us  was  that,  in  fact,  after  some  time,  many 
of our callers were not the elderly or the disabled looking for assist-
ance, but were coming from the general public at large. 

A  key  component,  I  believe,  to  our  success  was  conducting  soft 
tests  within  our  market.  One  was  a  1-minute  test,  and  the  other 
was  a  5-minute  test,  which  alerted  viewers  if  they  were  not 
equipped to view digital programming. Getting the information out 
to  the  public  early  on  was  very  important.  Having  information 
available to the general public through many resources and at var-
ious  locations  throughout  our  community  and  throughout  the  five- 
county  area  was  very  important.  Collaborative  efforts  from  all 
areas  of  the  marketplace,  broadcasters,  the  FCC  staff,  retailers, 
government officials, were extremely important. And in conjunction 
with New Hanover County, a television and computer recycling day 
was held on August 30, which was also very beneficial. 

Problems  experienced  in  Wilmington  post  switch  were  that  we 
had too many callers for one staff person in the City of Wilmington. 
Most  callers  had  properly  installed  the  converter  boxes,  yet  were 
unaware of the need to run the autoscan, which is a very important 
item.  Callers  were  contacting  the  one  designated  help  line  to  re-
quest  assistance  in  setting  up  their  secondary  televisions  within 
their  residence,  resulting  in  calls  that  were  not  an  immediate  pri-
ority,  unlike  the  households  who  were  not  receiving  any  reception 
at all. 

And  in  a  small  sector  of  our  population,  there  were  still  some 
that  could  not  afford  the  converter  box  even  with  a  coupon.  The 
FCC  grant  money  was  designated  for  specific  use  and  was  not 
available  to  be  used  at  the  discretion  of  the  local  municipalities  to 
assist  this  very  small  group  of  the  population  that  could  not  even 
afford the converter box. 

Suggestions to other markets. My suggestion would be to inform 
the  public  to  act  early  and  not  to  wait  as  coupons  take  time  to  re-
ceive.  Have  a  staff  of  individuals  trained  in  both  the  technology 
and  the  installation  of  the  converter  boxes  ready  to  handle  the  in-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

46 

flux  of  calls.  The  general  public  wanted  to  speak  directly  to  some-
one  immediately,  not  a  voice  mail  or  busy  signal  resulting  in  frus-
tration, as you can imagine. 

And  encourage  local  government  offices  to  apply  for  grant  fund-
ing through the FCC to be used for fuel and other costs associated 
with resolving problems after the switch to digital signals. We have 
had  tremendous  success  with  our  local  fire  departments  in  getting 
personnel  out  to  those  properties  and  to  those  people  that  needed 
to  have  that  assistance,  especially  the  elderly  and  low-income 
neighborhoods  that  really  treasured  that  assistance  from  our  local 
fire  department.  And  it  was  a  great  initiative  on  our  behalf  to  get 
those folks out there. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Saffo follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. BILL SAFFO, MAYOR, 

CITY OF WILMINGTON, NORTH CAROLINA 

Good afternoon Mr. Chairman and Members of the Committee. Thank you for the 
opportunity  to  share  the  City  of  Wilmington’s  perspective  on  being  the  first  in  the 
country  to  make  the  DTV  switch.  It  is  an  honor  to  be  invited  here  to  speak  today. 
My  name  is  Bill  Saffo  and  I  am  the  Mayor  of  the  City  of  Wilmington,  North  Caro-
lina. 

My  office  was  contacted  on  May  6,  2008,  by  Mr.  Gary  McNair,  General  Manager 
for  WECT  TV  in  Wilmington,  inviting  me  to  attend  the  press  conference  here  in 
Washington  on  May  8  announcing  that  the  City  of  Wilmington  was  chosen  by  the 
FCC to be the first in the country to switch from analog to digital television. While 
I was excited for this historical event to occur in our great city, I was also concerned 
that  being  the  first,  would  the  FCC  make  available  to  us  the  necessary  resources 
to inform, educate and to provide converter boxes to our residents by the Big Switch 
date of September 8? 

I  am  proud  to  say  that  those  concerns  were  quickly  diminished  as  meetings  and 
conversations  began  immediately  between  my  office  and  members  of  the  FCC, 
Chairman  Martin,  and  the  staff  of  Mr.  Louis  Sigalos,  Chief  of  Consumer  Affairs  & 
Outreach  Division.  It  was  clear  to  me  that  the  staff  of  the  FCC  had  all  intentions 
to be by our side through this transition, even setting up a local office in our Cham-
ber  of  Commerce.  They  outlined  their  plan  to  have  a  FCC  staff  person  assigned  to 
each of the five counties involved in this digital transition. That representative then 
worked with local government officials, broadcasters, community and business lead-
ers, and the public at large to saturate each county with information on this coming 
event.  Through  their  resources,  they  set  up  informational  events  at  our  local  fes-
tivals,  farmer’s  market,  senior  centers,  churches,  civic  organizations,  low-income 
apartments  and  the  department  of  social  services.  They  truly  seemed  to  be  every-
where educating our residents and answering their questions. 

I also want to thank the various retailers who planned accordingly to have plenty 
of converter boxes in stock and staff members who were knowledgeable and able to 
assist the public with answers to their questions. Our local broadcasters also played 
another  key  role  as  they  frequently  advertised  informative  commercials  reminding 
their  viewers  of  the  Big  Switch  date  happening  in  Wilmington  on  September  8.  I 
feel  that  the  collaborative  effort  of  this  private—public  partnership  was  a  key  com-
ponent to the success of this event. 

Another  important  segment  in  our  community  that  they  met  with  was  our  emer-
gency management teams. Being in hurricane alley, it was vital that this group was 
also  informed  and  their  concerns  addressed.  Many  residents  depend  on  the  use  of 
battery  powered  analog  TV’s  as  their  means  of  obtaining  critical  information  after 
a hurricane event. Both residents and emergency management personnel expressed 
apprehension  about  turning  off  the  analog  signal  while  in  the  middle  of  our  hurri-
cane  season.  The  FCC  addressed  those  concerns  by  telling  us  that  in  the  event  of 
an approaching hurricane—— 

First  they  would  not  make  the  switch  and  second  that  they  would  give  our  local 
broadcasters the ability to switch over to analog signal. I must compliment the FCC 
and  Chairman  Martin  for  their  foresight  as  these  two  things  eased  the  concerns  of 
our emergency management folks as well as our citizens. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

47 

The  other  main  concern  in  our  area  was  making  contact  with  the  elderly  and 
those  who  depend  solely  on  over-the-air  TV  signals  through  the  use  of  rabbit  ears 
and  roof-top  antennas.  The  overall  education  and  public  awareness  by  our  local 
broadcasters  and  the  FCC  was  outstanding  and  yet,  for  all  of  the  public  outreach 
and  education,  we  still  had  residents  that  went  dark  on  September  8  at  noon.  It 
was  reported  to  me  that  predominately  the  vast  majority  of  the  calls  first  received 
right  after  the  switch  were  seniors  who  either  did  not  want  to  even  try  to  install 
the converter box or they attempted to install the box but were not finding success. 
It also appears that many of these callers were not scanning the channels after they 
installed their box or, that they would need to perform an additional scan after the 
Big Switch at noon in order to receive all the channels. Many sons, daughters, and 
neighbors have been calling to request assistance for an elderly community member. 
As of September 15, the City of Wilmington had over 300 calls, 80 percent needed 
technical  assistance  with  their  boxes  over  the  phone,  while  the  other  20  percent 
needed  more  in-depth  help  of  a  home  visit  from  the  fire  department.  We  have  also 
been very successful using our fire personnel to help those needing technical assist-
ance  with  their  converter  boxes  and  at  the  same  time,  having  our  fire  personnel 
check for working smoke alarms. We found most residents, who might be apprehen-
sive with a stranger, were willing to let firemen into their homes. Another surprise 
to  us  was  that,  in  fact,  after  some  time,  many  of  our  callers  were  not  the  elderly 
or disabled looking for assistance but were the general public at large. 

Key components to our success were: 
• Conducting soft tests within our market—one was a 1 minute test and the other 
was  a  5  minute  test—which  alerted  viewers  if  they  were  not  equipped  to  view 
digital programming. 

• Getting the information out to the public early on. 
• Having information available to the general public through many resources and 

at various locations. 

• Collaborative efforts from all areas of the marketplace—broadcasters, FCC staff, 

retailers, government officials. 

• In  conjunction  with  New  Hanover  County,  a  ‘‘Television  and  Computer  Recy-

cling Day’’ was held on August 30. 
Problems Experienced in Wilmington: 
• Post Switch—too many callers for one staff person. 
• Most callers had properly installed the converter boxes yet were unaware of the 

need to run autoscan. 

• Callers were contacting the one designated helpline to request assistance in set-
ting  up  their  ‘‘secondary  televisions’’  within  their  residence;  resulting  in  calls 
that were not an immediate priority unlike the households who were not receiv-
ing any reception at all. 

• In  a  small  sector  of  our  population,  there  were  still  some  that  could  not  afford 

the converter box even with a coupon. 

• The FCC grant money was designated for specific use and was not available to 
be  used  at  the  discretion  of  the  local  municipalities  to  assist  this  small  group 
of the population. 

Suggestions to other markets: 
• Inform the public to act early not to wait as coupons take time to receive. 
• Have  a  staff  of  individuals  trained  in  both  the  technology  and  the  installation 

of the converter boxes ready to handle the influx of calls. 

• The  general  public  wanted  to  speak  directly  to  someone  immediately,  not  a 

voice mail or busy signal; resulting in frustration. 

• Encourage  local  governmental  offices  to  apply  for  grant  funding  through  the 
FCC to be used for fuel and other costs associated with resolving problems after 
the switch to digital signals. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Mayor. 
I now recognize Senator Dorgan. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

48 

STATEMENT OF HON. BYRON L. DORGAN, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NORTH DAKOTA 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much,  and  let 
me  thank  all  five  of  you.  I  was  not  here  for  Chairman  Martin’s 
presentation, but thank you for the work you are all doing with re-
spect to the transition. 

I confess I am pretty nervous about this transition. They did this 
in  England,  as  you  know,  over  a  rather  lengthy  period  of  time, 
staged it over a long period of time. 

And  I  want  to  ask  you  a  couple  of  questions  about  Wilmington, 
if  I  might,  described  I  think,  Mr.  Mayor,  as  a  success.  But  just  on 
one  day  just  with  a  snap  of  the  fingers,  we  are  converting  in  this 
country. And in Wilmington, which was a test area, 4 months prior 
to the test, the FCC, the NTIA, and the industry began preparing. 
Chairman  Martin,  you  indicated  you  had  staff  on  the  ground  in 
every  county.  They  attended  more  than  400  outreach  events,  dis-
tributed  85,000  publications.  I  think  you  made  five  personal  visits 
to the Wilmington area to raise public awareness. 

The  fact  is  that  will  not  happen  anywhere  else  in  the  country, 
and  I  think  while  it  appears  that  Wilmington  succeeded  with  that 
major kind of effort, nowhere else in America will that effort exist. 
And  still  you  had  nearly  2,000  telephone  calls  in  the  several  days 
afterwards,  which  I  assume  would  overwhelm  anything  that  we 
have established on a national scale. 

So, Chairman Martin, do you see the test area—and I think this 
is  the  only  one  you  are  going  to  do  this  way.  I  think  maybe  there 
should  be  more,  but  do  you  see  this  test  area  as  a  success  that 
demonstrates  the  potential  for  success  early  next  year  when  we 
convert? 

Mr. MARTIN. Well, first, I think it is important—and as I said in 
my testimony, I do not think you can judge the success of what oc-
curred  in  Wilmington  based  on  what  happened  last  week.  Ulti-
mately,  whether  this  is  a  success  or  not  is  whether  we  are  going 
to  learn  lessons  that  we  can  put  in  place  so  that  it  is  successful 
next  February.  So  the  success  in  Wilmington  or  not  will  be  judged 
by what happens next February. 

So, on the one hand, I would say that we may not be able to com-
pletely  replicate  everything  that  occurred  in  Wilmington,  but  we 
are  going  to  be  able  to  do  a  significant  amount.  We  have  already 
visited  thousands  of  senior  centers  around  the  country.  We  have 
made  thousands  of  presentations  around  the  country.  In  addition, 
I think you have to put in context that what we were doing to edu-
cate the people in Wilmington was unique because the folks in Wil-
mington  were  not  able  to  take  advantage  of  any  of  the  nationwide 
education  efforts  that  are  being  put  forth  by  the  industry,  the 
broadcasters, the cable industry, the consumer electronics industry. 
All  of  those  educational  efforts  were  geared  toward  next  February. 
So those are efforts that the rest of the country is going to be able 
to take advantage of. 

Senator DORGAN. If you were to estimate today, when we do the 
transition  at  that  moment,  how  many  people  in  this  country  will 
essentially  go  dark  and  not  have  gotten  a  converter  box  or  not  be 
able  to  get  a  signal—as  I  understand  it,  we  also  have  some  digital 
cliff  issues,  which  I  will  ask  you  about  in  a  moment.  But  if  you 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

49 

were  to  estimate  the  number  of  Americans  that  you  think  we  will 
not reach or will not take appropriate action to get a converter box, 
do you have any notion of how many Americans that will be? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  I  think  it  is  very  difficult  to  estimate.  The  aware-
ness  among  consumers  today  has  increased  dramatically,  from 
about  35  to  40  percent  a  year  ago  to  over  80  percent  today.  Some 
estimate over 90. In Wilmington, as we were approaching the tran-
sition,  the  NAB  had  done  a  survey  and  they  said  that  97  percent 
of  the  people  were  aware  of  the  transition.  The  number  of  people 
who  were  unaware  was  very  low  in  Wilmington  as  a  result  of  the 
education  efforts,  and  I  think  that  the  education  efforts  hopefully 
will be as successful around the country. There will always be some 
few number of people who may not be aware. 

Senator DORGAN. I think the issue is to drill down on awareness. 
Being  aware  and  understanding  are  two  very  different  concepts.  I 
mean,  somebody  might  be  aware  of  something  happening,  but  un-
derstanding  what  is  going  to  happen  and  what  they  might  be  re-
quired to do to respond to it is something different. 

Let me ask on the issue of the converter boxes. We have put out 
$40  certificates.  My  understanding  is  most  converter  boxes  are 
costing  $60,  although  there  is  a  $40  converter  box  on  the  market 
I am told that is not widely available. Tell me if there is a $40 box 
on the market, why is it not widely available. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  It  took  a  little  while  for  the  $40  box  to  become 
available.  But  I  agree  with  you.  I  think  the  consumer  electronics 
retailer outlets need to be carrying the lowest available box that is 
currently on the market, that is available in the marketplace. And 
I  have  written  to  the  consumer  electronics  companies  and  their 
representatives  and  said  that  they  need  to  be  carrying  the  $40 
boxes. I do not understand why they would not be carrying that as 
an option for consumers on the low end. 

Senator  DORGAN.  What  percent  of  them  are  now  carrying  the 

boxes? I understand it is hard to find. 

Mr. MARTIN. None of them are carrying them. 
Senator  DORGAN.  None  of  them.  So,  again,  I  do  not  understand 
that. If we are giving out $40 coupons and most people are having 
to pay $60 for a converter box, and yet there is a $40 box available 
but not made available in the marketplace, why? 

Ms.  BAKER.  I  will  speak  to  that.  Actually  the  box  is  available  in 
169 stores, according to our contractor, as of this week. I think you 
are  right.  It  is  an  important  market  pressure  to  bring  the  market 
prices of the other boxes down as well, and it is important to have 
it available in the marketplace. We are pleased to see it. 

The  boxes  have  several  different  permissive  features,  and  so  I 
think  this  is  an  important  one  on  the  price  feature.  But  there  are 
34  analog  pass-through  boxes  that  are  available,  widely  available 
in  the  market,  that  many  consumers  will  want  to  purchase.  There 
are  some  that  have  a  smart  antenna,  which  I  also  think  is  an  im-
portant  interface.  There  are  some  that  have  enhanced  closed  cap-
tions for the hearing impaired and some that have a video descrip-
tion which are to assist visually impaired customers. There are 150 
boxes  out  there.  I  think  it  is  important  for  all  of  these  boxes  to  be 
out  there,  and  I  am  pleased  to  see  the  market  working  and  the 
prices of these things coming down. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

50 

Senator  DORGAN.  Well,  but  are  they  coming  down?  If  most  of 
them  are  being  sold  at  $60,  that  is  50  percent  more  than  the  $40 
box that most Americans do not have access to. 

Ms. BAKER. There are some now that are available at $44. There 
are  some  at  $59.  There  are  some  that  are  free  shipping  when  you 
use  the  phone  option.  If  you  order  them  on  the  phone,  they  will 
ship  them  to  you  for  free.  There  are  various  market  aspects  that 
are covering various parts of the constituencies. 

Senator DORGAN. Let me just give you a North Dakota example. 
In North Dakota, 52,900 coupons have been requested, 21,000 have 
been  used,  and  13,000  have  expired.  Almost  14,000  have  expired. 
What is going to happen with the expired coupons, and why do you 
think  so  few  of  the  many  coupons,  52,000  requested,  21,000  re-
deemed? Why so few redeemed and what is going to happen to the 
expired coupons? 

Ms. BAKER. We are actually pleased with the redemption rate of 
coupons.  Many  coupon  programs  you  see  are  in  the  single-digit  re-
demption  rate.  So  we  are  pleased  with  the  redemption  rates  and 
they  do  seem  to  be  creeping  up,  which  we  also  think  is  important. 
I  have  actually  sat  out  at  our  call  center,  and  when  people  call 
for  coupons,  they  typically  order  two.  We  might  have  thought  that 
they  might  have  ordered  one,  but  they  typically  order  two.  And  it 
is  more  about  ‘‘how  many  can  I  have’’,  as  opposed  to  ‘‘how  many 
do I need?’’ So I think that may attribute to why we are seeing two 
being ordered instead of just one. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  would  encourage  you  to  do  some  review  of 
that,  perhaps  some  surveys  and  so  on,  to  try  to  understand  that 
number  because  my  understanding  is  that  the  coupons  that  have 
expired will not be renewed. Is that correct? 

Ms.  BAKER.  They  will  not  be  reissued,  but  importantly,  the 
money for those coupons is put back into the pot of money that will 
be  recycled  and  more  coupons  will  be  sent  out  from  those  coupons 
that are not redeemed. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Mr.  Goldstein,  if  you  are  among  those  of  us 
who  are  worried  about  coming  up  to  a  date  and  just  turning  the 
switch—they did not do that in England, as I said, and I have read 
some  about  what  the  experience  was  in  England.  If  you  are  one  of 
those  that  is  worried  about  problems  in  the  days  following  that, 
what  do  you  estimate  to  be  the  problems  that  will  be  most  con-
fronted? 

Mr. GOLDSTEIN. Senator Dorgan, we have talked, in the last cou-
ple  of  months  as  we  have  issued  reports,  about  a  number  of  dif-
ferent  problems.  One,  of  course,  is  awareness  and  the  number  of 
OTA households. 

You  asked  a  few  minutes  ago  about  the  difference  between  Wil-
mington  and  the  United  States  as  a  whole.  Wilmington  has  an 
over-the-air  population  of  only  about  7  percent,  where  the  Nation 
is  at  about  15  percent  based  on  our  consumer  survey.  So  roughly 
double.  So  you  have  to  extrapolate  to  some  extent  the  amount  of 
problems  that  were  faced  in  Wilmington  and  imagine  what  that 
might mean to the United States overall. 

We  have  reported  about  consumer  problems,  even  though  there 
is a considerable range of consumer awareness efforts ongoing from 
the  private  and  the  public  sector.  We  have  also  talked  about  some 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

51 

technical  issues  over  time,  including  issues  related  to  the  same 
kinds  of  things  that  have  occurred  in  Wilmington,  coverage  areas, 
inability  to  get  the  boxes  up  and  running,  need  of  assistance,  in-
ability to understand what is happening and when. We found a va-
riety  of  problems  of  those  kinds  of  nature.  Antenna  problems  also 
we have raised. 

There  is  a  lot  of  different  problems  that  are  going  to  affect  both 
the  consumer  side  and  the  broadcast  side  as  we  get  closer  to  the 
date. Not all parts of the country, not all broadcasters at this point 
have their towers in the order that they need to be. There are still 
many issues that are unresolved. 

Senator  DORGAN.  I  am  just  curious.  Has  anybody  on  the  panel 

hooked up a converter box? 

Ms. BAKER. I have. A lot of them. 
Senator DORGAN. You have? 
Ms. BAKER. Yes, sir. 
Senator DORGAN. Successfully? 
Ms. BAKER. They are actually very simple. 
Senator DORGAN. Are they simple? 
Ms.  BAKER.  They  are  designed  to  be  very  simple.  I  understand 
that  they  can  be  technically  challenging,  but  you  know,  putting 
batteries  in  a  remote  control  can  sometimes  be  technically  chal-
lenging.  So  TV  is  personal  and  a  lot  of  the  communities,  the  vul-
nerable  communities  that  we  are  reaching  out  to,  the  elderly,  the 
rural, the disabled, the minorities, the low-incomes, these folks are 
not technically savvy and they do need assistance. It is a challenge. 
That  is  why  we  encourage  people  to  really  act  early  and  try  these 
boxes out, try to hook them up early. 

Senator  DORGAN.  One  of  the  reasons  I  ask  the  question  is  I  was 
asked  to  unplug  a  dishwasher  at  home  last  evening,  and  the  in-
struction manual said that was easy as well. I am lucky I am still 
not working on it. 

Mr. SAFFO. Senator? 
Senator DORGAN. Yes? 
Mr.  SAFFO.  One  thing  we  did  experience  when  we  did  have  the 
boxes that were connected successfully, sometimes the antennas, if 
they had antennas on the roof, had to be adjusted. Now, obviously, 
since  Wilmington  is  a  pretty  flat  area—it  is  in  the  coastal  plain  of 
southeastern  North  Carolina—if  you  get  into  a  mountainous  area, 
you  get  into  an  area  which  is  a  highly  urbanized  area  with  a  lot 
of  buildings  or  a  hilly  area,  you  might  have  some  difficulty  in  the 
adjustment of those antennas. 

Senator  DORGAN.  Would  the  FCC  provide  for  the  Committee’s 
benefit the digital cliff areas? Or do you know where the cliff areas 
are where there will be some areas where the antenna will simply 
fail to pick up a signal once the conversion happens? 

Mr. MARTIN. One of the benefits of doing the test in Wilmington 
was to identify exactly where that digital cliff is and the impact of 
where  viewers  used  to  be  able  to  get  a  signal  and  then  were  no 
longer able to. 

I  think  that  there  are  two  different  issues  that  occurred  in  Wil-

mington that people should be aware of. 

I  should  just  say,  Senator,  for  the  record  I  am  nervous  about 
what  is  going  to  occur  in  February  as  well.  We  are  doing  all  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

52 

we  can  to  minimize  that  burden,  but  that  does  not  mean  I  do  not 
think everyone up here is nervous and concerned about it. 

But  the  bigger  problem  in  Wilmington  was  not  actually  the  re-
sult of the digital cliff. It was actually a result of one of the analog 
stations  shrinking  its  coverage  area  and  resulting  in  viewers  who 
used to be able to have coverage no longer having it because of the 
shrinking of that coverage area. That was a much more significant 
problem  in  Wilmington  than  the  digital  cliff.  It  was  only  several 
hundred  people  in  Wilmington,  but  the  people  that  were  impacted 
by the shrinking of the coverage was a much more significant prob-
lem. 

Senator  DORGAN.  The  reason  I  ask  that  question  is  the  topog-
raphy  of  Wilmington  is  rather  flat.  In  many  parts  of  the  country, 
you are going to have contoured land, and I am just curious wheth-
er that is going to affect what is called the digital cliff. 

But  if  you  will  submit  whatever  information  the  FCC  can  to  us, 

that would be very helpful, with respect to this digital cliff. 

Mr. MARTIN. Of course. 
Senator DORGAN. Mr. Chairman, thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Wicker? 

STATEMENT OF HON. ROGER F. WICKER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MISSISSIPPI 

Senator WICKER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Obviously,  there  has  been  quite  a  bit  of  testimony  that  I  have 

I  appreciate  the  fact  that  we  have  concerns  today  about  the  el-
derly and their ability to participate in this transition. I am mind-
ful  of  the  fact  that  they  rely,  I  think  to  a  greater  extent,  on  tele-
vision for much of their information and much of it is over-the-air. 
I  also  appreciate  the  benefit  of  the  experience  that  we  received 

missed. 

from Wilmington. 

of Wilmington be? 

Wilmington  is  a  medium-sized  city.  What  would  the  population 

tive to us. 

Mr.  SAFFO.  Mr.  Wicker,  it  is  100,000  within  the  city  limits  and 
187,000  total  within  the  county  of  New  Hanover,  which  is  the  sec-
ond smallest county in North Carolina. 

Senator  WICKER.  Was  the  entire  county  part  of  this  experiment? 
Mr.  SAFFO.  Yes,  sir.  Not  only  including  New  Hanover  County, 
but also Brunswick County, Pender County, Columbus, and Bladen 
County. There were five counties all together. 

Senator WICKER. Well, I am sure that experience will be instruc-

I  wonder,  Secretary  Carbonell,  if  you  have  any  information  spe-
cific  to  the  elderly  in  rural  communities  and  if  there  is  anything 
you can share with the Committee about that. 

Ms.  CARBONELL.  Well,  particularly  our  experience  on  the 
ground—obviously, the aging services network which are the actual 
providers  that  are  on  the  ground,  over  29,000  organizations,  are 
very  knowledgeable  of  the  area  that  they  serve,  know  the  clients, 
serve them in the majority of instances every day. 

We  went  through  a  similar  historic  experience,  just  in  numbers 
of people, with the Medicare Part D prescription drug roll-out. And 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

53 

it  was  a  complicated  matter  in  which  people  needed  to  look  at  the 
options  available  and  choose  the  plans  that  best  met  their  needs, 
which is similar to this situation because it is particular to the tele-
vision  set  that  they  own  right  now,  whether  they  have  rabbit  ears 
or they have a roof antenna. 

So  the  issues  that  we  have  been  seeing  across  the  country  in 
those  that  have  requested—we  are  prioritizing  to  make  sure  that 
our  network  prioritizes  and  serves  and  reaches  out  to  those  that 
are  homebound,  people  that  we  are  serving  right  now,  providing 
home care, home-delivered meals. And that we are not only taking 
that  information  out,  but  that  we  are  asking  some  of  the  actual 
home  care  workers  to  look  at  the  kind  of  television  set  that  these 
people have and assist them as they need to get the coupons, com-
plete  the  application,  and  then  make  sure  that  when  that  box 
comes, if that person needs additional assistance, that there will be 
somebody,  either  a  staff  person  that  goes  into  the  home  to  do  the 
home care or a volunteer that delivers the meal or a volunteer from 
the community, just like you had in Wilmington where you had the 
fire  department,  the  firemen  actually  helping,  emergency  rescue. 
These  are  folks  that  are  working  with  our  aging  network  day  in 
and day out in our communities. 

But  the  most  important  thing  is  to  make  sure  that  we  identify 
those pockets and target those people. So the work that we are fine 
tuning now, in coordination with the NTIA and FCC, really focuses 
on  those  target  areas  that  are  identified  as  either  low  enrollment 
or  high  concentrations  of  elderly  people,  similar  to  the  mapping 
that we did for low-income subsidy under Medicare in areas where 
the enrollment efforts were much lower. So we are targeting, trying 
to sift that information together, and matching it with our commu-
nity providers, and being able to get that assistance on the ground 
with the rest of the coalition members that are present in the com-
munity,  which  encompass  the  Rotary  Club,  other  civic  organiza-
tions. And actually, there has been a lot of participation with local 
television  stations  and  broadcasters  and  also  retailers  in  assisting 
with this. 

Senator WICKER. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman. 

Thank you for holding this hearing. 

And  thank  you,  Mr.  Mayor,  for  having  this  experiment  occur  in 
your city. I am sure it was not easy. And I am glad you have some 
good things to report. 

I  just  wanted  to  follow  up  what  Senator  Wicker  was  saying.  It 
is  my  understanding  of  the  houses  that  just  had  the  traditional 
rabbit ears, something like 14,000—is that right? 

Mr.  SAFFO.  That  is  about  right  in  the  five-county  area.  Yes, 

ma’am. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And there were about 700—and we can talk 
with Chairman Martin about this, but 700 concerns raised or com-
plaints afterward. Is that right? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

54 

Mr. SAFFO. In the jurisdiction that I represent, the calls that we 
received there at the fire department—and that was the folks that 
we used to address the issues—was about 300. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. So 300. 
Mr. SAFFO. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  And  do  you  know  where  that  number  700 

came from? 

Mr. MARTIN. The 700 number was the first-day calls we received. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. The first day calls. 
Mr.  MARTIN.  We  received  about  2,000  in  total,  but  700  on  the 

first day. That is probably where you got that number. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Very good. Thank you. And while the num-
ber  seems  small,  when  you  look  at  my  State,  there  are  430,000 
households  that  rely  exclusively  on  over-the-air  television.  That  is 
more  than  20  percent  of  the  households  in  my  State.  So  you  can 
see  if  you  add  that  up,  it  is  more  than  just  hundreds  where  there 
is going to be an issue. 

And I appreciate, Chairman Martin, you saying that you are con-
cerned about the fact that it is going to be less than 150 days from 
today we are going to be converting over. 

So I just want to follow up—I know you talked about this briefly, 
Chairman  Martin—about  some  of  the  issues  that  went  wrong  that 
need  to  be  fixed.  And  I  remember  at  the  earlier  hearing  we  talked 
about this digital cliff, and I am just picturing in February in Min-
nesota—have you ever been on a roof with an antenna in February 
in Minnesota, Chairman Martin? 
Mr. MARTIN. Not in February. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  It  is  going  to  be  just  a  little  bit  different 
than  the  mayor’s  jurisdiction.  So  it  is  not  an  optimal  time  to  sud-
denly learn that you have to upgrade your antenna. 

So could you talk a little bit about the digital cliff? And then we 
will go to this other issue of the analog signal contours. But if you 
could  talk  first  about  that  and  what  we  need  to  do  about  that  and 
what it means. 

Mr. MARTIN. What it means is that in general most people, when 
you  switch  from  analog  to  digital,  will  receive  a  better  picture,  an 
improved  quality  picture.  Digital  pictures  are  either  on  or  off, 
whereas  analog  signals  fade  gradually  over  distance.  So  if  you  get 
a digital signal, it is a clearer picture, but there are certain people 
who  would  have  gotten  a  fuzzy  analog  picture  before,  but  will  be 
unable to get a digital signal as a result. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And that is the digital cliff? 
Mr.  MARTIN.  That  is  right.  And  in  general,  when  people  talk 
about the differences in topography or whether it is an urban area 
with the urban canyons or mountains, if you are getting a clear sig-
nal  today,  a  clear  analog  signal,  you  should  be  able  to  get  a  clear 
digital signal. Our engineers estimate that the digital cliff will im-
pact  about  one  percent  of  people,  but  that  is  still  not  an  insignifi-
cant  amount  when  you  talk  about  a  significant  number  of  people 
throughout  the  country.  When  we  talked  about  this  the  last  time, 
that  was  my  estimate.  It  is  about  one  percent  of  households  that 
we estimate, based upon what happened in the U.K. and our engi-
neering estimates, that will suffer from this digital cliff. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

55 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And how do they know they are going to be 

one of those people? 

Mr. MARTIN. Unfortunately, they are all going to be on the edges 
of  the  contours.  So  if  you  are  receiving  an  analog  signal  that  is 
fuzzy today on certain channels, then that would be a channel you 
might not be able to receive. 

But one of the difficult things about the digital cliff effect is that 
today—and  it  will  be  the  same  case  after  the  switch—each  broad-
caster’s  footprint  is  different.  So  you  may  have  the  digital  cliff  ef-
fect  for  one  channel  but  not  for  the  other.  So  if  you  receive  four 
broadcast channels over the air, you may be subject to a digital cliff 
for one but not the other three. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And so then how do we fix it besides having 

you come to Minnesota and stand on the roofs? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Unfortunately,  I  think  that  is  where  you  get  into 
both  what  Mayor  Saffo  testified  to  and  Assistant  Secretary  Baker 
testified.  It  is  important  for  people,  particularly  those  in  areas 
where  it  is  going  to  be  more  difficult  for  them  to  switch  antennas 
later,  to  try  to  make  the  transition  early  so  they  can  see  whether 
or not they are going to be required to get a new antenna. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Oh,  I  see.  So  you  are  saying  make  that 
switch  early  so  that  you  can  see  if  it  is  a  problem  so  you  are  not 
suddenly stuck with it. 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Unfortunately.  We  can  identify  where  the  edges  of 
those  contours  are,  but  we  are  not  going  to  be  able  to  predict  spe-
cifically.  And  even  in  those  cases,  it  will  vary  channel  by  channel. 
But  we  will  not  be  able  to  do  it  with  as  much  specificity  as  any 
individual would need to say we can pinpoint it to this address will 
be  subject  to  a  digital  cliff  and  this  address  will  not.  It  will  be  on 
the edges of those contours. 

And it will also be outside technically of where they are required 
to  be  serving.  The  circle  that  they  are  required  to  serve  they  will 
still  be  serving.  It  will  be  the  people  that  are  just  outside  those 
edges who used to get the signal before but who are no longer able 
to. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. Then to move on to the next topic. You 
said about 15 percent of the markets around the country will expe-
rience a significant shrinkage of analog signal contours post transi-
tion. Could you explain that to us? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  What  we  have  found  was  a  much  more  significant 
problem  in  Wilmington  from  a  viewer  perspective  was  that  one  of 
the  channels  had  reached  as  far  north  from  Wilmington,  all  the 
way to Raleigh, North Carolina, and as far south as Myrtle Beach. 
Just  to  give  you  a  sense  of  distances,  it  would  be  the  same  as  if 
the  Richmond  signals  were  reaching  Baltimore.  After  the  channels 
were  converted  from  analog  to  digital,  they  were  no  longer  going 
to  reach  as  far  as  they  had  before.  That  was  actually  by  design. 
That  is  what  the  broadcaster  wanted.  He  no  longer  wanted  to  be 
serving all the way up that far. 

And  as  a  result,  the  people  that  were  in  the  Raleigh  area  and 
in the Myrtle Beach area were still going to be able to get an NBC 
affiliate from their Raleigh station or from their Myrtle Beach sta-
tion,  but  there  are  people  in  between  those  areas,  in  between  the 
two, that were then left out. And that is what is estimated will be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

56 

the folks who are unserved. It will be about 15 percent of the mar-
kets  in  the  country  that  will  have  a  broadcaster  who  is  having 
some  kind  of  a  significant  change  like  this  where  they  are  dimin-
ishing—— 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  So  they  might  again  get  some  of  the  chan-
nels  and  then  not  certain  ones  where  they  had  this  larger  con-
tour—— 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Exactly.  Fortunately,  on  that,  what  we  are  trying 
to identify now is a way to be able to—and what I have asked our 
engineers to do, based upon what we did in Wilmington, is both in 
Wilmington  and  throughout  the  rest  of  the  country,  identify  ways 
in  which  you  can  put  either  translator  or  repeater  antennas  to 
make  sure  that  there  is  no  one  who  used  to  get  a  signal  from  an 
NBC  affiliate,  for  example,  in  Wilmington,  who  is  no  longer  going 
to  get  any  kind  of  a  coverage.  So  it  is  not  that  we  will  be  able  to 
carry  the  signal  all  the  way  to  Raleigh  or  all  the  way  from  Rich-
mond  to  Baltimore  in  every  instance,  but  we  can  make  sure  that 
there are not pockets of places, like there were in Wilmington that 
received no coverage afterwards. And that is why we need to iden-
tify  where  those  pockets  will  be  throughout  the  country  and  how 
we  authorize  those  broadcasters  to  put  in  repeater  antennas  so 
they can make sure they are covered. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. So this is kind of like when my family used 
to  drive  out  to  Wyoming  on  vacation  and  we  could  still  get  WCCO 
radio  and  hear  the  Twins  game.  We  would  keep  moving  it  and  it 
would  go  longer  and  longer.  And  what  would  happen  here  is—this 
was  a  radio  station,  but  you  are  going  to  have  it  within  the  con-
tours, but they could pick up like a sister affiliate that they did not 
have before. Is that what it will be? 

Mr. MARTIN. It could be. It is an interesting analogy. The switch 
from analog to digital in radio is going to also eliminate the ability 
to  get  those  long  distance  AM  signals  as  well.  They  can  no  longer 
bounce  off  the  atmosphere  and  you  cannot  get  those  distance  sig-
nals.  That  is  one  of  the  down  sides  of  the  switch  from  analog  to 
digital radio that will occur. So in that sense, it is very similar. 

But as is in this case, the people in Raleigh and in Myrtle Beach 
will be able to get the NBC affiliate there. But the people that are 
in  between  those  three  markets  will  be  left  out.  And  we  need  to 
find a way to get a repeater for one of those other signals there so 
they still do not lose access to—— 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  So,  would  they  have  to  pay  extra  for  that, 

or is it just trying to change the technology so we can—— 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Oh,  the  consumer  would  not  have  to.  I  am  talking 
about  getting  the  broadcasters  to  put  a  repeater  antenna.  The 
broadcaster would end up having to pay extra to put a repeater an-
tenna there. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. So, Assistant Secretary Baker—is that 

your correct title? 

Ms. BAKER. Acting. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Acting  Assistant  Secretary  Baker,  with 
what you have learned from Wilmington, can you target the adver-
tising  more  or  the  information  we  give  to  people  more  as  we  know 
where this—you know, I use the number 700 because that is what 
came in the first day or 300 complaints. We know these two issues 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

57 

that  are  going  on,  the  digital  cliff  and  the  contour  issue.  Is  there 
a way to tailor some of the communications with consumers in ad-
dition to what we are doing today? 

Ms.  BAKER.  I  think  the  entire  DTV  coalition  agrees  that  the 
problems that we see in this area need an awful lot more consumer 
education. So certainly we will be working with our partners. 

Again,  I  think  the  most  important  from  our  perspective  is  to  get 
your  box  early  and  try  it  out  to  make  sure  that  it  works,  and  if 
you  have  any  technical  challenges,  then  you  will  have  time  to—I 
mean,  it  is  important  both  from  a  technical  standpoint  as  well  as 
a  programmatic  standpoint.  We  want  to  see  people  getting  their 
boxes now. For those that are not in this area, they will enjoy dig-
ital  television  sooner,  but  for  those  who  are  in  these  areas,  then 
they  will  realize  that  they  have  a  problem  and  they  can  act  soon 
to try and fix it. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you very much. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. I thank you very much. 
Before  I  begin  my  questioning,  a  few  facts  might  help  us.  The 
United  States  has  a  population  of  about  300  million  people.  And 
about  3  years  ago  we  made  available  $5  million  for  consumer  edu-
cation  for  this  transition.  We  realized  that  maybe  that  is  not 
enough, so we added $2.5 million last year, and if we are successful 
in this appropriation process that is going on now, you may get an 
additional $20 million. $27.5 million. And this program is supposed 
to last until February 19, 2009. 

On  the  other  hand,  on  the  British  Isles,  with  a  population  of  60 
million,  they  made  available  $400  million  for  consumer  education. 
Their  program  of  transition  will  last  about  5  years  because  they 
felt  it  was  so  important  that  they  had  to  communicate  and  make 
certain  that  every  household,  bar  none,  had  information  on  this 
transition.  It  is  a  long  process,  expensive  process,  but  this  small 
country,  less  than  us,  20  percent,  decided  to  spend  that  much 
money. 

That  is  why  we  are  holding  this  hearing  here  because  we  are 
concerned  that  if  the  British  felt  that  it  took  $400  million  and  5 
years  to  carry  out  their  transition,  we  have  to  be  super  people  to 
do it with less. 

Now,  Mr.  Goldstein,  in  your  testimony  you  have  indicated  that 
there  will  be  a  dramatic  increase  or  a  spike  just  before  the  transi-
tion date. 

Mr. GOLDSTEIN. Yes, Mr. Chairman, that is likely. There is likely 
to  be  a  significant  spike.  In  our  discussion  with  NTIA,  they  have 
agreed with that as a very significant possibility. But I need to say 
that  to  this  point  in  time,  only  about  12.5  percent  of  U.S.  house-
holds  have  even  requested  a  coupon  and  only  5  percent  of  house-
holds have used one. So we have a long way to go, and while a lot 
of money has been spent by the DTV coalition and by Federal agen-
cies  to  this  date,  we  are  still  concerned  that  a  lot  of  people  who 
need a coupon will not get one in time. 

We  also  believe  that  the  expiration  rates,  particularly  among 
some  of  the  greatest  at-risk  populations,  are  fairly  high.  For  in-
stance, among seniors, the expiration rate is 43.2 percent, when for 
the  U.S.  population  as  a  whole,  it  is  only  30  percent,  and  only  8.7 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

58 

percent of seniors have requested coupons, where in the population 
as  a  whole,  it  is  12.5  percent.  So  that  at-risk  populations,  while 
messages are being sent and hopefully received, there is still some 
evidence  that  they  are  not  being  received  at  a  good  enough  pace 
yet. 

The CHAIRMAN. Are you satisfied that we have a plan to confront 

this spike or a sudden surge? 

Mr.  GOLDSTEIN.  Mr.  Chairman,  we  indicated  in  our  report  last 
week—we  made  a  recommendation  to  the  Secretary  of  Commerce 
that NTIA needed to develop a plan that would be able to deal with 
the anticipated spike. 

The CHAIRMAN. Do you believe we do have one? 
Mr. GOLDSTEIN. We did not find such a plan. No, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Secretary  Baker,  do  you  believe  that  you  can 

come up with a plan to meet this sudden spike? 

Ms. BAKER. Yes, sir. There are several parts of the plan, and we 
are  actually  going  to  put  it  down  in  writing.  We  will  be  happy  to 
submit it to you. We are currently processing about 3.2 million cou-
pons a month. We have spoken with our contractor. They can bring 
it  up  to  4.5  million  coupons  a  month.  I  do  think  that  the  backlog 
that is often referred to from the start of the program was because 
we did not send out coupons until February 17. So we had a month 
and  a  half  where  we  were  not  sending  out  coupons.  So  we  hope  to 
avoid a backlog toward the end of this program. 

What  we  really  want  to  do  is  to  encourage  people  to  act  now  so 
that  we  will  see  a  strong  and  high  demand  for  an  extended  period 
of time like we did in Wilmington. The results in Wilmington were 
terrific. It was a nice bell curve where as soon as it was announced, 
the  coupon  requests  went  up  and  then  they  came  down  now  that 
the switch has happened. 

So  we  anticipate  spikes,  particularly  as  media  increases.  A  hun-
dred  days  out  we  know  is  going  to  be  a  great  big  spike.  We  will 
continue to watch consumer demand and redemption and visit with 
the  Committee  on  all  of  our  available  data.  But  we  think  it  is  im-
portant that people apply, buy, and try now. And as you know, we 
have  also  submitted  a  request  for  $7  million  to  have  additional 
flexibility  in  our  ability  to  fund  additional  coupons  for  this  in-
creased demand. 

The CHAIRMAN. A survey was made and it found that 97 percent 
of  the  population  in  Wilmington  knew  about  the  early  transition, 
and yet the FCC received 797 calls on the first day and 1,800-plus 
calls  during  the  first  5  days.  On  a  national  level,  this  could  mean 
that you could be fielding millions of calls from confused consumers 
on or about this date, February 17, 2009. Are we prepared for that? 
Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  think  that  what  we  hope  to  be  able  to  do 
is learn some lessons from Wilmington so we can continue to mini-
mize  that.  Many  of  the  calls  that  we  received  were  not  that  they 
were not aware of it. As I indicated, we have received actually only 
about 100 calls during the whole time since September 8 from con-
sumers who said they were unaware of the early transition. 

But  there  were  problems  and  challenges  for  viewers  both  in 
terms of some of the antenna issues that I was talking about with 
Senator Klobuchar and also the fact that there were over 300 calls 
from  viewers  who  had  problems  with  their  initial  converter  box, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

59 

turning it on, scanning for channels, making sure it was hooked up 
properly to their television. 

Fortunately,  we  were  able  to  resolve  many  of  those  over  the 
phone  by  just  walking  them  through,  hooking  up  their  converter 
boxes.  But  that  is  something  that  we  now  need  to  integrate  into 
our messaging more appropriately to make sure that people under-
stand  how  the  converter  boxes  work  to  try  to  take  away  that  seg-
ment  of  the  calls  that  we  were  receiving  from  Wilmington  by  the 
time we get to next February. 

But  I  think  that  we  have  got  to  continue  also  to  find  ways  to 
minimize the problems from a technical standpoint on the antenna 
issue so we can make sure and try to address that and to minimize 
the  burden  that  is  going  to  be  placed  on  viewers,  at  least  to  the 
maximum extent we can. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Believe  me,  I  am  not  trying  to  place  blame  any-

where—— 

Mr. MARTIN. No, no. 
The  CHAIRMAN.—because  we  in  the  Congress  were  the  ones  who 
appropriated  $5  million,  and  we  are  still  holding  back.  Compared 
to the British, our appropriation is almost nothing. I am certain we 
all agree that communication is absolutely essential in a democracy 
such as ours. And I am concerned that segments of our population 
may be denied or deprived of this important element in our democ-
racy. 

Over a period of 4 months, the FCC and the industry really satu-
rated the Wilmington market, and I applaud this. According to the 
numbers I have here, there were more than 400 events, distributed 
more  than  85,000  publications,  and  Chairman  Martin,  you  made 
five visits to the city. This outreach program is laudable, but do we 
have  a  nationwide  program  to  ensure  that  they  will  get  the  same 
Wilmington treatment? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  Well,  I  think  it  is  important  to  try  to  put  into  con-
text that this was also a substitute for some of the industry efforts 
that  were  going  on  throughout  the  rest  of  the  country.  As  you 
know, the broadcasters, the cable operators, and the consumer elec-
tronics  industries  have  all  indicated  they  are  going  to  be  spending 
hundreds  of  millions  of  dollars  educating  consumers  for  the  DTV 
transition. None of those educational efforts were going to be going 
on  in  Wilmington,  and  they  will  be  ramping  up  as  we  approach  it. 
But  I  agree  that  we  need  to  take  what  we  put  in  place  in  Wil-
mington and try to build a similar kind of grassroots effort in those 
markets  where  we  have  identified  they  have  a  significant  number 
of  at-risk  viewers.  So  for  all  the  markets  in  which  there  are  more 
than  100,000  over-the-air  households  or  15  percent  of  the  viewing 
population,  we  have  actually  tried  to  identify  those  as  our  target 
markets where we are going to be doing the same kinds of Commis-
sioner visits and town hall meetings. 

We have actually put out a request for proposal with some of the 
resources, if we are able to get some additional resources from Con-
gress.  But  anticipating  that  we  might,  we  have  already  put  out  a 
request  for  proposal  for  grassroots  organizations  to  conduct  both 
the same kind of grassroots educational efforts and also potentially 
helping hook up at-risk households, as we did with the fire depart-
ment down in Wilmington. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

60 

So  we  are  trying  to  take  the  blueprint  from  what  we  did  down 
in Wilmington and at least replicate it in those 81 at-risk markets 
throughout  the  country.  It  is  not  completely  everywhere  in  the 
country,  but  we  are  doing  our  best  with  the  limited  resources  that 
we have. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  From  the  standpoint  of  the  three  officials  there, 

did we appropriate enough money? 

Mr. MARTIN. From the Commission’s standpoint, there were sev-
eral  years  even  leading  up  to  this  transition  where  we  had  asked 
for  money  and  actually  received  zero  money  for  consumer  edu-
cation.  The  initial  $5  million  that  you  had  indicated  actually  went 
to  NTIA,  and  we  had  asked  for  money  in  the  first  years  of  our 
budget  and  Congress  actually  provided  us  none  for  consumer  edu-
cation prior to this past January. 

The CHAIRMAN. Do you need some more? 
Mr. MARTIN. Yes, at least the $20 million that we have asked for, 
for  this  year.  A  significant  component  of  that  is  for  upgrading  our 
call  center.  We  increased  our  call  center  in  anticipation  of  Wil-
mington.  Several  million  dollars,  we  have  already  estimated,  will 
be needed just for the call center, and that is even if we can bring 
down  the  calls.  So  absolutely  we  are  hopeful  that  Congress  will  be 
able to provide us some additional resources. 

Ms.  BAKER.  It  appears  that  the  statutory  cap  on  administrative 
funds  is  a  little  short.  So  we  do  need  more  administrative  funds 
due  to  the  popularity  of  the  program  and  the  amount  of  coupons 
that are being requested. So certainly for administrative funds, the 
statutory  cap  of  $160  million  is  short,  is  shy  of  what  we  need, 
which is why we submitted our request. 

I think that Congress could have appropriated an awful lot more 
money  in  consumer  education,  but  you  probably  then  would  also 
have  seen  less  participation  by  the  broadcasters  and  the  cable  in-
dustry. I think they have stepped in. I think public-private partner-
ships  have  stepped  in  to  fill  the  gaps  on  the  consumer  education. 
We  have  been  grateful  for  the  creativity  of  this  committee  in  com-
ing  up  with  more  money  for  us  through  the  low  power  conversion 
fund that you gave us, $4.5 million in education. We will certainly 
use that. So certainly the money that you are giving us we will use, 
but  we  are  very  pleased  with  the  participation  from  the  industry 
on consumer education. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Assistant  Secretary  Carbonell,  do  you  have  any-

Ms.  CARBONELL.  Well,  I  think,  one  of  the  areas,  particularly  the 
vulnerable  homebound  people  will  need  help  in,  is  in  the  tech-
nology  piece,  the  actual  installation  and  connection.  Under  the 
Older Americans Act, which is the program that we run throughout 
the  country,  home  repairs  is  one  of  the  allowable  services,  but  the 
coverage for home repairs is not across the country. 

So  one  of  the  areas  that  we  have  been  working,  with  NTIA  and 
FCC  not  only  is  to  target  those  specific  messages  to  those  areas  of 
need  or  areas  where  there  is  under-enrollment  like  the  GAO  has 
mentioned,  but  also  looking  at  abilities  to  really  walk  people 
through the entire process. The grassroots—as much as we can in-
vest, hands-on, to give support to some of the local aging networks 
that  are  working  with  these  people  day  in  and  day  out  to  try  to 

thing? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

61 

assist actually those people that are most fragile. We know that 24 
percent  of  our  elderly  population  live  in  rural  areas.  The  Older 
Americans Act is serving about 27 percent of our clients out of the 
11  million  that  we  serve  on  a  yearly  basis  who  reside  in  rural 
areas.  So  again,  those  would  be  the  areas  where  we  would  defi-
nitely  benefit  from  additional  resources  and  support.  We  are  fine 
tuning  efforts  to  really  target  those  populations,  those  at  greatest 
need in that area. 

The CHAIRMAN. I believe every government entity, county, State, 
city, township, village, has some agencies handling aging problems. 
Do  you  have  any  program  to  provide  instruction  or  education  to 
those  officials  on  what  they  can  do  to  help  in  this?  Because  they 
are in daily contact with the elderly population. 

Mr. MARTIN. Through our work with the Assistant Secretary and 
HHS,  we  have  been  working  with—as  you  said,  each  State,  many 
counties and cities have their own organizations that deal with the 
aging  community,  and  we  have  been  working  with  them.  We  did 
so in Wilmington and that was critical. We also worked with other 
private  sector  groups  and  nonprofits  that  were  targeting  the  aging 
community like the Meals on Wheels program in Wilmington where 
we  both  made  sure  that  information  was  getting  through  them  to 
the  people  that  were  having  their  meals  delivered  and  then  also 
made  sure  that  those  people  had  the  opportunity  to  apply  for  the 
coupons  and  get  converter  boxes.  So  we  have  been  trying  to  work 
with  those  organizations.  That  has  been  working  through  the  As-
sistant Secretary, helping us with the contacts at the local level. 

The CHAIRMAN. Were they cooperative? 
Mr.  MARTIN.  In  general,  actually  I  would  say  that  HHS  and  the 
efforts  from  the  localized  aging  organizations  have  been  very  help-
ful. I think that has been one of the things that has been very help-
ful.  The  United  States  Postal  Service  has  been  very  helpful.  They 
put  up  posters  in  all  of  the  post  offices  throughout  the  country. 
They have done that once already. They are going to do that again 
for  us  later  on.  Those  are  two  of  the  agencies  that  have  been  the 
most helpful in trying to help us get the message out. 

The CHAIRMAN. Chairman Martin, we are going to do our best to 
make  certain  that  your  $20  million  will  be  made  available.  Would 
that be sufficient to meet the deadline, February 17, 2009? 

Mr.  MARTIN.  I  do  not  know  for  sure  if  it  will  end  up  being  suffi-
cient. I know that when we were asking for that money a year ago, 
through  our  appropriations  process,  I  went  to  all  of  the  Commis-
sioners  on  the  Commission  and  said  how  much  money  did  they 
think that we could possibly need. And I came back and we talked 
about  what  we  would  do  with  the  resources.  And  I  asked  for  the 
maximum amount of money that any Commissioner identified that 
we could possibly need. 

In  addition  to  working  with  other  organizations,  we  have  also 
been  looking  at  what  we  would  end  up  doing  as  far  as  taking  out, 
for  example,  advertisements.  The  AARP  magazines  would  actually 
have  a  coupon  attached  to  the  advertisement  they  could  just  clip 
and  mail  in  to  NTIA  to  make  sure  that  that  would  be  able  to  be 
provided  to  them.  So  we  are  doing  as  much  as  we  can  think  of. 
Whether  that  will  ultimately  be  enough  or  not,  I  do  not  know.  I 
certainly know we need at least that much. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

62 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Goldstein,  I  want  to  thank  your  agency  for 
keeping  us  apprised  of  the  numbers  and  concerns  that  you  have. 

Mr. GOLDSTEIN. Certainly, Senator, I would be happy to. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Those  numbers  led  us  to  believe  that  this  hear-

ing was necessary, and I think it is. 

Mayor  Saffo,  your  experiment  has  been  very  helpful  to  us  be-
cause we hope we can learn a lot from that. We thank you for your 
presence here. 

Mr. SAFFO. Thank you, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  To  all  of  you,  thank  you  very  much.  I  have  got 

to get back to my meeting. 

[Whereupon, at 3:59 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN 

Question 1. In Wilmington, one converter box manufacturer collaborated with the 
government  to  provide  converter  boxes  for  residents  of  nursing  homes.  Is  there  a 
similar  plan  in  place  nationally  to  help  the  elderly  residents  in  nursing  homes  and 
assisted living centers obtain converter boxes and install them? 

Answer.  An  invaluable  lesson  learned  from  Wilmington  is  that  DTV  transition 
success  depends  on  the  commitment  and  collaboration  of  the  local  community,  in-
cluding  local  industry,  governmental  and  nongovernmental  organizations.  In  Wil-
mington,  the  Commission  worked  directly  with  local  firefighters  and  other  local, 
community-based  organizations  to  help  consumers  install  converter  boxes.  Building 
on that experience, the Commission recently solicited contracts from grass roots and 
community-based organizations to assist consumers, particularly consumers who are 
elderly, homebound or have limited mobility, with the procurement and installation 
of  digital  TV  converter  boxes  and  related  equipment.  Commission  staff  is  currently 
reviewing  the  bids,  and  we  plan  to  get  these  contracts  in  place  as  quickly  as  pos-
sible. 

Question 2. Will the lack of converter box installation assistance across the coun-

try inhibit a successful transition? 

Answer.  As  described  above,  the  Commission  recently  solicited  contracts  from 
grass  roots  and  community-based  organizations  to  assist  consumers,  particularly 
consumers who are elderly, home-bound or have limited mobility, with the procure-
ment and installation of digital TV converter boxes and related equipment. Commis-
sion staff is currently reviewing the bids, and we plan to get these contracts in place 
as quickly as possible. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN D. ROCKEFELLER IV 

TO HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN 

Question  1.  Chairman  Martin,  do  you  believe  that  the  Federal  Communications 

Commission (FCC) has the authority to adopt a quiet period rule? 

Answer.  I  am  not  sure  whether  the  Commission  has  the  statutory  authority  to 
adopt a quiet period. In light of the shift from analog to digital television, Congress 
provided  the  Commission,  in  section  614(b)(4)(B)  of  the  Communications  Act,  with 
the  authority  to  ‘‘establish  any  changes  . . .  necessary  to  ensure  cable  carriage  of 
[digital] broadcast signals.’’ In the past, I have taken the position that this provision 
gives  the  Commission  broad  authority  to  adopt  carriage  regulations,  including,  for 
example,  the  authority  to  require  the  carriage  of  broadcast  stations’  multicast  sig-
nals.  Unfortunately,  the  Commission  has  not  agreed  with  my  interpretation  of  this 
provision,  and  instead  has  embraced  a  narrower  interpretation  of  our  authority  in 
this  area.  Thus,  if  the  Commission  does  have  the  authority  to  require  carriage  of 
multicast signals, then I agree that we also have the authority to adopt a quiet pe-
riod.  If,  however,  we  do  not  have  the  authority  to  require  carriage  of  multicast  sig-
nals,  then  I  am  not  sure  whether  we  have  the  authority  to  adopt  a  quiet  period. 
Question  2.  It  is  my  understanding  that  you  have  reached  out  to  a  number  of 
stakeholders  on  this  issue.  Have  you  found  the  industry  willing  to  work  with  the 
FCC to find a voluntary agreement? 

Answer.  Broadcasters  have  proposed  a  voluntary  quiet  period  that  would  extend 
for roughly 2 weeks before and after the February 17, 2009 transition date. Not all 
large broadcasters have agreed to participate. This approach also does not have the 
agreement  of  the  cable  operators  and  other  MVPDs,  who  prefer  a  mandatory  and 
enforceable quiet period that begins in December. 

Question  3.  If  the  FCC  were  to  promulgate  rules  surrounding  a  quiet  period, 
would  those  rules  require  a  notice-and-comment  rulemaking  proceeding?  It  is  my 
understanding  that  many  retransmission  consent  agreements  expire  at  the  end  of 

(63) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

64 

2008.  Could  these  rules  be  done  in  an  expedited  manner  in  order  to  minimize  the 
potential for consumer disruption? 

Answer. I do not believe we needed to issue a Notice of Proposed Rulemaking. 
Question  4.  A  number  of  timeframes  have  been  suggested  for  a  quiet  period. 
Again,  to  minimize  any  consumer  disruption  prior  to  the  transition  to  digital  tele-
vision, are certain timeframes more appropriate than others? 

Answer.  It  is  important  for  the  Commission  to  minimize  any  potential  burdens 
consumers may face as they transition to digital on February 17, 2009. To this end, 
I  believe  that  a  quiet  period  beginning  a  few  weeks  before  would  be  sufficient  to 
minimize any potential consumer confusion. 

Question  5.  If  prior  to  the  transition  to  digital  television,  a  broadcaster  and  rel-
evant multi-channel video distributor are unable to reach an agreement on the car-
riage  of  signals,  what  authority  does  the  FCC  have  to  resolve  this  dispute  so  that 
consumers are not unnecessarily harmed? 

Answer.  We  have  no  direct  authority  to  resolve  a  dispute.  Broadcasters  and 
MVPDs  have  a  statutory  obligation  to  bargain  in  good  faith.  Specifically,  section 
325(b)(3)(C)(ii) of the Communications Act prohibits broadcasters from ‘‘engaging in 
exclusive  contracts  for  carriage  or  failing  to  negotiate  in  good  faith’’  for  retrans-
mission consent. Section 325(b)(3)(C)(iii) similarly prohibits MVPDs from ‘‘failing to 
negotiate  in  good  faith’’  with  retransmission  consent  broadcasters.  Our  rules  at  47 
C.F.R. § 76.65 detail these prohibitions, and the Commission has clearly stated that 
actions taken in the context of a retransmission consent negotiation that are ‘‘suffi-
ciently  outrageous,  or  evidence  that  differences  among  . . .  agreements  are  not 
based  on  competitive  marketplace  considerations,  [will]  . . .  breach  a  [negotiating 
entity’s]  good  faith  negotiation  obligation.’’  The  Commission  has  authority  to  act  in 
such cases, and either party in a retransmission consent negotiation can file a com-
plaint  with  the  Commission  if  they  believe  the  other  party  is  acting  in  bad  faith. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

HON. KEVIN J. MARTIN 

Question  1.  Chairman  Martin,  there  are  around  100  over-the-air  broadcast  sta-
tions that will be allowed to reach only 85 percent of its population for a time after 
the  DTV  hard  date.  On  the  hard  date,  if  a  consumer  no  longer  receives  a  digital 
signal from a station they used to receive analog signal from, how will the consumer 
know  that  his  or  her  inability  to  receive  an  over-the-air  signal  is  not  the  result  of 
the  ‘digital  cliff’  or  a  reduction  in  coverage  due  to  the  station’s  digital  antenna  lo-
cated  at  a  different  site  than  the  analog  antenna  (such  as  in  Wilmington),  but  be-
cause the station is not broadcasting at its full power? 

Answer. These stations are required to notify affected consumers. Specifically, sta-
tions that have received permission to operate their digital signal at less than their 
full  authorized  facilities  for  a  time  after  the  end  of  analog  TV  service  (and  will 
therefore  serve  a  reduced  portion  of  their  analog  viewers  or  not  serve  them  at  all 
for  a  time)  are  required  to  notify  viewers  on  their  analog  channels  in  advance  of 
the  transition  date  about  the  station’s  planned  delay  in  construction  and  operation 
of  post-transition  digital  service  and  inform  them  about  how  they  can  continue  to 
receive  the  station.  Notifications  must  occur  every  day  on-air  at  least  four  times  a 
day including at least once in prime time for the 30 days prior to the station’s termi-
nation of full, authorized analog service. Notifications must include: (1) the station’s 
call sign and community of license; (2) the fact that the station must delay the con-
struction  and  operation  of  its  post-transition  service;  (3)  information  about  the  na-
ture,  scope,  and  anticipated  duration  of  the  station’s  post-transition  service  limita-
tions; (4) what viewers can do to continue to receive the station, i.e., how and when 
the station’s digital signal can be received; and (5) the street address, e-mail address 
(if  available),  and  phone  number  of  the  station  where  viewers  may  register  com-
ments or request information. These viewer notifications are in addition to, and sep-
arate from, stations’ notification requirements under our DTV Consumer Education 
Initiative. 

Question  2.  Chairman  Martin,  I  am  told  that  broadcasters  in  Washington  State’s 
three  DMAs  are  hesitant  to  conduct  a  ‘‘soft  test’’  because  of  the  complexity  of  the 
message  required  in  order  to  not  confuse  consumers  that  will  still  be  able  to  con-
tinue  receiving  analog  signal  over  translators  after  the  hard  date.  Additionally,  Di-
rect  TV  and  EchoStar  are  still  in  the  process  of  upgrading  the  set-top  box  of  their 
customers in the state that currently do not receive local-into-local service. I am told 
installations  will  occur  throughout  the  fall  with  the  final  installations  in  the  Yak-
ima—Tri Cities DMA scheduled for January. Until they receive the new set-top box 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

65 

from  their  satellite  provider,  some  of  these  consumers  would  be  unduly  concerned 
after  a  ‘‘soft  test’’  that  they  are  not  prepared.  I  see  the  value  of  the  ‘‘soft  test’’.  Is 
it  possible  for  the  Commission  to  work  with  my  state’  s  broadcasting  association  to 
develop  messaging  for  a  soft  test  during  the  next  month  or  so  that  would  not  con-
fuse analog translator viewers and some satellite television viewers? 

Answer.  We  would  be  happy  to  work  with  the  Washington  Broadcaster  Associa-
tion  to  coordinate  and  provide  assistance  related  to  running  soft  tests.  I  have  in-
structed staff to contact the Washington Broadcaster Association. 

Question 3. Chairman Martin, does the FCC currently have the authority to issue 
rules  to  set  a  hard  date  for  broadcast  low-power,  Class  A,  and  translator  television 
stations, or is a change of statute required? 

Answer. Section 336(f)(4) of the Communications Act, adopted as part of the Com-
munity Broadcasters Protection Act of 1999, gives it the discretion to determine the 
end of the transition period for Class A, TV translator, and LPTV stations. 

Question  4.  Chairman  Martin,  I  have  received  communications  from  constituents 
who after installing the converter box, can not receive digital UHF over-the-air tele-
vision signals, but if they detach the converter box they can still receive analog UHF 
signals.  A  local  television  station  told  one  such  individual  that  UHF  signals  are 
much  more  line-of-sight  dependent  and  due  to  the  hilly  terrain  the  digital  signal 
was  blocked.  Western  Washington  has  a  considerable  amount  of  hilly  terrain.  In 
fact, there are a number of translator stations operating today in Washington to fill 
in  these  gaps  in  coverage.  If  it  proves  that  the  switch  to  digital  causes  the  over- 
the-air  signals  of  some  of  UHF  stations  to  be  blocked  by  terrain  in  some  areas, 
would the FCC be willing and able to open an expedited window for the construction 
of television translator stations for those affected stations? 

Answer. Yes, the FCC would be willing and able to open an expedited window for 

the construction of television translator stations for those affected stations. 

Question 5. Chairman Martin, Mayor Saffo testified that Wilmington participated 
in  a  regional,  analog  television  e-cycling  day?  Do  you  see  a  benefit  for  the  FCC  to 
provide  consumers  information  regarding  the  e-cycling  of  analog  television  in  its 
communications on DTV? 

Answer. Yes, there is a benefit to informing consumers about their options for re-
cycling  their  analog  televisions  as  part  of  our  outreach.  The  Commission,  together 
with  the  Environmental  Protection  Agency,  issued  a  joint  advisory  regarding  the 
DTV  transition  and  the  importance  of  e-cycling  analog  TVs.  This  advisory  is  at-
tached  and  available  on  the  www.dtv.gov  website.  We  have  disseminated  the  advi-
sory  to  individual  consumers  as  well  as  consumer  groups  at  outreach  events.  We 
will  continue  to  include  this  messaging  throughout  the  transition,  and  will  look  for 
opportunities,  as  we  did  in  Wilmington,  to  work  with  local  officials  and  groups  to 
provide consumers options at a local level for e-cycling of their analog sets. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. JOSEFINA G. CARBONELL 

Question 1. Will the lack of converter box installation assistance across the coun-

try inhibit a successful transition? 

Answer. The Administration on Aging (AoA) has continued to work with our Fed-
eral, State and local partners to call attention to the issues related to converter box 
installation  for  seniors  as  we  believe  it  is  a  critical  piece  in  the  overall  success  of 
the  transition.  We  know  that  many  seniors,  who  are  frail,  have  disabilities,  live 
alone or are homebound may have challenges installing the converter boxes once ob-
tained.  Some  may  not  be  able  to  physically  move  their  TV  or  the  furniture  associ-
ated with it in order to install the converter box, or they may have difficulty under-
standing  the  technology  needed  to  connect  and  operate  the  converter  box  and  re-
lated antennae. 

I  am  very  pleased  that  some  action  is  being  taken  to  assist  those  who  are  frail 
or  homebound  who  may  need  this  additional  assistance  in  the  physical  installation 
of  the  boxes  once  they  are  secured,  and  we  applaud  our  Federal  partners  for  being 
responsive  to  the  issues  we  have  raised.  Recently  the  FCC  requested  proposals  for 
grassroots  and  community-level  efforts  around  direct  assistance  in  securing  and  in-
stalling  converter  boxes  and  establishing  help  lines  to  help  educate  consumers  and 
answer queries. Several major aging organizations, members of AoA’s vast national 
aging network, involved in the transition who have been concerned about this aspect 
of  the  transition  have  applied  for  those  funds  in  order  to  provide  this  assistance  to 
those they serve. The National Telecommunications and Information Administration 
(NTIA) will also use funds set aside from the ‘‘DTV Transition Assistance Act’’ (As-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

66 

sistance  Act),  Public  Law  110–295,  to  provide  consumer  assistance  with  the  DTV 
transition. NTIA will reserve up to $4.5 million for awards under this authority for 
unsolicited  proposals  that  can  be  awarded  by  November  15,  2008.  NTIA  acknowl-
edges the need not just to inform consumers about the Coupon Program but to pro-
vide  where  appropriate  and  feasible  hands-on  assistance  to  vulnerable  Americans 
who  may  have  difficulty  completing  the  application,  picking  up  a  converter  box  or 
connecting it to their TV sets. 

We  were  also  heartened  that  Secretary  Gutierrez  announced  that  residents  of 
nursing  homes,  assisted  living  facilities,  and  households  that  use  a  post  office  box 
will be able to request converter box coupons. Anything we can do to assist vulner-
able seniors with this transition will further its success. 

In  some  parts  of  the  country,  AoA’s  national  aging  services  network  is  already 
stepping in to help. In Virginia, for example, the Fairfax County government includ-
ing  the  area  agency  on  aging  has  asked  its  employees  to  volunteer  to  help  senior 
citizens  and  the  disabled  make  the  transition  to  digital  TV  by  volunteering  to  help 
install  the  converter  boxes  and  in  turn  qualify  for  16  hours  of  annual  paid  leave. 
In  Wilmington,  North  Carolina  where  the  pilot  early  transition  took  place  on  Sep-
tember  8,  the  FCC  contracted  with  local  fire  departments  and  other  community  or-
ganizations to assist seniors who have difficulty obtaining or installing the converter 
boxes.  To  help  senior  citizens  make  the  transition  in  Westland,  Michigan,  the  local 
government access channel, WLND–TV, the mayor and the city government, includ-
ing  the  local  area  agency  on  aging,  hosted  a  digital  forum  in  a  local  senior  center. 
These  are  only  some  examples  of  efforts  being  made  by  the  national  aging  network 
around the country to smooth the transition process. We anticipate that the network 
will  be  poised  and  ready  to  assist  throughout  the  entire  transition  process  with 
whatever resources they might be able to devote to this initiative. 

Question  2.  Generally,  what  have  we  learned  about  meeting  the  needs  of  the  el-

derly from the test run in Wilmington, NC? 

Answer.  I  am  pleased  that  the  September  8  early  transition  pilot  test  that  took 
place  in  Wilmington,  North  Carolina  was  successful  in  large  part  for  seniors.  One 
thing  that  was  made  clear  was  the  extraordinary  value  of  the  local  aging  network 
working in a collaborative way in the Wilmington community in ensuring that older 
persons were aware of the transition and that appropriate assistance was available 
to not only respond to questions from seniors and their families, but also to arrange 
for hands-on assistance in installing the boxes if needed. 

The  Cape  Fear  Council  of  Governments,  which  is  the  local  area  agency  on  aging 
for Wilmington, worked closely with the mayor, the FCC and other local entities to 
ensure  that  the  transition  would  go  smoothly  for  vulnerable  elders.  It  was  this  col-
laboration with the aging and disability network agencies, faith-based organizations, 
local government, media outlets and interested citizens that aided in the transition. 
Through HELP lines funded by the FCC responding to questions, the active partici-
pation  of  two  fire  departments  that  combined  visits  with  smoke  alarm  checks,  sen-
iors in the community were for the most part ready for the transition. 

One  of  the  major  lessons  learned  from  the  September  8  pilot  test,  according  to 
the  local  aging  network,  was  the  need  for  repetitive  education  to  the  community  in 
particular  education  tailored  to  older  persons,  their  families,  and  the  aging/health/ 
human  services  agencies  working  with  these  populations.  In  addition,  providing  in-
formation to individuals on the local Disaster Special Needs Registry, both in print-
ed form and through phone calls, was beneficial. 

It  is  important  to  note  that  the  local  aging  network  also  found  that  the  current 
financial  situation  was  a  significant  factor  in  the  provision  of  consumer  education, 
assistance with converter box procurement, installation and post transition trouble-
shooting  for  those  they  serve,  and  that  they  have  had  to  rely  on  overworked  per-
sonnel  and  volunteers.  In  addition,  for  older  persons  who  utilize  the  over  the  air 
transmission for their TV reception, there were some individual economic challenges 
to  affording  the  co-pay  for  the  converter  boxes,  being  able  to  afford  a  new  antenna, 
and/or transportation to a store to purchase the box or the antenna. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

HON. JOSEFINA G. CARBONELL 

Question.  Secretary  Carbonell,  can  you  describe  your  efforts  toward  providing  di-
rect education; one-on-one information; assistance in purchasing and acquiring con-
verter boxes; and installation of the boxes for older adults specifically in Washington 
State? 

Answer. The Administration on Aging has been an active partner in our Nation’s 
preparation for the digital transition since we were first contacted by both the FCC 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

67 

and the NTIA in the summer of 2007. Through our website, our regional offices, and 
various  public  outreach  efforts,  including  a  regular  e-newsletter  that  goes  out  to 
more than 22,000 subscribers, we continue to share information with seniors, family 
members  and  our  national  network  of  aging  services  and  community  providers 
which works with seniors in nearly every community in our country. AoA staff have 
participated in various meetings and forums coordinated by NTIA and the FCC and 
most  recently,  we  have  provided  technical  assistance  to  the  FCC  as  it  prepared  for 
its  various  town  hall  meetings  being  held  across  the  country  including  ones  that 
have  recently  taken  place  in  Seattle,  Spokane  and  Yakima,  WA.  At  these  forums, 
attendees, many of whom are seniors and their caregivers, receive current informa-
tion about the transition as well as demonstrations in converter box setup. 

As I indicated in my testimony, AoA’s national aging network, which is comprised 
of 56 State Units on Aging, 655 local planning and service entities called area agen-
cies on aging, 239 Tribal and native American organizations representing more than 
300  tribes;  29,000  local  community  service  provider  organizations,  and  more  than 
half  a  million  volunteers,  has  been  very  active  throughout  the  country  in  helping 
to prepare seniors for the digital TV transition. Leading aging organizations who are 
trusted  and  visible  sources  of  information  and  assistance  in  the  community  are 
working  hard  to  assist  older  persons  to  be  prepared  for  the  February  2009  transi-
tion.  Local  senior  centers,  nutrition  sites,  adult  day  care  programs,  home  delivered 
meals  programs  and  other  community  based  organizations  throughout  Washington 
and  throughout  the  Nation  are  holding  information  sessions  and  distributing  flyers 
and educational materials provided by the NTIA and FCC. Many local organizations 
are working with the National Association of Broadcasters that has local TV broad-
casters  available  to  speak  at  these  events.  The  Washington  State  Association  of 
Broadcasters  is  an  active  part  of  the  DTV  Coalition,  a  group  of  national,  state  and 
community  organizations  whose  mission  is  to  ensure  that  no  one  is  left  out  when 
the  transition  occurs  next  February.  In  addition,  the  National  Asian  Pacific  Center 
on Aging based in Seattle is providing information on the digital transition through 
its  helpline  in  9  different  languages  to  Asian  seniors  throughout  the  State  and  the 
country. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

MEREDITH ATTWELL BAKER 

Question  1.  In  Wilmington,  one  converter  box  manufacturer  teamed  up  with  the 
government  and  provided  converter  boxes  for  residents  of  nursing  homes.  This  was 
a great cooperative effort. Is there a similar plan in place nationally to help the el-
derly residents in nursing homes and assisted living centers obtain converter boxes 
and install them? 

Answer. NTIA was an important catalyst in ensuring that nursing home residents 
in Wilmington, North Carolina, were not left behind in their early digital transition. 
Because the nursing home rule change was not going to be effective before the Wil-
mington  transition,  NTIA  reached  out  to  converter  box  manufacturers  to  encourage 
them  to  address  this  challenge.  NTIA  is  pleased  that  they  came  forward  with  con-
verter box donations for the small number of nursing home residents in that market 
who  owned  analog  televisions  and  watched  broadcast-only  television.  NTIA  is  also 
pleased  that  the  Federal  Communications  Commission  mobilized  partners  in  Wil-
mington, such as local firefighters, to provide in-home assistance to vulnerable sen-
iors. As you know, NTIA recently revised its regulations so that residents of nursing 
homes  are  eligible  to  apply  for  one  coupon  using  the  special  application  available 
on  the  Program’s  homepage.  Anyone  may  apply  on  behalf  of  a  nursing  home  resi-
dent,  so  in  many  cases,  a  friend,  family  member  or  administrator  will  be  able  to 
assist the nursing home resident with a subsequent converter box purchase and in-
stallation. 

NTIA  is  encouraged  by  the  voluntary  initiatives  emerging  to  help  vulnerable 
Americans  prepare  for  the  transition.  Faith-based  initiatives  in  particular  are  tar-
geting seniors for assistance, whether it be helping them apply for coupons, picking 
up  the  converter  box  in  the  store  or  installing  it  in  the  home.  As  a  partner  of 
NTIA’s,  Interfaith  Ministries  in  the  greater  Houston  area  is  appealing  to  the  mem-
bers  of  its  religious  community  to  work  through  Volunteer  Houston  to  assist  in  the 
installation of boxes via Meals on Wheels for Greater Houston. 

NTIA will also use funds set aside from the ‘‘DTV Transition Assistance Act’’ (As-
sistance Act), Public Law No. 110–295, to provide consumer assistance. Use of these 
funds  may  include,  but  is  not  limited  to,  partnering  with,  providing  grants  to,  and 
contracting  with  non-profit  organizations  or  public  interest  groups  in  achieving 
these efforts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

68 

NTIA acknowledges the need not just to inform consumers about the Coupon Pro-
gram  but  to  provide  where  appropriate  and  feasible  hands-on  assistance  to  vulner-
able  Americans  who  may  have  difficulty  completing  the  application,  picking  up  a 
converter  box  or  connecting  it  to  their  TV  sets.  The  Agency  will  support  the  Na-
tional  Association  of  Area  Agencies  on  Aging  (n4a),  in  the  form  of  a  cooperative 
agreement, to provide one-on-one assistance to a quarter million older adults to help 
them  complete  the  coupon  application,  obtain  converter  boxes  and  install  them  so 
they  can  keep  their  existing  TV  sets  working.  Under  the  umbrella  of  the  ‘‘Keeping 
Seniors  Connected  Coalition,’’  a  variety  of  organizations  with  extensive  preexisting 
networks  in  neighborhoods  and  communities  across  the  United  States,  will  help 
many seniors manage the DTV transition. With considerable recent experience with 
the  Medicare  Part  D  Campaign,  these  organizations  are  ready  to  hit  the  ground 
running  to  make  the  transition  as  seamless  as  possible  for  America’s  most  vulner-
able seniors. 

Question 2. Will the lack of converter box installation assistance across the coun-

try inhibit a successful transition? 

Answer. Converter box installation assistance will be available through a number 
of partner organizations to promote a successful transition. NTIA will use funds set 
aside  from  the  ‘‘DTV  Transition  Assistance  Act’’  (Assistance  Act),  Public  Law  No. 
110–295, to provide consumer assistance. The National Association of Area Agencies 
on Aging (n4a) has committed to assisting a quarter million vulnerable seniors with 
the  transition,  including  with  converter  box  installation,  through  partner  organiza-
tions such as the Meals on Wheels Association of America, the National Association 
for  Hispanic  Elderly,  the  National  Asian  Pacific  Center  on  Aging  and  the  National 
Caucus and Center on Black Aged. 

I  am  also  encouraged  by  the  voluntary  initiatives  emerging  across  the  country  to 
assist people with the transition. The DTV Transition Coalition has developed a bro-
chure  called  ‘‘Help  Your  Neighbor  Make  the  Switch  to  Digital  TV’’  which  describes 
how every American can be part of the solution in ensuring that February 17, 2009, 
amounts to a smooth transition for consumers. It is my understanding that the Na-
tional Association of Broadcasters is developing a Public Service Announcement that 
would reinforce this message. In addition, the Federal Communications Commission 
(FCC)  is  expanding  its  call  center  to  be  able  to  provide  consumer  support  on  tech-
nical  matters  and  has  produced  easy-to-follow  videos  on  how  to  install  a  converter 
box.  Both  NTIA  and  the  FCC  are  encouraging  local  broadcasters  to  publicize  their 
telephone numbers and field questions related to signal reception. 

Based  on  what  the  FCC  learned  from  the  early  transition  in  Wilmington,  North 
Carolina,  only  about  15  percent  of  DTV-related  calls  made  to  the  FCC’s  hotline  in 
the  two  weeks  following  the  September  8,  2008,  transition  concerned  difficulties 
with  the  converter  box.  According  to  the  FCC,  90  percent  of  those  calls  were  re-
solved fairly straightforwardly over the telephone. Subsequently the FCC has devel-
oped tips for consumers, available on the www.dtv.gov website, which will help them 
troubleshoot any outstanding issues with converter box set-up. NTIA is aggressively 
cross-promoting  these  resources  through  its  new  ‘‘Apply.  Buy.  Try.’’  campaign.  In 
urging  consumers  to  install  their  converter  boxes  in  advance  of  February  17,  2009, 
NTIA’s strategy is to reduce the number of consumers who resort to setting up their 
converter box after their analog signal has been shut off. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

MEREDITH ATTWELL BAKER 

Question 1. Secretary Baker, it is clear that NTIA is not going to reissue coupons 
to consumers who ordered them, but did not redeem them in time, without a statu-
tory  change.  It  is  equally  clear  there  is  no  statutory  change  coming.  The  majority 
of calls and e-mails from my constituents regarding the DTV transition concerns ex-
pired coupons. In Washington State, as of September 22, 123,883 converter box cou-
pons  were  redeemed,  but  134,705  have  expired.  I  would  like  to  get  your  thoughts 
on  a  possible  workaround.  First,  are  DTV  coupons  transferrable  among  consumers? 
Second, would it be consistent with your interpretation of the rules if a state or local 
government, business, or university asks its employees to order coupons online, the 
employee receives their coupons at home and brings them into the office, where the 
employer collects the coupons, and then redistributes the coupons to those who need 
them—consumers  whose  coupons  have  expired  or  consumers  from  hard  to  reach 
populations? 

Answer.  As  an  initial  matter,  there  may  be  a  number  of  reasons  consumers  do 
not  redeem  coupons  within  the  90-day  active  period  as  set  by  statute.  Some  con-
sumers  may  realize  they  did  not  need  the  coupon  if  all  of  their  televisions  are  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

69 

nected  to  cable,  satellite  or  other  pay  TV  services—or  they  may  decide  to  subscribe 
to  such  services.  Some  consumers  may  purchase  digital  televisions  instead  of  con-
verter boxes. 

While  the  Coupon  Program  rule  prohibits  the  sale  of  coupons,  coupons  issued  by 
the program are transferrable to the extent they may be freely given without consid-
eration.  NTIA  believes  that  the  type  of  ‘‘clearinghouse’’  that  you  describe  would 
largely  be  outside  the  direct  scope  of  the  Coupon  Program’s  regulations.  Individual 
households  participating  in  such  programs  would  have  to  comply  with  the  Coupon 
Program’s  eligibility  requirements  and  could  not  accept  consideration  in  exchange 
for  the  coupons.  Such  programs  would  also  have  to  comply  with  all  applicable  Fed-
eral and state laws. There may also be an increased risk of unintended waste, fraud, 
and  abuse  with  such  a  program.  For  example,  people  could  be  encouraged  to  apply 
for coupons that they do not need, or they may not follow through on donating them 
to  the  clearinghouse—both  such  outcomes  would  represent  waste  in  the  Program. 
In addition, the clearinghouse would need to ensure that active coupons are handled 
securely,  monitor  expiration  dates  and  encourage  prompt  use  of  coupons.  Clearing-
house  leadership  should  take  measures  to  minimize  the  potential  for  consumers  to 
violate the ‘‘two per household’’ statutory limit on coupon orders. 

Question  2.  Secretary  Baker,  I  need  to  understand  how  prepared  my  state  of 
Washington is for the upcoming DTV transition and what can be done to better pre-
pare  my  constituents.  In  the  table  accompanying  your  written  testimony,  the  three 
Washington State DMAs fall within the thirty areas in the country having the low-
est  over-the-air  household  participation  rates  in  the  coupon  program.  Of  greatest 
concern  is  the  Seattle-Tacoma  market  with  a  coupon  program  participation  rate  of 
43 percent. According to Nielson there are 215,240 broadcast only households in the 
Seattle-Tacoma DMA. I know that Washington State broadcasters and cable system 
operators  are  playing  PSAs,  engaging  in  public  outreach,  working  with  community 
group  in  the  Seattle-Tacoma  DMA,  but  it  appears  that  effort  is  still  falling  short. 
What other steps can be taken to increase participation in the converter coupon pro-
gram? 

Answer. The Agency is closely monitoring coupon request rates at the DMA level, 
and  I  share  your  concern  that  the  three  Washington  state  DMAs  have  among  the 
lowest participation rates in the country. NTIA is enhancing its consumer education 
activities in markets with low participation rates to motivate over-the-air consumers 
to act in a timely manner. On September 30, 2008, NTIA launched the latest phase 
of  its  efforts  to  spur  consumer  action  by  announcing  its  ‘‘Apply.  Buy.  Try.’’  cam-
paign. The campaign urges over-the-air consumers to apply for their coupons now— 
but certainly no later than the end of the year—to allow themselves 6 weeks to pre-
pare for the analog shut-off date. It is clear from surveys conducted by the National 
Association  of  Broadcasters  and  others  that  awareness  of  the  digital  transition  is 
near  universal:  however,  a  significant  number  of  consumers  are  choosing  to  wait 
until  closer  to  the  end  to  make  their  decision  on  how  they  will  transition.  NTIA’s 
campaign  aims  to  motivate  these  consumers  to  act  early.  The  Agency  has  reached 
out to grassroots organizations in these markets to communicate these messages to 
their  constituents,  and  I  am  pleased  that  groups  such  as  the  Organization  of  Chi-
nese  Americans—Greater  Seattle  Chapter  and  the  Mid-City  Concerns  Meals  on 
Wheels chapter in Spokane are distributing our materials. 

NTIA  staff  have  been  very  active  in  the  Seattle  market.  On  October  1,  NTIA’s 
consumer  education  director  participated  in  a  Coupon  Program  ‘‘sign-up’’  event  at 
the  Jefferson  Recreation  Center,  partnering  with  the  City  of  Seattle  Department  of 
Information  Technology  and  KING  5  (NBC)  Seattle.  The  Program’s  partnership 
manager  participated  in  meetings  in  early  June  to  design  a  coordinated  outreach 
strategy to seniors, including the Seattle I-lousing Authority, Seattle Public Library 
and the City Parks and Recreation Department. NTIA is accelerating its work with 
local partners to promote the ‘‘Apply. Buy. Try.’’ campaign and is engaged in earned 
media to urge consumers who have not taken action to do so without delay. To date 
NTIA  has  conducted  radio  interviews  in  all  three  Washington  DMAs  and  television 
interviews  in  Seattle  and  will  continue  to  promote  the  Coupon  Program  via  the 
broadcast media. 

Question  3.  Secretary  Baker,  earlier  this  year,  the  availability  of  set-top  boxes 
with  analog  pass-through  capability  was  a  front  burner  issue.  How  many  manufac-
turers  are  now  producing  such  boxes?  How  does  NTIA  ensure  that  the  set-top  box 
with analog pass-through reaches retailers in those parts of the country where they 
are  most  likely  needed?  Is  NTIA  tracking  the  number  of  set-top  boxes  with  analog 
pass-through purchased? 

Answer. In response to the concerns of the low-power television broadcasting com-
munity.  I  sent  personal  letters  to  all  of  the  coupon-eligible  converter  box  manufac-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

70 

turers on record last winter. The response from manufacturers was swift and signifi-
cant. By May 2008 converter boxes with an analog pass-through function were being 
shipped  to  the  leading  retailers  in  the  Coupon  Program.  Consumers  today  may 
choose  from  over  41  brands  and  models  with  an  analog  pass-through  feature  avail-
able  in  retail  stores.  NTIA  expects  retailers  to  meet  the  needs  of  their  consumers 
and  to  stock  analog  pass-through  converter  box  models  in  geographic  areas  where 
they  are  needed.  We  note  that  of  the  top  ten  coupon-eligible  converter  box  models 
sold nationwide, four have an analog pass-through capability. 

Question  4.  Secretary  Baker,  what  is  the  methodology  NTIA  uses  to  project  con-
sumer  demand  for  coupons  for  DTV  set-top  boxes  through  March  31,  2009?  How 
confident is NTIA in its projection for consumer demand for coupons through March 
31, 2009? Your written testimony includes a table of over-the-air household partici-
pation  rates  in  the  coupon  program  for  each  of  our  Nation’s  DMAs.  Why  are  some 
communities  listed  as  being  above  100  percent  in  participation?  For  example,  Wil-
mington,  North  Carolina  has  an  over-the-air  household  participation  rate  greater 
than 200 percent. Can you explain? One might read into the statistic that some con-
sumers  ordered  coupons  that  did  not  need  them  and  then  transferred  the  coupons 
to others. To the best of your knowledge did that occur in Wilmington? 

Answer.  Early  in  the  Program’s  planning  phase.  NTIA  developed  an  economic 
analysis  that  calculated  a  baseline  market  of  between  20.4  and  51.9  million  con-
verter  boxes,  based  on  estimates  of  the  number  of  ‘‘untethered’’  analog  televisions 
in households that might require them. The Program made an assumption that out 
of this potential market, 50 percent of households choosing the converter box option 
would  redeem  coupons,  suggesting  that  between  10.2  million  and  26.0  million  cou-
pons  would  be  redeemed.  NTIA  is  finalizing  a  plan  to  address  expected  demand  in 
the Program’s final months which will elaborate on a variety of scenarios the Agen-
cy might face and our plans to meet consumer demand. 

NTIA uses ‘‘participation rates’’ as indicators of coupon requests in given commu-
nities.  Some  communities  are  listed  in  the  table  you  reference  as  having  participa-
tion  rates  above  100  percent  for  over-the-air  households  because  NTIA  calculated 
these  figures  based  on  information  provided  by  the  Consumer  Electronics  Associa-
tion  (CEA)  that  about  sixty  (60)  percent  of  over-the-air  consumers  in  each  DMA 
would  be  potential  purchasers  of  converter  boxes.  (Please  note  that  a  follow-up  re-
port  released  by  CEA  last  month  showed  the  figure  had  increased  to  67  percent.) 
The  estimated  market  figures  were  compared  then  to  the  actual  number  of  OTA 
coupon requests NTIA received from a particular DMA to derive the OTA participa-
tion for that community. Thus, the participation rate is the number of OTA requests 
divided by CEA’s estimated market. In markets in which coupon requests from OTA 
households  exceeded  the  CEA  60  percent  estimated  market  figure,  then  the  result-
ing participate rate is greater than 100 percent. 

Because the converter box option appears to be a more attractive option for many 
consumers  as  the  education  campaign  builds  awareness,  NTIA  has  revised  its  esti-
mates  and,  out  of  an  abundance  of  caution,  is  now  using  the  entire  (100  percent) 
over-the-air household population in a DMA as the potential over-the-air market for 
coupon requests. Using these revised estimates the Wilmington participation rate is 
substantially  lower—but  still  above  100  percent.  Since  the  Program  relies  on  self- 
certification as the mechanism for determining whether a household is indeed over- 
the-air  reliant,  it  is  to  be  expected  that  due  to  a  lack  of  perfect  knowledge  among 
consumers,  that  there  would  be  some  error  in  consumers’  response  to  the  Agency’s 
certification  question  on  the  application.  (Please  again  note  that  NTIA’s  estimates 
of participation relate to coupon requests, not coupons redeemed.) 

Question 5. Secretary Baker, I understand that some Indian tribal representatives 
have expressed interest in tribes being able to secure the DTV coupons for distribu-
tion by those tribes to their respective tribal members. Is this option under consider-
ation?  What  outreach  measures  are  being  performed  by  NTIA  to  inform  or  educate 
rural  communities  such  as  American  Indian  tribes  and  Alaskan  Native  villages? 
Does  NTIA  have  statistics  on  the  level  of  participation  of  various  American  Indian 
tribes and Alaskan Native villages in the converter box coupon program? 

Answer. NTIA has vigorously promoted the Coupon Program among Native Amer-
ican  tribes  and  Alaskan  Native  villages.  In  July,  I  sent  a  mailing  to  leaders  of  the 
563  Native  American  tribes  and  all  Bureau  of  Indian  Affairs  superintendents  and 
regional  directors  to  help  them  prepare  their  members  for  the  transition  to  digital 
television. My letter to tribal leaders encouraged them to use their existing commu-
nications channels to help spread the word about the Coupon Program and to ‘‘con-
sider  posting  information  at  tribal  buildings  and  schools,  having  a  call-in  show 
about the digital transition, or holding information sessions with tribal elders.’’ The 
mailing  included  a  CD  and  hardcopy  of  the  TV  Converter  Box  Coupon  Program 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

71 

Partnership  Toolkit  with  fact  sheets,  brochures,  posters  and  information  on  low- 
power and translator stations. 

NTIA staff have engaged in significant earned media outreach to Native American 
publications,  print  and  broadcast,  including  Native  Peoples,  Colors  NW,  Seminole 
Tribune,  and  Navajo  Times  to  secure  interviews  with  NTIA  spokespersons  or  offer 
resources for publication. In addition, we have reached out to various radio stations 
throughout  the  country  including,  Voices  From  the  Circle,  Native  America  Calling, 
and National Native News to secure interviews for NTIA spokespersons. The Agency 
has  also  reached  out  to  former  grantees  in  Washington  state,  such  as  the 
Suquamish  and  Kalispel  Tribes,  respectively,  to  provide  assistance.  In  2007  and 
2008,  NTIA  also  participated  in  the  largest  gathering  of  Native  American  leaders, 
the  National  Congress  of  American  Indians  convention,  leveraging  speaking  oppor-
tunities  and  staffing  a  booth  to  answer  questions  and  forge  partnerships  to  help 
make the Coupon Program a success. 

In  terms  of  tribal  representatives  securing  coupons,  the  law  is  very  clear  that  ‘‘a 
household  may  obtain  coupons  by  making  a  request  as  required  by  the  regulations 
. . .  [and]  The  Assistant  Secretary  shall  ensure  that  each  requesting  household  re-
ceives, via the United States Postal Service, no more than two coupons.’’ This stipu-
lation prevents NTIA from allowing tribal representatives to receive coupons on be-
half of consumers, although it does not prohibit consumers from allowing surrogates 
to  take  their  coupons  to  retail  stores  to  redeem  them,  if  consumers  are  unable  to 
do so due to infirmity, lack of transportation and so forth. 

In  terms  of  keeping  statistics  on  Coupon  Program  participation  by  Native  Amer-
ican  tribe,  the  Agency  has  coupon  participation  data  down  to  the  zip  code  level, 
which  it  updates  and  posts  on  its  website  weekly.  I  have  attached  a  table  of  the 
number  of  authorized  over-the-air  households  that  have  requested  coupons  by  zip 
code as of October 22, 2008. Unfortunately the Agency does not have corresponding 
Nielsen  data  at  that  level  of  granularity  to  determine  what  the  potential  coupon 
market is for each zip code. Therefore the Agency monitors Coupon Program partici-
pation rates by over-the-air households at the Designated Market Area (DMA) level. 
As  I  discussed  earlier,  the  Agency  is  redoubling  its  consumer  education  efforts  in 
markets—including  those  in  Washington  state—with  unusually  low  participation 
rates. 

Question  6.  Secretary  Baker,  the  ‘‘DTV  Transition  Assistance  Act’’  allows  NTIA 
to accelerate grant support for the digital upgrade of low power television and trans-
lator  stations  and  use  surplus  funds  for  consumer  education  and  technical  assist-
ance  efforts.  Are  translator  stations  currently  applying  for  funds  under  the  pro-
gram?  What  is  NTIA  doing  to  reach  out  to  translator  station  owners  and  operators 
to  make  them  aware  of  the  changes  to  the  program?  My  understanding  is  that  to 
expedite the release of funds for consumer education and technical assistance under 
the Act, NTIA is accepting unsolicited proposals. What criteria is NTIA using to de-
cide on which unsolicited proposals to fund? How transparent is the proposal selec-
tion process? 

Answer. Yes, low-power stations are applying for funds under the Low-Power and 
Television  Translator  Digital-to-Analog  Conversion  Program  (Conversion  Program). 
NTIA has received applications for this program from over 900 low-power television 
facilities.  After  passage  of  the  Act  on  July  30,  2008,  NTIA  reviewed  the  program 
and determined that $3.5 million would be sufficient to fulfill its responsibilities. On 
August  28,  2008,  NTIA  published  a  notice  in  the  Federal  Register  announcing  the 
change in the funding availability for the Conversion Program. NTIA posted the no-
tice  on  the  Conversion  Program  Internet  page  and  notified  leaders  of  the  national 
trade organizations in the low-power television field. To be sure that the information 
was  distributed  to  all  potential  Conversion  Program  applicants,  NTIA  mailed  a  let-
ter  in  September  to  every  licensee  of  a  low-power  television  facility  in  the  country. 
In  October,  a  second  announcement  was  mailed  to  every  licensee  about  the  change 
in  funding.  NTIA  discussed  the  change  in  funding  availability  at  the  national  con-
vention  of  the  Community  Broadcasters  Association,  one  of  the  two  main  trade 
groups  in  the  low-power  industry.  NTIA  also  discussed  the  change  in  two  public 
meetings NTIA held in October on the low-power grant programs. 

In  terms  of  your  question  regarding  the  criteria  for  review  of  unsolicited  pro-
posals,  I  would  refer  you  to  the  plan  the  Agency  has  developed  with  respect  to  the 
use  of  Assistance  Program 
funds  at  http://www.ntia.doc.gov/dtvcoupon/ 
DTVltechassistl081015.pdf. In terms of publicizing the availability of these funds, 
the  Agency  determined  that  because  of  the  specialized  and  urgent  nature  of  these 
activities,  it  would  not  be  in  the  public  interest  to  seek  full  and  open  competition 
for  this  award.  In  the  interest  of  expediency,  NTIA  will  accept  certain  unsolicited 
proposals  for  use  in  fulfilling  its  mission  to  provide  consumer  education  and  tech-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

72 

nical  assistance  to  targeted,  hard-to-reach  populations  at  risk  of  losing  their  tele-
vision service after February 17, 2009. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

MARK L. GOLDSTEIN 

Question 1. According to your testimony, in areas with predominately senior popu-
lations, close to half (43 percent) of households have allowed their coupons to expire. 
Does GAO have a specific recommendation to address this problem? 

Answer.  Regarding  the  high  expiration  rate  of  converter  box  coupons  requested 
by  seniors,  we  do  not  have  a  specific  recommendation  to  address  this  issue.  As  we 
indicated  in  our  testimony,  the  expiration  rate  for  coupons  is  inordinately  high  in 
areas  comprised  predominantly  of  seniors.  While  we  are  able  to  report  the  request, 
redemption,  and  expiration  rate  in  these  areas,  we  have  not  explored  the  cause  of 
the  high  expiration  rate  nor  the  effect  that  it  might  have.  The  National  Tele-
communications  and  Information  Administration  (NTIA)  and  Federal  Communica-
tions Commission (FCC) identified seniors as one of the ‘‘hard-to-reach’’ populations 
and have targeted seniors in their outreach efforts, but it is unclear what effect this 
will have on seniors’ high expiration rate of converter box coupons. 

Question 2. Will the lack of converter box installation assistance across the coun-

try inhibit a successful transition? 

Answer.  We  have  not  performed  work  related  to  converter  box  installation  and 
how  this  might  affect  the  DTV  transition.  FCC  has  noted  that  after  the  transition 
in  Wilmington,  North  Carolina,  on  September  8,  2008,  it  received  numerous  calls 
to  its  helpline  regarding  converter  box  problems.  These  problems  mostly  consisted 
of consumers’ need to properly install their converter boxes and to re-scan for digital 
channels after installing the box. FCC has indicated that consumer education efforts 
need  to  instruct  consumers  about  how  to  effectively  hook  up  their  boxes  and  the 
need to re-scan for digital channels after the transition date. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

MARK L. GOLDSTEIN 

Question 1. Mr. Goldstein, do you expect NTIA to exceed its cap for administering 
the  converter  box  subsidy  program?  If  so,  why  do  think  it  will  happen?  Given  the 
increase in demand expected in the upcoming month, do you believe that NTIA has 
a handle on the administrative costs required through the end of the program? 

Answer.  While  we  estimated  potential  coupon  requests  in  our  testimony  on 
June 10, 2008,1 we did not examine NTIA’s costs associated with administering the 
converter  box  subsidy  program  and  therefore  do  not  know  if  NTIA  has  a  handle  on 
its  administrative  costs  that  it  might  incur  through  the  end  of  the  program  or 
whether it will exceed its cap. In our June testimony, we estimated that households 
with  a  landline  telephone  would  request  approximately  30.6  million  coupons.  Our 
estimates  ranged  from  25.6  million  to  35.5  million  coupons  for  households  with  a 
landline telephone and did not include non-landline households or households where 
telephone  status  could  not  be  determined.  While  we  could  not  substantiate  an  as-
sumption  that  other  households  would  respond  similarly  to  landline  households,  if 
they  do,  we  estimated  the  potential  for  an  additional  11  million  coupon  requests. 
Question  2.  Mr.  Goldstein,  in  your  testimony  you  said  that  the  GAO  found  that 
‘‘households  in  both  predominantly  minority  black  and  Hispanic  or  Latino  areas 
were  less  likely  to  redeem  their  coupons  compared  with  households  outside  these 
areas.’’ How rigorous was the methodology used by the GAO to arrive at this conclu-
sion?  Why  do  you  think  that  these  populations  are  more  likely  to  let  their  coupons 
expire?  Do  you  think  it  would  be  valuable  to  perform  a  similar  analysis  for  Amer-
ican Indian tribal lands? 

Answer.  Our  methodology  employed  the  best  available  data  and  reflects  coupon 
behavior  for  demographic  areas  (zip  codes)  with  a  preponderance  of  households  in 
a  given  demographic  group.  Specifically,  to  draw  comparisons  on  coupon  requests, 
redemptions, and expirations across demographic differences, we analyzed the NTIA 
data  by  zip  codes.  To  do  so,  we  merged  the  NTIA  zip  code  data  with  data  from  the 
2000 Census SF–3 summary file Zip Code Tabulation Areas. From the census data, 
we grouped zip codes into urban and rural categories and looked at coupon requests, 

1 GAO,  Digital  Television  Transition:  Broadcasters’  Transition  Status,  Low-Power  Station 
Issues,  and  Information  on  Consumer  Awareness  of  the  DTV  Transition,  GAO–08–881T.  (Wash-
ington, D.C.: June 10, 2008). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

73 

redemptions,  and  expirations  for  zip  codes  that  were  over  50  percent  black  or  His-
panic/Latino. 

We did not perform work to address the question of why certain population groups 

were more or less likely to redeem coupons. 

Additional  information  about  population  subgroups  would  be  valuable;  however, 
we did not perform work on coupon requests, redemptions, and expirations in Amer-
ican  Indian  and  tribal  lands.  Since  our  methodology  employed  NTIA  and  census 
data  by  zip  codes,  there  may  be  limitations  in  determining  which  coupon  requests 
originated in American Indian and tribal lands. 

Question  3.  Mr.  Goldstein,  of  the  45  high  risk  areas  identified  by  the  FCC,  how 
many  are  predominantly  rural?  Does  GAO  believe  that  NTIA  is  effectively  imple-
menting the converter box subsidy program in less densely populated areas? 

Answer.  We  did  not  analyze  the  demographic  composition  of  the  high  risk  areas 
identified  by  FCC,  so  we  are  unable  to  answer  how  many  of  the  high  risk  areas 
identified by FCC are predominantly rural. The 45 areas were chosen by NTIA and 
FCC based on areas of the country that have at least one of the following population 
groups:  (1)  more  than  150,000  over-the-air  households,  (2)  more  than  20  percent  of 
all  households  relying  on  over-the-air  broadcasts,  or  (3)  a  top  10  City  of  residence 
for  the  largest  target  demographic  groups.  The  target  demographic  groups  include 
rural households. 

While  in  our  testimony  we  indicated  that  NTIA  is  effectively  implementing  the 
converter box subsidy program, we did not specifically determine effectiveness based 
on  population  density.  However,  our  analyses  of  NTIA  coupon  data  show  that  the 
coupon  request  rate  of  15  percent  and  redemption  rate  of  46  percent  in  rural  areas 
are  both  slightly  higher  than  the  urban  rates  of  12  percent  and  37  percent,  respec-
tively.  In  addition,  the  rate  at  which  coupons  have  expired  is  lower  in  rural  zip 
codes, at 25 percent, than in urban zip codes at 32 percent. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

HON. BILL SAFFO 

Question.  In  your  testimony,  you  mentioned  that  the  vast  majority  of  calls  re-
ceived right after the switch were from seniors, or family members and friends call-
ing  on  behalf  of  a  senior,  who  needed  hands-on  assistance  to  install  the  converter 
box.  In  your  view,  what  could  have  been  done  in  the  planning  stages  of  Wilming-
ton’s transition to prevent this type of predicament among the senior population on 
the day of the transition? 

Answer.  Although  the  FCC  did  an  excellent  job  promoting  when  the  switchover 
was to occur, many of these seniors either saw the advertisements and ignored them 
or  had  no  way  of  getting  the  assistance  they  needed  (ordering  the  coupons,  getting 
out to purchase a box, installing the box) before the switchover. This caused a huge 
influx  of  calls  immediately  after  the  switchover  by  frustrated  seniors  who  now  had 
no access to television at all. To better service the senior population with the switch 
to digital cable, I feel the following would be helpful: 

Have people in place to assist seniors with the boxes before the date of the switch. 
This  includes  helping  the  seniors  to  apply  for  the  coupon,  purchase  the  box  and  an-
tenna, and install the box. 

Easier  access  to  ordering  the  coupons  would  be  helpful  as  well.  Many  seniors  do 
not  have  interne  access  and  ordering  the  coupons  by  mail  is  difficult  for  them.  It 
would  be  a  good  idea  to  allow  seniors  to  order  the  coupons  over  the  phone  and,  for 
those who need the extra help, have someone available to help them order the cou-
pon  by  phone.  Advertise  directly  to  the  senior  population  through  senior  centers, 
meals-on-wheels, social services, etc. 

Have  accessibility  to  free  digital  boxes  and  antennas  for  those  who  did  not  know 
about coupon program or do not have the resources to use the coupon program. Once 
the switchover occurs, these seniors need immediate television access for emergency 
purposes and the coupon program takes time. 

Provide stickers (in large print) to label the new remote. Also, provide simple op-
erating  instructions  to  give  to  seniors  (also  in  large  print).  The  addition  of  a  new 
remote is very difficult for many seniors to understand. 

Provide  additional  service  for  those  seniors  who  need  ongoing  assistance.  All  it 
takes  is  to  accidentally  change  the  main  television  to  the  wrong  channel,  and  the 
digital box will not work properly. This has been a frustration for many seniors who 
have called for assistance multiple times. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

74 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO 

HON. BILL SAFFO 

Question  1.  Mayor  Saffo,  in  your  testimony  you  said  that  ‘‘they  (FCC)  seemed  to 
be  everywhere  educating  our  residents  and  answering  their  questions.’’  Wilmington 
is a moderately sized city with a percentage of over-the-air households less than the 
national  average  and  a  percentage  of  non-English  speakers  less  than  the  national 
average. How much of the financial cost of the Big Switch preparations and its im-
mediate follow-up was borne by the City of Wilmington? From discussions you may 
have  had  with  other  mayors,  do  you  believe  that  most  cities  have  the  resources 
available to provide the same level of customer service as the focused Federal effort 
in Wilmington? 

Answer. The FCC funded the entire project for the digital switch. The City of Wil-
mington did not incur any out of pocket expenses, however, we did donate some ‘‘in- 
kind’’  support  such  as  facilities,  staff  time  etc.  The  City  of  Wilmington  has  a  total 
of 1000 employees and without the support of the FCC, this would have been a very 
challenging project for the City to implement. 

Question  2.  Mayor  Saffo,  could  you  describe  what  the  City  learned  as  a  result  of 
the  two  soft  tests  conducted.  Were  any  translator  stations  involved  in  the  tests?  If 
so, were viewers of the analog translator stations confused by the test? 

Answer.  The  City  of  Wilmington  learned  immediately  how  many  people  needed 
help  who  thought  they  had  hooked  up  their  converter  boxes  properly  when,  in  fact, 
they did not. My recommendation would be to conduct several soft tests prior to the 
switch  over  as  we  only  conducted  two  in  Wilmington  leading  up  to  the  transition 
and  that  the  test  be  done,  if  at  all  possible,  during  prime  time  viewing  slots  when 
more people are watching. 

Question 3. Mayor Saffo, in addition to your city’s fire department, what other or-
ganizations  did  you  consider  to  provide  technical  assistance  to  seniors  and  other 
with installation of their set-top boxes? 

Answer.  The  Department  of  Social  Services,  the  Department  of  Aging,  Meals  on 
Wheels,  all  senior  centers,  faith  based  groups  such  as  churches  and  synagogues  as 
well as young volunteers from our local university. 

Question  4.  Mayor  Saffo,  how  successful  was  the  television  e-cycling  day?  Do  you 
see  a  benefit  for  the  FCC  to  provide  consumers  information  regarding  the  e-cycling 
of analog television in its communications on DTV? 

Answer.  New  Hanover  County  had  been  conducting  e-cycling  days  since  March 
2008  on  the  last  Saturday  of  every  month.  We  stressed  that  a  new  television  was 
not  necessary;  that  a  converter  box  was  available.  Total  of  80  tons  of  electronic 
equipment  was  collected  (from  March–September)—half  of  that  was  actual  tele-
vision  sets.  An  important  key  to  our  success  was  having  our  TV  stations  provide 
information to their viewers on up-coming e-cycling events and to encourage keeping 
old  televisions  sets  out  of  our  landfills  through  participation  in  these  events.  Our 
stations  conducted  almost  monthly  interviews  with  Lynn  Bestul,  Solid  Waste  Plan-
ner with the New Hanover County government, to get information out to the public. 
He  suggests  conducting  two  events  before  and  one  event  right  to  get  a  majority  of 
the televisions. 

An event costs $1,300 as we paid $0.13/lb for television set recycling. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:16 Apr 11, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\80275.TXT JACKIE

